 Par Pharmaceutical Inc. reported a loss of $1.8 million for its third quarter, ended July 1.  A loss was anticipated.  The deficit was attributed to about $3.5 million in charges relating to product recalls, fines stemming from guilty pleas by the company in a federal investigation of generic drug companies and certain inventory write-offs.  A year earlier, the Spring Valley, N.Y., company posted net income of $2 million, or 18 cents a share.  Sales rose 12% to $27.6 million from $24.7 million.  Net for the nine months fell 56% to $3.7 million, or 34 cents a share, from $8.5 million, or 76 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 21% to $85.7 million.  Par and its Quad Pharmaceutical subsidiary recently pleaded guilty to giving an unlawful gratuity to an employee of the Food and Drug Administration.  Two former officers also pleaded guilty to a related charge.  The company also disclosed that it had filed false information with the FDA, was recalling one of its drugs and had stopped selling two others.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it downgraded its rating on this savings bank holding company's subordinated debt to single-B-1 from Ba-2, affecting about $25 million of long-term debt.  The rating had been under review for possible downgrade since January.  The rating concern cited Fortune's continued poor earnings performance and the increasing competition for consumer deposits and residential mortgage assets in the company's core markets.  Friday, Aug. 18, 8-10 p.m. EDT, on TNT (repeated at 10 p.m. and on Aug. 19 and 20): "Breaking Point."  Deep in the German forest in the tense days before D-Day, a captured American intelligence officer is brainwashed by the Nazis into thinking the war has been over for two years.  Corbin Bernsen of "L.A.  Law" fame stars in this stylish psychological thriller.  Friday, Aug. 18, 1:30-3 a.m. EDT, on NBC: "Later With Bob Costas."  Gosh, folks, doesn't it seem as though Bob Costas has been on the air forever?  If you need to ask "Who is Bob Costas?" don't miss this first anniversary highlights show.  Saturday, Aug. 19, 9:30-11 p.m. EDT, on HBO (repeated Aug. 24, 27, 30, Sept. 4 and 12): "Vietnam War Story: The Last Days."  By not trying to pack all its meaning into one story, this ACE Award-winning anthology tells more diverse truths about Vietnam than the rest of Hollywood put together.  These three tales are set in the painful last days of the war.  Sunday, Aug. 20, 7-8 p.m. EDT, on PBS (PBS dates and times vary, so check local listings): "Excellence in the Public Sector With Tom Peters."  The nation's favorite corporate guru is back.  This time, he is scrutinizing the broader realm of federal and city government, as well as non-profit, management.  His success stories include Phoenix, Ariz., and the Department of Juvenile Justice in New York City.  Sunday, Aug. 20, 8-9 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Sharks."  This "National Audubon Society Special" sympathizes with one of the sea's least cuddly beasts.  Narrated by Peter ("Jaws") Benchley and filmed by the aptly named Stanton Waterman.  Sunday, Aug. 20, 9-10:30 p.m. EDT, on HBO (repeated on Aug. 23, 26, 29 and 31): "Tailspin: Behind the Korean Airliner Tragedy."  Any doubts you've ever had about the advisability of resolving public controversies by means of the docudrama genre will be confirmed by this docudramatization of the events surrounding the 1983 Soviet shootdown of a Korean Airlines passenger jet.  Sunday, Aug. 20, 10-11 p.m. EDT, on A&E (repeated at 2 a.m. and on Aug. 26): "Moscow Night."  There was a time when a Gostelradio film of a Moscow concert by "cool" jazzman Dave Brubeck would have been path-breaking.  Now, after last week's hard rock/heavy metal concert in Lenin Stadium, it's merely reassuring.  Monday, Aug. 21, 9-10 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Neil Simon: Not Just for Laughs."  This "American Masters" traces the playwright's Brooklyn origins, and the ups and downs of his phenomenally successful career -- with more than a little help from several film clips from the many Hollywood versions of plays from "Barefoot in the Park" to "Brighton Beach Memoirs."  Tuesday, Aug. 22, 10-10:30 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "No Applause, Just Throw Money."  I know the title sounds like PBS pledge week, but it isn't.  It's a nifty little documentary on such a good subject that I'm surprised nobody ever made a film about it before: New York City street performers.  Thursday-Friday, Aug. 24-25, in hourly reports, on the Discovery Channel: The planet Neptune.  Feel like getting away from it all?  Watch the first closeup photographs ever taken of the mysterious eighth planet, beamed back by the U.S. space probe Voyager 2, as it drifts out to the edge of the solar system.  Saturday, Aug. 26, 9-10:30 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Great Moments From 'Austin City Limits.'" Country music fans, you're in luck.  This showcase offers highlights going all the way back to its 1975 debut.  Tuesday, Aug. 29, 10-11 p.m. EDT, on ABC: "Black in White America."  This documentary about the diverse life experiences of black Americans was put together by a group of correspondents, producers and researchers who have two things in common: Each of them works for ABC News, and each of them grew up black in America.  The show will be followed by a special edition of "Nightline."  More in Monday's column.  Wednesday, Aug. 30, 8-9 p.m. EDT, on CBS: "Queen of the Beasts."  No, Lindsay Wagner is not the royal creature in question.  She's the host of this wildlife special, filmed in Tanzania and focusing on the fascinating social life of lionesses -- and lions, of course.  Wednesday, Aug. 30, 9-10 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Cary Grant: The Leading Man."  Speaking of lions, here's a tribute to the suavest pussycat of them all.  Velda Sue is a lady that small-business owners would like to meet.  She's rich, and she likes to raise money for budding capitalists.  Unfortunately for cash-starved entrepreneurs, Velda Sue so far exists only on paper, some 90 pages of controversial federal legislation that Congress will be asked to consider this fall.  Velda Sue is the shorthand name for a proposed federally chartered, private corporation that would buy small-business loans from banks, package them as securities, and resell them to large investors such as pension funds and insurance companies.  The idea mimics the successful approach of government-sponsored enterprises such as Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, well-known financial nicknames.  Fannie Mae is the name used for the Federal National Mortgage Association; Freddie Mac stands for the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp.  Both are federally sponsored corporations that do business in the secondary mortgage market.  Velda Sue is an acronym for Venture Enhancement and Loan Development Administration for Smaller Undercapitalized Enterprises.  Rep. John LaFalce (D., N.Y.), chairman of the House Small Business Committee, introduced a bill to create Velda Sue earlier this month.  In theory, Velda Sue would make it easier for small companies to borrow money, especially for real estate, plant and equipment, and other needs that require long-term borrowing.  Banks would be eager to make such loans to credit-worthy companies, knowing they could then turn around and sell the loan to Velda Sue.  Without secondary markets, banks have to carry loans on their books to maturity.  Since banks have government-imposed limits on overall lending, the inability to sell off loans makes banks reluctant to lend long-term.  Loans that are sold in the secondary market also don't count against a bank's limits on lending to individual borrowers.  "You could stimulate small business substantially with this kind of market," says Weldon Barton, a lobbyist with the Independent Bankers Association of America.  "It's a great way to leverage existing funds quickly without added appropriations," adds John Paul Galles, executive vice president of National Small Business United, a Washington-based trade group.  "From that angle, I think it's a terrific idea and one that's long overdue."  Floyd Stoner, director of legislative operations for the American Bankers Association, says the ABA hasn't yet taken a position on the Velda Sue legislation.  "But as a concept, the secondary market for small-business loans is very appealing," he adds.  Government-sponsored enterprises aren't part of the federal budget, but they carry the implicit warranty of government aid in case of a loan default.  It's this backstop that makes their securities attractive to investors.  Velda Sue's individual securities, for example, wouldn't carry a government guarantee, but the bill allows the Treasury Department to buy as much as $1.5 billion of Velda Sue paper, subject to congressional appropriation, in a funding crisis.  Such quasi-government guarantees are a sensitive issue, especially in the wake of the multibillion-dollar savings and loan industry rescue.  The recently signed S&L reorganization act requires the Treasury Department, no fan of government-sponsored corporations, to make a new study of these enterprises.  "This isn't a particularly good time to float something and say, 'Trust the banks,'" one House committee staff member contends.  Even Mr. Galles of National Small Business United, the trade group, has qualms about public-private financing methods.  "While I respect what LaFalce is trying to do, I think it's important to do a thorough evaluation of the way government guarantees, and the secondary markets support, capital formation on the federal level."  Leah Young, spokeswoman for the House Small Business Committee, concedes that Velda Sue "isn't going to take off in the next couple of months."  The bill, which is highly technical and subject to review by several committees, will go into hearings this fall.  "We think there's an opportunity here, and there are a lot of protections built in," Ms. Young says.  Projections of congressional action are mixed.  "This won't be a slam dunk," says Peter McNeish, president of the National Association of Small Business Investment Companies.  "The promoters are going to have to make a very clear distinction between the S&L situation and what this legislation would do."  There are major differences between bank and thrift regulation -- where deposits are guaranteed and federal and state regulators keep tabs on an institution's healthand the arm's length relationship that exists between the government and federally chartered corporations.  Still, Mr. Barton of the Independent Bankers Association thinks Velda Sue "has a reasonably good chance" of passing this session.  "You're not really dropping a new concept on Congress."  To be eligible for Velda Sue, the bill says, loans would have to come from small businesses with a net worth of $8 million or less and have annual, after-tax income of $2.5 million or less.  Loans would have to be fully amortized and secured by a first mortgage on their collateral.  Banks would have to be shareholders in Velda Sue before they could sell loans to it.  The corporation wouldn't start until it sells $30 million in stock to participating financial institutions.  The bill also would create a Velda Sue subsidiary, the Corporation for Small Business Investment, which would perform a parallel secondary market function for debentures sold by some 300 privately capitalized small-business investment companies.  These investment companies, licensed by the Small Business Administration, invest in minority-owned companies and other small firms.  Cosbi, as it's known, has been debated in Congress for several years but has failed to win approval as an entity of its own.  Exxon Corp. launched a legal broadside against private lawsuits stemming from an Alaska oil spill, raising issues that even some plaintiffs' attorneys said could help the company contain its seeming open-ended exposure from the accident.  In court papers filed Tuesday in Anchorage, Alaska, Exxon offered more than two dozen reasons why its legal liability towards the scores of groups that have filed suit in the wake of the March 24 tanker spill should be reduced or outright eliminated.  While some of the defenses were routine, the filings point up some unique and unsettled issues of admiralty and environmental law that Exxon may ultimately be able to resolve in its favor -- or at least use as bargaining chips in settlement talks.  "Many of the issues are unprecedented," said Thomas J. Schoenbaum, a University of Georgia law professor who is advising the state of Alaska in its separate suit against Exxon filed earlier this week.  "The courts will have to sort out some very complex questions of law."  In a nutshell, the filings suggest a strategy in which Exxon will try to spread the blame for the accident, vigorously fight an award of punitive damages and try to limit the scope of any groups that it is ultimately responsible to.  While not naming anybody, Exxon argued in the papers that "the actions of others" contributed to the spill, and hinted that it might bring suit against them for "comparative negligence."  The company has previously complained that government regulators hindered cleanup efforts.  Exxon argued that it should be immune from punitive damages because federal statutes already heavily regulate oil spills and they do not specifically provide for such damages.  And some plaintiffs' attorneys said they read the filing to suggest that Exxon was appealing for a court order that would allow it to reduce any eventual damage awards by the amounts that it has been paying some victims, mostly fishermen, to do cleanup work.  Fearful of exactly that, some fishermen idled by the spill who did cleanup work for Exxon negotiated clauses in their contracts that barred the company from any such "set-off" of future damages.  But many of the more recent cleanup contracts did not have such assurances, meaning that Exxon's stated legal position may provoke some anger among those workers.  Exxon also moved to take advantage of a line of admiralty law cases, including an old U.S. Supreme Court decision, that limit the classes of people permitted to recover in maritime mishaps.  The idea, formulated in order to provide some clear benchmark for limiting what could be an endless string of claims, is that "if you have not suffered property damage or actual physical harm you cannot sue for lost economic profits," according to Frank Cicero, a partner with the Chicago law firm of Kirkland and Ellis who was the principal trial lawyer for Amoco Corp. after the grounding of the Amoco Cadiz off France during the late 1970s.  Exxon, for instance, contended in court papers that certain Alaska native groups who had sued for damage to their subsistence interests have no standing to sue because they had no formal "property right" in the fish and game that the spill killed off.  The same theory could be applied to many other current litigants against the company, including local communities and commercial concerns who were hurt by the spill but basically indirectly.  Plaintiffs' attorneys are hopeful that any judge would not apply the rule where, as in Alaska's case, there are state statutes that are quite liberal in extending the right to sue.  Some find the rule to be harshly illogical.  "Their entire way of life has been destroyed, at least temporarily," said Lloyd Miller, an Anchorage attorney for the native groups.  "There was a question in some people's minds whether Exxon was going to play hardball," he said, adding that shortly after the Exxon Valdez ruptured in Prince William Sound Exxon, company officials took public responsibility for the spill and promised to pay all "reasonable" claims.  "I would say there is now every indication that Exxon is planning to mount a very vigorous defense."  In its filings, Exxon alluded to, but didn't yet formally plead, another potentially powerful, but archaic, defense, known as a limitation of liability action.  The defense, based on an old British law designed to encourage shipping and now part of U.S. law too, limits a shipowner's liability from an accident to the value of his ship and cargo.  In Exxon's case, that would be a mere fraction of the billions of dollars in estimated damage claims against the company.  Plaintiffs' attorneys and some legal experts said they would be astounded if Exxon were to prevail with the argument, contending that companies as large as Exxon do not need the protection.  The judge in the Amoco case, for instance, wasn't impressed.  Moreover, to prevail, Exxon must show that the cause of the accident was basically an isolated instance of negligence by an otherwise competent crew.  Some people think that would be a heavy additional burden, especially given Exxon's knowledge of ship captain Joseph Hazelwood's history of drinking.  Nonetheless, Exxon said in the filings that it "expressly reserves" the right to file such an action, a right that expires Sept. 24.  Many plaintiffs' attorneys think odds are growing that the company will follow through.  "What have they got to lose?" said one attorney.  "It's not like people aren't already mad at them."  U.S. auto makers are keeping third-quarter production at cautious levels, after building more cars than they could sell earlier in the year.  Even truck output -- which had been setting records -- is now running slightly below the 1988 level.  Stronger-than-expected sales of domestic-made vehicles in early August probably won't change the auto makers' plans much.  Dealers and industry analysts attribute the sales surge more to buyer concerns about higher car and truck prices this fall than to general confidence in the economy.  Consumers may also be worried about whether auto makers will continue the generous incentives they've used almost continuously over the past year to buoy sales.  "What's happening here is the good old buy-in-advance syndrome," said John Qualls, of Micro-Economics Ltd. in St. Louis.  Mr. Qualls expects sales to sag badly in the fourth quarter, causing supplies of unsold vehicles to rise unless auto makers show continued restraint in production.  The nine domestic car makers expect to build 1,430,242 cars in the third period, down 4.1% from the 1,491,224 cars assembled a year ago.  Truck production is forecast at 880,674 units, a scant decrease from the 880,878 pickup trucks, vans and sport utility vehicles assembled a year ago.  Japanese manufacturers continue to make inroads with their U.S. assembly plants.  Plants owned by foreign auto makers or operated as joint ventures with U.S. companies are expected to build 280,380 cars, nearly 20% of all domestic production, up from less than 14%.  Much of this added output comes at the expense of General Motors Corp., which plans to build only 601,000 cars in the U.S. this quarter, according to industry sources.  That's a cut from the already-low 623,500 cars forecast earlier this summer for the No. 1 U.S. auto maker.  Production at these levels would represent the lowest quarterly total since the 1970 fourth period, when a strike by the United Auto Workers union closed most of GM's plants.  The current estimate is 17.6% below the 729,729 cars GM built in the 1988 third quarter.  GM began the quarter with a 79-day supply of cars, according to Ward's Automotive Reports, well above the 60 days considered desirable.  Temporary plant closings and aggressive dealer and consumer incentives helped GM cut its inventory level to a 72-day supply by the end of July.  GM's current caution may indicate it hopes to avoid an inventory bulge in the fourth quarter, when new, more expensive, 1990 models go on sale.  GM is more bullish on trucks, however, with the estimated 412,000-unit output slated for the third quarter setting a record for production in the period, according to Lloyd E. Reuss, an executive vice president.  Ford Motor Co., with domestic-car sales off only about 3% so far this year, is expected to build 362,669 cars in the third quarter.  That's slightly more than the 360,189 cars it produced a year ago.  Ford's unsold car inventories fell to a 61-day supply at the end of July from a 78-day supply a month earlier, according to Ward's.  Ford's truck output in the quarter is forecast to fall marginally to 312,074 from 317,004 in 1988.  Chrysler Corp., hit by sliding car sales this year, plans to build 186,193 cars during the quarter, down 4.1% from a year ago, industry sources said.  Chrysler's truck output is expected to fall 8.8%, partly because the company is retooling to add a pickup model at its Warren, Mich., plant.  Mazda Motor Corp. is expected to build 45,886 cars, down 15.2% from the 54,083 cars it built last year.  A Mazda spokeswoman said production was off partly because of retooling required for new models.  Here are the industry forecasts for third-quarter output:  @ CARS  @ 1989 1988 %Chg.  @ GM .................... 601,000 729,729 - 17.6  @ Ford .................. 362,669 360,189 + 0.7  @ Chrysler .............. 186,193 194,167 - 4.1  @ Honda ................. 81,882 88,656 - 7.6  @ Mazda ................. 45,886 54,083 - 15.2  @ Nissan ................ 29,410 30,897 - 4.8  @ Toyota ................ 45,000 4,000 ...  @ Nummi ................. 47,703 29,340 + 62.6  @ DiamStar .............. 30,499 163 ...  @ Total ............... 1,430,242 1,491,224 - 4.1  @ TRUCKS  @ GM .................... 412,000 407,281 + 1.2  @ Ford .................. 312,074 317,004 - 1.6  @ Chrysler .............. 129,207 141,604 - 8.8  @ Nissan ................ 27,393 14,989 + 82.8  @ Total ................. 880,674 880,878 ...  On the streets of Brooklyn yesterday, 10 United Parcel Service trucks quietly made their rounds on engines powered by natural gas, the start of a two-year experiment that eventually could see a big portion of UPS's nationwide fleet switching to that fuel.  The idea of the world's largest package-delivery company testing a fuel other than gasoline in some of its 104,000 vehicles pleases environmentalists and regulators fighting deteriorating air quality.  But an announcement such as the one UPS made yesterday, telling of the trial before a gaggle of reporters and television cameras at its midtown Manhattan garage, makes the natural-gas industry positively giddy.  For right now, an unofficial race is on to determine which, if any, low-polluting fuels can make inroads on gasoline, America's fuel of choice for nearly a century.  And press agents and politicians may have as much to say about the outcome as chemists, engineers and auto makers.  Most of the contenders are well-known, and previous efforts to promote them have flopped.  But now, renewed public and political concern about air pollution is giving them another chance -- and this time their sponsors seem determined to take it.  "A trend is developing" toward alternative fuels as the nation scrambles to meet newly proposed air-quality standards, says William Muszynski, a regional administrator for the Environmental Protection Agency.  "No one believes we can meet those standards running vehicles as we do now."  Mr. Muszynski says natural gas could become a factor in the search for a cleaner-burning transportation fuel.  Others are pushing alcohol fuels, such as methanol and ethanol, as the fuels of the future; indeed, revised clean-air regulations recently proposed by President Bush prominently mention them.  Then there's reformulated gasoline -- technically not an alternative, but perhaps the front-runner.  Major oil companies have for some time been experimenting with new formulas that would cut pollution by changing what goes into the tank in the first place.  Atlantic Richfield Co. is noisily promoting on the West Coast a reformulated gasoline for old cars that eliminates lead and, it says, reduces other tailpipe byproducts.  Chevron Corp. is also at the forefront of the effort to overhaul gasoline chemistry.  Not surprisingly, a natural gas company is playing a big part in the UPS experiment announced yesterday.  Brooklyn Union Gas Co. presented UPS with data showing potential reductions of 25% in nitrogen oxide emissions and 13% in hydrocarbon emissions by switching trucks from gasoline to natural gas.  These pollutants contribute to smog and to ground-level ozone that can cause respiratory problems.  In addition, the gas company told UPS that emissions of carbon dioxide, which hurts the atmosphere's ozone layer, could be cut by 23%; those of carbon monoxide, by 85%.  UPS was impressed.  "The use of clean fuels is going to be mandated, and we want to be ahead of the game," says Harry Winters, a UPS official.  "If we rely solely on gasoline in the future, our company could be jeopardized."  UPS says it was also happy to learn that natural gas costs only 57 cents a gallon, compared with 87 cents for unleaded gasoline.  Moreover, Brooklyn Union is right across the street from a UPS site and agreed to refuel the 10 trucks during the test.  Success, however, is far from certain.  UPS says it ran vehicles on methanol and tested some multifuel vehicles that would run on various substances a few years back.  They were maintenance nightmares, company officials recall, so the maintenance and fuel costs of natural gas vehicles must stay in line with gasoline-powered UPS trucks.  If UPS is satisfied, says the company's automotive engineering manager, Don M. Parkinson, it will next try natural gas in other heavily polluted cities, such as Los Angeles, Houston and Chicago.  Though results may be years away, the UPS test has natural gas backers applauding.  "You can wrap yourself in the American flag on this one," says Jeffrey Seisler, executive director of the Natural Gas Vehicle Coalition, a utility-sponsored group.  Natural gas is abundant in this country, clean and easily used, he says.  Currently, about 30,000 vehicles powered by natural gas are in use around the country, he says, but none could do so much for the image of natural gas as the UPS trucks.  Backers of natural gas point to the more than one million miles of pipeline already in place in the U.S. to distribute the fuel, and they claim natural gas pumps could be installed alongside gasoline pumps at gas stations by tapping into existing lines and installing compressors.  Several years ago, 80 service stations in Vancouver, Canada, were so equipped for a test, they note.  But others are more cautious.  "Convincing people that {natural gas} won't be any additional trouble" could be a problem, says the EPA's Mr. Muszynski.  For one thing, even if the investment is made in service stations to pump natural gas, new cars would have to be redesigned to include three three-foot cylinders under the vehicle's body to hold enough compressed gas to prevent frequent refueling.  Older ones would have to be retrofitted.  Some engine changes would also be needed.  Methanol and ethanol, the alcohol fuels, are regarded by auto makers as more viable alternatives -- but only barely.  As far back as 1916, Henry Ford toyed with making fuel from vegetable matter, and auto racers use methanol because it coaxes better performance from engines.  Also, both forms of alcohol produce lower levels of hydrocarbons than gasoline, and California studies indicate that they also produce fewer so-called greenhouse-gas emissions.  "Developing methanol cars isn't that far off from a capability standpoint," says Donald R. Buist, director of Ford's automotive emissions and fuel economy office.  But, he adds, "we'd have to scramble technologically" to get it done by the 1995 target date that the Bush administration set for methanol cars to hit sales targets in nine of the nation's most polluted cities.  And cars that can burn either gasoline or methanol could cost "several hundred dollars" more than conventional models, Ford estimates.  Worse, methanol and ethanol are far more corrosive than gasoline, damaging fuel tanks and ruining rubber engine seals more quickly.  "Using only methanol or ethanol would require completely changing the fuel system, using all-plastic parts and redesigning the fuel injectors," says Joseph M. Colucci, head of the fuels and lubricants department at GM Research Laboratories.  Then, too, methanol-powered engines are more difficult to start when cold.  The lack of widespread availability at service stations may be the biggest obstacle to all alternatives, however.  "When we ran vehicles completely dedicated to methanol, we found people were absolutely paranoid they'd run out of fuel," Mr. Colucci says.  "Drivers simply wanted to see a station they could use at every street corner, like they could with gasoline."  Which leaves gasoline.  Big Three auto makers are backing reformulated gasoline for a simple reason: It requires them to make almost no costly and technologically difficult engineering changes to cars and trucks.  That's especially important because the new concern over air pollution seems to be pointing toward separate sets of regulations for various parts of the country, such as California and the Northeast.  Top GM and Ford executives have been urging top oil company officials to pick up more of the clean-air burden now than they did in the 1970s.  "Reformulated gasoline could be used in existing vehicles and would more quickly improve air quality compared to the effect of a limited number of vehicles using alternative fuels," says GM President Robert C. Stempel.  The oil industry, however, remains reluctant to bear the full brunt of any changes.  "A combination of better vehicle emission-control systems along with the possibility of reformulated gasoline would be more cost-effective," says Gene Spitler, Chevron's general manager for product engineering.  Plus, gasoline specialists say the science is at an early stage.  "In terms of significant effect on reducing air pollution, we're not quite there yet," says Mr. Spitler.  Corporate Heads Show  Split in Personalities  IT TAKES A CERTAIN something to head a company, but apparently that something differs sharply depending on whether the executive runs a start-up or a giant corporation.  London House, a psychological research firm, administered tests to 70 chief executives -- half of them at Fortune 500 companies and half of them from the 500 list of Inc., a magazine for entrepreneurs.  The tests measured drive and creativity along with the ability to reason and handle stress.  The results: Members of the two groups showed very different personality traits.  The Inc. 500 executives were far more able to work under pressure than their big-company counterparts.  They were more satisfied with doing a job for its own sake, but suffered more from feelings of inadequacy.  Fortune 500 executives, on the other hand, demonstrated a strong drive to climb up through an organization and an instinct for leadership.  The standout skill of Fortune chiefs was their ability to communicate.  On a vocabulary test with words such as jejune, obstreperous and abstemious, they scored better than 90% of a control group of corporate executives.  In contrast, the Inc. executives "were pretty poor in communications," says Donald Moretti, director of testing systems at London House, which is based in Park Ridge, Ill.  The Inc. executives' strong suit: Creativity, an area in which the Fortune executives didn't shine at all.  Business Isn't a Bore,  Schools Tell Minorities  WITH MINORITIES underrepresented in business schools and management ranks, some universities are starting early to entice them.  Ten schools in recent summers have joined in a program called Leadership Education and Development, or LEAD.  They recruit groups of black, Hispanic and Native American high school students to convince them that business can be fun.  At Duke University's Fuqua School of Business, Prof.  Wes Magat encourages "noise, laughing and kidding" in his "Introduction to Economics" class, part of a monthlong program paid for by the schools and corporate sponsors.  This summer, the kids tackled competition and deregulation by looking at the airline industry.  Many had flown to Duke and wanted to know why fares were so high.  And they argued about the Eastern pilots' strike, debating how emotion -- such as union animosity toward Frank Lorenzo -- enters into strategic decisions.  That was a pleasant surprise to 17-year-old Nicole Woodard; "A lot of business has to do with people," she discovered.  She'd come to Duke thinking that business was mostly "sitting at a desk all day doing paper work."  Still, Ms. Woodard says she's going to go for her MBA only after getting her law degree.  That doesn't worry Richard Burton, an administrator of the LEAD program.  Duke isn't interested in a "hard sell" on the importance of business, he says.  And the message apparently gets through: In last year's LEAD "yearbook," graduate James Freemont printed this inscription: "Remember the name and I'll do the same; and don't forget money is the key to the game."  Waking a Company Out  Of a Corporate Culture  LOTS OF COMPANY presidents try to change their corporate cultures.  Not all of them have a buzzer like Jim McCormick's.  During a yearlong restructuring, Mr. McCormick, president of Oryx Energy in Dallas, kept this buzzer by his side in management meetings, using it to deliver a little aural shock -- and humor -- when executives were displaying Old Culture behavior.  "We're 102 years old," explains Harold Ashby, vice president, human resources and administration, for the oil and gas company.  "We had a lot of characteristics that were bureaucratic, paternal, risk-averse."  Oryx, which was spun off from Sun Co. last year, found it hard enough to streamline the organization, he says.  Changing "mindset" was even tougher.  That's where the buzzer came in.  If someone greeted a new idea with, "Well, I'm going to need to think about that," Mr. McCormick might ring his buzzer, and say, "We really don't need to study this one to death."  Likewise, a company consultant says, if someone said, "that's the dumbest idea I ever heard," a quick buzz might remind him to be a little more constructive.  The committee also adopted laminated cards with a big red C (for Culture) on them; each executive had one and could flash it in warning at anyone else -- including Mr. McCormick.  Both techniques were developed by lower-level teams, and their use gave the signal that even top managers were "willing to call ourselves down," Mr. Ashby says.  The buzzer is now retired, but it sits on Mr. McCormick's office credenza, serving as a reminder to executives.  Such symbols are crucial to changing behavior, Mr. Ashby says, adding, "It's easy to redraw organization boxes; it's not easy to reprogram minds."  Odds and Ends  HOW WOULD Mickey cope?  Executives seeking corporate wisdom can learn the Disney approach, in "behind-the-scenes" management seminars at Epcot Center and Disney World.  Part of the Disney philosophy, says seminars manager Rick Johnson, is "making people happy." . . .  Mindful of the beleaguered lives and high turnover of nurses, Albert Einstein Medical Center in Philadelphia now runs drawings for "Stress Buster" awards such as errand-running services and get-away weekends.  The hospital is quick to add that it also offers flextime and "competitive salaries."  United Brands Co. intends to sell 701,754 A&W Brands Inc. common shares, or a 7.76% stake, according to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing.  United Brands said it requested A&W to register these shares with the SEC, enabling it to sell the stock under federal securities laws.  The food company would then sell the shares depending on market conditions, the filing said.  United Brands' chairman, Carl H. Lindner, holds a remaining 30,900 shares through American Financial Corp., the filing said.  United Brands, American Financial and Mr. Lindner are based in Cincinnati and A&W is based in White Plains, N.Y.  A spokesman for United Brands Co. didn't have any further comment on the company's plans to sell its stake in A&W, which manufactures, distributes and markets soft drink concentrates.  Federal Paper Board Co., Montvale, N.J., said it has signed a letter of intent to acquire Imperial Cup Corp. Terms weren't disclosed.  Imperial is a Kenton, Ohio, producer of paper cups with annual sales of approximately $80 million.  Federal Paper Board is a maker of paperboard, bleached market pulp, and folding cartons.  John R. Kennedy, president of Federal Paper Board, said the acquisition would be "an excellent fit," citing Imperial's record of sales and earnings increases and its large consumption of bleached board.  He said members of the Allen family, which controls Imperial, would stay on a consultant basis after the acquisition.  Federal Paper Board said the purchase is subject to the execution of a definitive agreement.  Cardis Corp., a Cerritos, Calif., automotive supplies distributor that has been operating under bankruptcy-law protection since May 1988, filed a second amended plan of reorganization in federal bankruptcy court.  Cardis is reorganizing its operations around a core business of nine warehouse distribution centers and 27 retail stores in California and Arizona.  It has sold, closed or consolidated 16 business units and plans to sell its TuneUp Masters Inc. subsidiary, which isn't in bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Proceeds from the sales will be used to finance the plan.  Under certain stipulations, Security Pacific National Bank will receive $15 million in cash, a $20 million secured revolving working-capital note, and a $29 million seven-year secured Series A note, as well as 31% of the new common stock that Cardis plans to issue.  Other creditors also will receive cash, stock and notes to satisfy other claims.  The plan requires the approval of the bankruptcy court.  Fischbach Corp. said FAC Acquisition Inc., which has agreed to buy Fischbach for $29.835 a share, or $117 million, informed it that financing for the transaction isn't available.  The electrical-contracting company, 52.9%-owned by Miami Beach financier Victor Posner, said FAC, a group formed by British investor Asher DeVere, is pursuing alternate financing sources.  Fischbach shares plunged $6.75, to $18.75, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Riedel Environmental Technologies said it was awarded a $155 million, 20-year contract to build and operate a municipal waste-composting facility in Portland.  The plant, scheduled to begin operation in 1991, is designed to triple landfill life by using Swiss technology that will turn 130,000 out of every 185,000 tons of garbage into compost.  The compost can then be used for agricultural purposes and landscaping, the company said.  The process is an alternative to mass burning or cogeneration technology, the company said.  We stand in awe of the Woodstock generation's ability to be unceasingly fascinated by the subject of itself.  One would have thought the saturation coverage at the time would have been enough.  But every five years Woodstock-goers, so many of whom have become writers for elite media organs, wheel out their gilded memories and pet observations.  It's even more remarkable that other generations are willing to give the boomers all this attention.  The elder generations helped create the excesses of the '60s by indulging the teen-agers of the era.  Somehow grown-ups believed that wisdom adhered to youth, and that it was necessary to "get in touch with the young."  Life and Look magazines opened their pages.  The New York Times was somber and celebratory, calling Woodstock a "Phenomenon of Innocence."  This obeisance encouraged all that talk about Revolution, the Age of Aquarius and yippiedom.  Today, the younger generation seems also to have become vicarious flower children.  Woodstock nostalgia seems strongest among those who are 14.  MTV, which caters to early adolescents, has been going bananas with "Woodstock Minutes" and the like.  An audience of teen-age boys naturally likes the idea of running around with naked women and doing LSD while listening to Hendrix and The Who.  Woodstock also offers a forum for vague rebelliousness.  That's perfect for today's teens, many of whom would like to be radical, even though they don't have any definite politics.  Today's renegades should remember that Woodstock was about drugs, and that without drugs, it wasn't much fun.  They should also know that all the talk about freedom and individuality at Woodstock was a lie.  The Woodstock radicals were intolerant of individuality.  There was a rigid dress code (jeans, no short hair).  There was a rigid vocabulary code.  There was a rigid thought code.  There was peer pressure to be part of the drug scene; people who didn't do drugs often were afraid to admit it.  There was intense peer pressure, especially on women, to be promiscuous.  A remark in a recent Woodstock column by the New York Post's Pete Hamill captures the attitude toward women.  He is describing what a wonderful time his male buddies had: "They joined together and bathed nude in Mr. Filippini's pond.  They shared food and joints and girlfriends."  This year's cliche about Woodstock is that the kids came to Woodstock as renegades and left as a market.  Rock is now commercial.  Rebellion is an advertising gimmick.  The heroes of Woodstock now ride the nostalgia circuit.  As Wavy Gravy recently put it, "Woodstock was created for wallets."  Mainstream commercial culture has indeed assimilated the counterculture.  But mainstream culture had to meet it halfway.  What mainstream culture absorbed, at least during the '70s, was a whiff of Woodstock's utopianism, the idea that you could have drugs as well as wisdom, promiscuity as well as relationships, organization without structure, prosperity without economic competition.  There was a spiritual greed in the desire to have all these things; the older name for it is hedonism.  The Woodstock radicals couldn't have been expected to realize that hedonism can damage the social fabric.  Their elders should have told them.  Those whom they would have listened to did not, and the social fabric was damaged.  It's impossible to link definitively the counterculture to today's social pathologies.  But the late '60s and early '70s brought a number of terrible trends that now haunt us.  Drug abuse rose dramatically.  The divorce rate went up.  Promiscuity rose.  Men felt less compelled to take responsibility for the children they helped create.  Schools became more disorderly.  The universities became refuges for frustrated radicals.  The poverty rate, which had been dropping, went up.  Today, most Woodstock veterans acknowledge that the hedonism was excessive.  But today's nostalgic treatments are still largely self-aggrandizing.  Many celebrate Woodstock as the Last Good Time.  It would be more appropriate if there were a hint of shame, if not over the damage that was done to the idea of individual responsibility, at least over the deaths that resulted in part from the countercultural life style.  Twenty-seven acts played at Woodstock.  Janis Joplin, Jimi Hendrix, Tim Hardin, Keith Moon and Paul Butterfield subsequently died from drug overdoses.  Bob Hite from Canned Heat later died of a drug-related heart attack and Ron McKernan of the Grateful Dead died of a liver ailment.  Richard Manuel of The Band and Abbie Hoffman were suicides.  Felix Pappalardi of Mountain was shot by his wife.  It wasn't only the famous who died.  We were struck by a message in the current issue of Life from Pat Reul Malone, a secretary in Monroe, N.Y: "I am writing this in memory of my dear brother, James M. Berra, who went to Woodstock with three friends.  James died at the age of 26 on February 11, 1978, from a drug overdose.  Two others also died of drug overdoses.  Only one person of the four survives."  The Securities and Exchange Commission issued a revised proposal that, if adopted, will significantly change the rules under which officers, directors and corporate "insiders" must report purchases and sales of stock in their own companies.  The proposed rules, which will be voted on by the SEC late this year after comment by the public, are a compromise between current law and more-lenient rules proposed by the agency last December.  They would essentially exempt middle-management executives from insider-filing requirements.  At the same time, insiders who exercise options to buy company stock would be allowed to report the transaction to the SEC much later than the current rules allow.  The proposal was adopted after an acrimonious, three-hour debate during a public meeting here yesterday.  The SEC's attempt to narrow the scope of its insider rules last December prompted a flood of mail, much of it critical, from investors and others who consider filings by insiders a valuable stock-picking tool.  Essentially, the SEC proposals would require only top executives, officers who set policy or head divisions, and executives who oversee company finances, to file reports on their transactions in company stock.  Exempted, for example, would be vice presidents who aren't directly involved in setting corporate policy.  SEC officials said they expected a significant decrease in insider filings if the proposal is adopted.  "The problem is really that of vice presidents; at banks and brokerage firms everybody's a vice president," said Brian Lane, special counsel in the SEC division of corporation finance.  Many investors watch buying and selling by corporate insiders for a clue to the outlook for a company's business and the direction of its stock price.  If the SEC eliminates filings by middle-management, some investors are concerned that they won't be able to spot telltale clusters of trading activity in which more than one officer or director is buying or selling in a short period of time.  For example, of the 20 stocks that insiders sold most actively in the past eight weeks, according to SEC records, 16 would not have appeared under the new rules.  "You don't see a pattern unless you see a lot of people buying or selling," said Theodore Schlissel, a New York investor who wrote the SEC to complain about the first set of proposals.  While the proposed rules would make life easier for some executives by exempting them from reporting, they would also be tougher on insiders who are required to file reports.  Companies would be required to publish in annual proxy statements the names of insiders who fail to file the required reports on time.  The SEC said 35% of corporate insiders now file their reports late.  The threat of public embarrassment should be a "significant deterrent" to late filings, Mr. Lane said.  In a significant shift from its earlier position, the SEC backed away from a plan that would have given insiders a slightly longer grace period to file their reports.  Currently, insiders must disclose transactions in their companies' shares by the 10th of the month following the trade.  Under the proposal, that deadline would remain.  Liberal Plantation politics has entered the race for Governor of New Jersey.  Glenn Cunningham, a black police captain who as a Democrat lost a close race for Mayor of Jersey City, has just endorsed Jim Courter, the GOP candidate for Governor.  Mr. Cunningham says it's time "to reconsider the tradition that blacks have nowhere else to go but the Democratic organization."  Jersey City Mayor Gerry McCann sneered about exchanging one "slave master" for another, to which Mr. Cunningham replied that Mr. McCann is "upset because I don't want to live on his plantation."  Organized labor wants to slip out of the framework of the very National Labor Relations Act it helped write more than 50 years ago.  Since 1987, workers have voted for union representation in only 49% of the elections held under the act.  The latest blow came last month when workers at a Nissan plant in Smyrna, Tenn., voted 2-1 against forming a union.  This dismal record has prompted union leaders to push for laws that would give them greater influence over nonunion workers.  Last year, labor proposed a law requiring companies to bargain with both union and non-union employees over proposed layoffs.  No doubt it assumed that the merits of professional union bargaining thus would become more evident to workers.  Another proposal would have required employee review of "safety-related" decisions.  So far Congress has turned down all such roundabout efforts to expand union influence in the workplace.  But last month, without a single hearing, Rep. Peter Visclosky (D., Ind.) won House Education and Labor Committee approval for a pension-plan requirement that shifts considerable influence to organized labor.  The Visclosky proposal mandates that all single-employer pension plans have a joint board of trustees, made up equally of employer and employee representatives.  Where there is a collective-bargaining agreement, the union would select representatives for all employees, both union and nonunion.  For the 700,000 plans covering nonunion employees, the Labor Department would have to conduct secret-ballot elections at enormous expense, even where employees were happy with the status quo.  The National Labor Relations Board now conducts only 3,000 or so elections a year on an annual budget of $137 million.  Mr. Visclosky says this massive new superstructure is needed because some pension plans recently have been used to finance takeovers.  Workers should have a say in such decisions, he argues, seemingly unmindful of the fact that pension trustees already have fiduciary guidelines.  There is in fact little evidence of fiduciary irresponsibility in pension-fund management.  But unions, if awarded a bigger voice in investment policies, most likely would pursue objectives having little to do with obtaining a good yield with reasonable safety on invested funds.  Even aside from that, it is not clear why unions should be appointed by law to speak for workers who have not voted for union representation.  "Joint trusteeship turns fiduciary responsibility into a popularity contest," says pension expert Mark Ugoretz.  Since companies would have sharply reduced control over funds but would still be liable for pension commitments, many might drop defined benefit plans in favor of less attractive forms of employee compensation, or might choose to avoid fringe benefits altogether by hiring more part-timers.  The Visclosky proposal, which now is part of a reconciliation bill Members are under great pressure to pass with few changes, erodes the principle that unions can represent workers only if a majority of them agree.  Unions may think Congress can restore their declining influence but we doubt that enforced union representation will go down very well with workers.  Boeing Co. has become the focus of a criminal investigation following the indictment of one of its former officials on charges of improperly obtaining some of the military's most sensitive budget and planning documents.  Richard Fowler, a former midlevel Boeing marketing official, was accused by an Alexandria, Va., grand jury of gaining unauthorized access to 100 classified Pentagon documents from 1979 to 1985.  Mr. Fowler's indictment earlier this week on theft, fraud and conspiracy charges could be a major breakthrough in the government's almost five-year-old drive to stamp out illicit trafficking of classified Pentagon budget and planning documents among defense contractors.  This alleged black market for secret documents could "provide a competitive edge to anyone in the business of supplying the {military services} with tactical and strategic weaponry," according to June Brown, the Defense Department's inspector general.  In addition to Boeing, investigators have said they are looking at a number of other major defense companies suspected of trafficking in secret government documents.  Mr. Fowler has declined to tell the government or the company who supplied him with the documents.  Prosecutors clearly hope that by charging Mr. Fowler, they can persuade him or others in the industry to begin cooperating with the grand-jury probe, according to government and industry officials familiar with the case.  At the same time, investigators are stepping up efforts to identify senior Pentagon officials suspected of methodically supplying Mr. Fowler with secret materials, including three National Security Council decision documents signed by former President Reagan or his national security adviser.  So-called NSC decision directives are among the most closely guarded documents in the entire government.  Boeing officials didn't have any immediate comment; Mr. Fowler declined to comment.  Boeing fired Mr. Fowler after investigators began looking into Boeing's activities, and the company has provided the Justice Department with large numbers of documents and agreed to have several current officials testify.  The grand jury, among other things, charged Mr. Fowler with improperly passing on to Boeing officials and other contractors copies of classified memos and detailed budget materials prepared for the secretary of defense, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff and other top military leaders.  Mr. Fowler wasn't authorized to handle such sensitive documents, according to the indictment.  The government also contends he didn't have authority to include the documents in unclassified reports he sent to superiors.  In some instances, according to the indictment, Mr. Fowler obtained documents specifically requested by officials at Boeing or other contractors.  And prosecutors contend he removed the "secret" classification stamp from some of the documents before sharing them with others.  The indictment indicates that all three NSC documents dealt with a proposed space-based anti-missile shield, known as the Strategic Defense Initiative.  For Boeing, which generally has avoided criminal charges that have bedeviled some of its competitors, the latest developments could mean big trouble.  At the very least, the aerospace giant faces the expense and visibility of months of further investigation by the grand jury.  Moreover, the indictment charges that some of those involved in the alleged conspiracy with Mr. Fowler created bogus files and kept "a separate set of log books" to hide the existence of the secret documents from Pentagon officials.  But it doesn't identify any other individuals under investigation.  Boeing has told prosecutors that Mr. Fowler corrupted its security procedures, and that Pentagon officials failed to follow up early warnings that there weren't mandatory receipts for some documents found in the company's files.  The Boeing investigation began, and is being pursued, independently of the massive Pentagon bribery and influence-peddling probe code-named "Operation Ill Wind."  The on-again, off-again grand-jury probe of widespread document-swapping first garnered public attention in 1985, when a GTE Corp. unit pleaded guilty to charges that it conspired with a consultant and others to illegally obtain classified electronic-warfare documents from the Pentagon.  But many of the other charges collapsed, and the grand-jury investigation remained largely dormant until early this year.  Pentagon officials, for instance, relied on administrative rather than criminal proceedings to downgrade Mr. Fowler's security clearance from top secret to secret before it was finally revoked after he left Boeing.  But in the face of congressional criticism and new orders from top Justice Department prosecutors, the probe was revived in the past few months and additional subpoenas were issued for Boeing documents.  ---  Rick Wartzman in Los Angeles contributed to this article.  Chicago's futures exchanges, beseiged by the federal investigation of alleged fraud on their trading floors, said they are developing tamperproof, hand-held order entry terminals to be used by their floor brokers.  The computerized devices, which won't be available for at least a year, will replace the handwritten trading cards used by brokers on the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  In indictments handed up Aug. 2 that charged 46 brokers and traders with defrauding customers, the government alleged that brokers often changed the size or time of a trade on their paper cards to disguise thievery.  The planned product marks an abrupt strategy shift for the two exchanges.  For years they have resisted prodding from regulators that they install order-recording or time-stamping devices in the pits, saying such a move would hamper the functioning of their markets.  Instead, the exchanges developed a back-office computer auditing system that they say can spot abuses by reconstructing most trades to the nearest minute.  The continuing government investigation, and rapid growth in trading volume in many of their products, apparently forced the exchanges to admit they were fighting a losing battle against tighter regulation.  John Geldermann, Merc chairman, said, "we have reached the outer limits of accountability under the present methods of operating an open outcry auction system."  The exchanges are spending $5 million on the hand-held terminals, and said they were inviting other futures exchanges to join the development project.  The Automated Data Imput Terminals, or Audits, may eventually be combined with the use of stationary broker terminals, the exchanges said.  The exchanges said the hefty development price tag reflected the need to come up with a keyboard that will enable brokers to quickly enter trades, as well as the transmission technology that will enable the terminals to send data to the exchanges' central computers.  A Commodity Futures Trading Commission spokesman said that the federal regulator was pleased with the exchanges' plan, but added, "this is something that conceptually we suggested quite some time ago."  Six hundred of the world's wealthiest and most powerful people are jetting into Morocco this weekend to celebrate publisher Malcolm Forbes's 70th birthday.  From his Tangiers villa, they will see a country that appears to be playing by capitalist rules -- and winning.  Only five years ago, Moroccans rioted for bread during an Islamic League conference in Casablanca.  Now, gross domestic product was up 8% last year, after an estimated 1.5% drop in 1987.  Inflation is resting comfortably at 2.5%, the lowest rate in decades.  And the trade gap fell by $400 million to $1 billion last year, while the government slashed its budget deficit to about 4.5% of GDP.  The credit belongs to the stringent reforms urged on Morocco by the World Bank -- freer trade, devaluation of the dirham, and reduced food subsidies.  But a closer look reveals a society still in danger.  Unemployment runs near 30%.  At $22 billion, the foreign debt is per capita among the most crushing in the world.  Excuses can be made: the dependence of the primitive farming sector on rains rather than irrigation, the economy's vulnerabilities to increases in the cost of oil or the U.S. dollar, and excessive reliance on a short list of export commodities.  And the excuses may even be half-right.  And yet, at the bottom of Morocco's troubles lies a deeper ailment, one pandemic throughout the developing world: the defeat of a true market economy by the concentration of power and wealth in a bloated network of bureaucrats and well-connected families ultimately controlled by the monarch.  Even critics of King Hassan II concede the vast majority of Moroccans respect their king.  But this respect has not assuaged all grievances.  The kingdom suffered a spate of strikes at oil refineries, flour mills and transportation facilities at the beginning of the year.  Students demanding jobs shut half the nation's campuses in the spring.  Meanwhile, Islamic fundamentalism is slowly growing in strength, despite the king's claimed descent from the prophet Mohammed.  There are signs the king senses the danger and that he is moving to liberalize his regime to ward it off.  In May, he published a letter to his prime minister stating that any investment proposal not evaluated within two months would be considered approved.  The following month, he called a conference of community groups to discuss decentralizing the bureaucracy and shifting power to local authorities and grass roots organizations.  Now he is pushing a bill through Parliament that would privatize 700 nationalized industries, many of them highly profitable.  But these bold steps may mean less than they promise, Moroccans and foreign diplomats say.  Decentralization will only strengthen the Ministry of the Interior, through which King Hassan controls the local groups supposedly to be empowered.  The newly privatized companies will probably fall into the hands of the "2,000 families," the only Moroccans wealthy enough to buy them.  Massive reforms of the country's banking system and fledgling stock market would be needed before small investors could share in the bounty, a top European official insists, and they show no signs of being forthcoming.  And yet the king is trapped: If he goes too slowly, social discontent will fester; if he goes too fast, he will threaten the privileged people who are his most loyal constituents.  "All of the pieces for economic growth are there," a senior European development official says.  "But if you look closely at the economy there is only a thin veneer of modernism, covering a deeply traditional society."  Officially, Morocco is "semi-" democratic, with an elected parliament composed of members ranging from conservatives to communists, although elections are thought to be tainted.  But real power rests with the monarch, who exercises his control through a massive bureaucracy and army.  A European diplomat puts it bluntly: "Nothing important or even unimportant is decided without the power of the king and his advisers.  Hassan knows everything that goes on."  Anyone residing in this country for even a few days gets a quick taste of how the system works.  One Western diplomat recalls watching television in a cafe the night King Hassan announced that he would build the world's largest mosque in Casablanca.  The king's call for "voluntary donations" drew hoots and howls of laughter from the cafe's patrons.  But word soon went out from the palace that anyone who chose not to make a voluntary contribution would lose the king's favor.  More than $350 million poured in from unions, student groups and other organizations.  "The Moroccans knew that if they didn't give they could forget sending their children to school, finding a job, or getting anything from the government," a longtime American resident explains.  While critics blame this royalist bureaucracy on the French colonizers, it has its roots in Morocco's feudal history.  Long before the French arrived, desert lords got privileges from the king in exchange for pledges of loyalty.  Brought up to date, this system has helped to preserve Morocco's stability, as King Hassan dispenses gifts and influence to co-opt potential adversaries.  But the costs have been enormous.  In purely economic terms this rejuvenated feudalism has quelched private enterprise and stifled potential investment.  The May order to loosen up notwithstanding, it takes up to two years to get the necessary approval for a new enterprise or investment proposal.  Permits must be obtained from a host of ministries, petty bureaucrats, and royal lackeys.  As a result, new foreign investment in this potentially productive land amounted to $120 million.  Foreigners go to Tunisia instead.  Bureaucratism has profound social implications.  Private initiative has been crippled.  Educated and semi-educated young people without connections are alienated as they realize how difficult it is to start enterprises "without," as they complain, "being a cousin of the king."  One of those despondent young people approached me after a rock concert to boast of his Bob Dylan collection.  Hassan is a laborer and devout Moslem whose dream is to "come to America by plane, by boat, even if it means sleeping in the street."  Why leave Morocco?  "There is nothing for me here.  I cannot get more school, and I do not come from a family that can help me."  Even with the best of intentions, Hassan the king may simply be unable to understand the plight of Hassan the laborer.  "The king is from other era, he was born an absolute ruler, and he has never lived in a democracy," a prominent Moroccan comments.  "His mind may simply not work that way."  ---  Mr. Schwartz reports from the United Nations for the Washington Post.  He visited Morocco in July.  Putting John Sununu and Ted Kennedy to work on a problem is like putting two scorpions in a bottle.  Mr. Sununu, President Bush's chief of staff, is a combative, conservative Republican with a history of ambushing liberal Democrats like Sen. Kennedy.  Yet Mr. Sununu has just finished going head to head with the Massachusetts senator -- and succeeding in negotiating an agreement on landmark legislation giving sweeping new rights to disabled Americans.  Mr. Sununu was typically tough; at one point, he tracked down Sen. Kennedy on a boat for a blunt phone conversation to break a logjam in Senate-White House talks.  Another White House negotiating session ran triple its scheduled length.  In the end Mr. Sununu committed the White House's support to the legislation while winning some concessions to minimize the effects on small business -- and a mutually acceptable bill now is whisking through Congress.  "His role on that {legislation} was really impressive, an impressive tour de force," Sen. Kennedy says.  "Once he got involved, we were able to identify the key issues."  As that encounter suggests, Mr. Sununu, the brainy former New Hampshire governor, has begun thriving in Washington even though his brusque style still rubs some people the wrong way.  His boss, President Bush, is enjoying high public approval, important legislation is moving ahead and Mr. Sununu's relationship with the president is strong.  Inside the administration, aides say Mr. Sununu has grown more relaxed, more willing to delegate responsibility and surprisingly content to play the role of a detached broker in policy debates.  This represents a significant change from the administration's rocky opening months, when some wondered whether the new chief of staff would survive.  Mr. Sununu was pilloried as John Tower's nomination as defense secretary went down in flames, as an ill-advised idea to charge fees on savings and loan deposits blew up in the administration's face and as the process of filling government jobs bogged down.  Many political analysts here believe that Mr. Sununu has moderated his brash style, and that the former governor has adjusted to his White House role.  But the relentlessly self-confident Mr. Sununu claims that it is Washington that has changed -- that the rest of the city has accustomed itself to the deliberate pace that Mr. Bush chose for tackling thorny problems like the savings-and-loan mess, air pollution and arms talks with the Soviets.  "I think this administration takes pains to work hard to make sure the whole is built up of a lot of pieces done in exactly the right way," Mr. Sununu says.  He likens the Bush style to the process of forming a mosaic by carefully putting in place small parts one at a time.  "I hope the good feelings that are out there now are reflective of the fact that people are beginning to appreciate that the pieces are coming together," he says.  Mr. Sununu was a hard-charging governor who ran the New Hampshire statehouse with an iron hand, earning Mr. Bush's trust when he engineered a crucial victory in the 1988 New Hampshire primary.  But despite the initial fears of some in Washington, Mr. Sununu insists, he has carefully avoided using his powerful new post to be a "gatekeeper" who blocks others from the president.  Indeed, cabinet members and other advisers have enjoyed unusually broad access to the president.  Moreover, Mr. Sununu is proving more adept than expected at reining in his personal views and instead brokering compromises among other advisers.  In the last stages of preparing Mr. Bush's mammoth Clean Air Act proposals, for instance, Mr. Sununu called together Environmental Protection Agency chief William Reilly and White House staffers for a marathon meeting to craft a compromise settling a dispute over regulations to cut auto emissions.  Mr. Reilly recalls that in a private chat later, Mr. Sununu, an engineer in his own right, disclosed that he still harbored reservations about one small piece of the bill but had chosen not to push his personal view.  "We're not preparing this legislation for you or for me.  It's for him {Mr.  Bush}," Mr. Sununu explained.  Adds Mr. Reilly: "Contrary to what some people had feared, that he would simply impose his own view because he's a strong man, I don't have the sense that he did that."  Despite such deft internal maneuvering, though, some Democrats and Republicans alike suspect Mr. Sununu, with his combative style, still may be accumulating too many enemies for his own good.  This was particularly evident during the Tower debacle, when Mr. Sununu privately lashed out at Sam Nunn, the powerful chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee who led the fight against Sen. Tower, threatening to sour the administration's relations with this critical lawmaker.  And although the White House chief of staff has toned down since that early encounter, in a recent meeting with GOP House members, Mr. Sununu suggested that Republicans attack a crime package proposed by Democratic Sen. Joseph Biden of Delaware -- chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee -- as "mostly plagiarism," because it allegedly stole ideas from Mr. Bush's plans.  The charge offended Sen. Biden, whose presidential campaign last year collapsed amid charges that he had plagiarized speeches.  The senator was particularly rankled because he carefully backed up his crime plan with a 50-page appendix crediting others with many of the ideas.  Mr. Sununu's charges reportedly led to an acrimonious telephone confrontation between the two men, who refuse to discuss the episode.  But Sen. Biden does say that when Mr. Sununu has "substantive differences" with someone, "the inclination is to respond with personal attacks -- which is bush league, no pun intended.  It surprised me."  Mr. Sununu also rankled some Republican congressional leaders by dressing them down at a recent White House meeting for failing to properly support Mr. Bush's programs.  And a group of conservative supporters was stunned at another meeting when one conservative began raising a concern about personnel issues, only to be cut short by Mr. Sununu, who snapped: "Get your facts straight."  Mr. Sununu suggests that sometimes when he knocks heads he does so because it's part of the job of being the top aide to a president who doesn't like to knock heads himself.  "There are natural obligations that I have to be willing to carry out," he says.  "It goes with the territory."  One group Mr. Sununu has generally succeeded in pleasing is conservatives, who view him as their champion in a generally moderate White House.  Mr. Sununu does appear ready to move in when he thinks conservative principles aren't being followed adequately.  When the Supreme Court rendered its controversial decision curbing abortion rights, for instance, lower-ranking staffers recommended that the White House avoid commenting on the politically explosive decision.  But Mr. Sununu rejected that advice, ordered up a lengthy statement reiterating Mr. Bush's opposition to abortion, then read the statement personally to reporters.  And whatever his relations with others, Mr. Sununu's most important relationship -- the one with President Bush -- appears sturdy.  Mr. Sununu is confident enough, for example, to weigh in on foreign-policy as well as domestic issues.  He acknowledges arguing that Mr. Bush should propose even deeper cuts in U.S. and Soviet conventional forces than those he ultimately proposed this spring.  And Mr. Sununu is comfortable enough with Mr. Bush to pull an occasional practical joke.  The other day, Mr. Sununu and two other advisers were sitting in front of Mr. Bush's desk waiting for the president.  It occurred to Mr. Sununu that the sight of three aides staring at an empty presidential chair was reminiscent of the Doonesbury cartoon strip that lampoons Mr. Bush by portraying him as a transparent wisp of air.  So he had a White House photographer snap a shot of the scene, later inscribed the picture accordingly and gave it to Mr. Bush -- who was so amused he immediately hurried to the White House press room to show it off.  Federal agents arrested the former top officer of Gibraltar Savings' branch here on charges of embezzling $3.4 million from the thrift.  Richard Mariucci, 30 years old, was picked up near his home Tuesday as he was preparing to withdraw funds from several brokerage accounts allegedly set up with stolen money, a Federal Bureau of Investigation spokesman said.  He said Mr. Mariucci faces 29 counts of stealing money from as many as 14 different customers.  Mr. Mariucci couldn't be reached to comment.  He had been with the thrift for about six years and had been manager of the San Francisco branch for about four years.  Gibraltar Savings, a unit of Los Angeles-based Gibraltar Financial Corp., is the nation's ninth-largest thrift with about $13.4 billion of assets.  Gibraltar Savings was forced into receivership by federal regulators in April in a surprise move.  At the time, it was obstensibly solvent, but regulators deemed it effectively bankrupt because some assets were carried at values well above actual market levels.  Gibraltar Financial has sued the regulators over the move.  Gibraltar Savings, meanwhile, has said it will sell about $4.4 billion of mortgage-backed securities in coming months, resulting in losses that will render it officially insolvent.  John Carr, Gibraltar Savings' chief executive officer, said Mr. Mariucci's alleged thievery didn't contribute to the problems that led regulators to seize the thrift.  He said the alleged theft was unearthed by the thrift's internal auditors in April, shortly after Mr. Mariucci had been fired for company-policy violations unrelated to stealing.  Mr. Carr said further investigations by its auditors have turned up additional losses that would raise the totals to about $4.3 million allegedly siphoned from accounts of 35 customers.  He said the thrift has reimbursed all those customers.  The FBI said Mr. Mariucci skimmed money from accounts and used it to buy real estate, securities and racehorses, among other things.  Mr. Carr said Gibraltar Savings has already recovered close to $1 million by selling some of Mr. Mariucci's assets, seized in connection with a civil lawsuit the thrift filed against Mr. Mariucci earlier this year.  He said insurance will cover a "substantial amount" of the thrift's losses from Mr. Mariucci's alleged actions, but couldn't be more specific.  A Tennessee chancery court dismissed a lawsuit against Winners Corp. brought by Renaissance Group Inc., which had sought Winners' shareholders list.  Renaissance, an Atlanta investment concern, had said that it held about 2.5% of Winners common, through a nominee, and that it was therefore entitled to the shareholder list.  But Judge Henry Denmark Bell in Franklin, Tenn., dismissed the suit, saying Renaissance wasn't a shareholder under Tennessee corporate law.  Winners said the ruling clears the way for a special shareholders meeting Friday on the company's agreement to sell its Mrs. Winners restaurant unit to Atlanta-based RTM Inc. for about $30 million in cash plus the assumption of certain lease obligations.  Renaissance opposed the terms of the sale and said it wanted the shareholder list in an attempt to generate support for its position.  Some mildly encouraging economic news helped the stock and bond markets muddle through another sluggish day on a positive note, while the dollar declined slightly.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 5.51 points to 2693.29 in thin trading.  Bond prices climbed moderately higher, and the dollar was narrowly off against the mark and yen.  Government reports that showed housing starts up 0.8% in July and industrial production in the same month rising 0.2% were in line with expectations and confirmed that the economy is in a modest expansion.  The statistics helped account for a flurry of trading in stocks as the market opened that pushed the industrial average briefly above 2700.  But trading volume quickly tailed off and prices slipped to levels where they remained for the rest of the day.  Traders said volume will have to increase from the anemic levels of this week if the industrial average is going to have another shot at breaking its all-time high of 2722.42, set Aug. 25, 1987.  Although stock prices are currently stalled, few traders are predicting a sharp sell-off.  Instead, they note that investors are digesting the sharp gains posted in previous weeks and that further gains are likely in coming weeks, barring any economic surprises.  Bond traders said prices continued to recover from a sharp decline Monday.  That sell-off was in reaction to the rebounding economy, which is taking pressure off the Federal Reserve to lower interest rates further.  But traders said the retreat was an overreaction and prices now are more reflective of a continuation of current Fed policy.  Currency traders are focusing on today's release of the June merchandise trade balance for clues to which way the dollar is likely to move in the short run.  Although traders are expecting U.S. interest rates to rise modestly in coming weeks, which would be bullish for the dollar, a surprisingly large trade deficit could undercut that bullish sentiment.  In major market activity:  Stock prices were up in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 150.1 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners 819 to 662.  Bond prices rose.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond gained more than half a point, or over $5 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the issue slipped to 8.10%.  The dollar was only marginally lower.  In late New York trading, the currency was quoted at 1.9408 marks and 142.10 yen, compared with 1.9430 marks and 142.20 yen Tuesday.  Despite steady declines in yields during the past four months, investors continue to pour billions of dollars into money-market mutual funds.  For now, at least, they're getting a pretty good deal.  Money-fund yields, on average, are still almost two full percentage points above money-market accounts at banks and thrifts and almost a percentage point higher than most certificates of deposit.  They're also ahead of Treasury bills.  But that doesn't mean that they'll always be the best investment.  "Don't look at them as a lifetime commitment," says Edward D. McCarthy, a Providence, R.I., financial planner.  "A lot of people put their money in and then sit there and watch the rates go down."  People certainly have been putting money in -- more than $1 billion in the latest week, alone.  Assets of the 387 funds tracked by Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass., newsletter, now stand at a record $332.3 billion.  William E. Donoghue, publisher of the publication, says assets could double in the next two years.  That's largely because yields are comfortably ahead of most comparable investments.  The latest seven-day compound yield, which assumes reinvestment of dividends, averages 8.68%, according to Donoghue's, with the top funds yielding well over 9%.  That compares with an average 7.01% on bank money-market accounts and 7.92% on six-month CDs, as reported by Banxquote Money Markets, a New York information service.  Six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction yielded 8.26%.  "People are looking for the best rate that's out there," says Susanne Mahoney, vice president, marketing, at giant Fidelity Investments.  Fidelity's Spartan Fund has been among the top performers since it was launched last January.  Ms. Mahoney says Fidelity's own research indicates that much of the $125 million or so flowing into the Spartan Fund each week is coming from bank accounts.  "As CDs have matured, people haven't wanted to roll over at lower rates," she says.  Interest rates in general have fallen about a percentage point since the spring, although there have been some small increases in the last week as reports have indicated that the economy may not be weak enough for the Federal Reserve to ease credit further.  Money-fund managers can prop up yields by varying the maturities of their investments -- Treasury securities, certificates of deposit and commercial paper, or short-term corporate IOUs, for the most part.  Maturities tend to lengthen as rates decline, to take advantage of higher rates for as long as possible, just as they shorten as rates rise to grab higher rates as soon as possible.  The average maturity of the funds tracked by Donoghue's was 40 days for the week ended Tuesday.  That's down from 41 days last week and 42 days the week before, but average maturity was as short as 29 days at the start of the year as rates climbed.  The shorter maturities of the past two weeks are "an indication that portfolio managers and analysts now feel that rates are going to go down gradually and slowly," says Susan Cook, editor of Money Fund Report.  She adds that money-fund yields probably will decline a few hundredths of a percentage point each week for the next month or so.  The seven-day averages for the latest week were unchanged from the prior week.  (The average seven-day simple yield remained unchanged at 8.33%.  The average 30-day compound yield was 8.81% in the week ended Tuesday, down from 8.90%, and the average 30-day simple yield fell to 8.45% from 8.53%.)  At Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar Money Market Fund, Joseph DiMartino, portfolio manager and president of Dreyfus Corp., is keeping maturities short because short-term investments are currently the highest-yielding segment of the market.  The fund's average maturity currently is 27 days.  "You have to give up yield to go long," he says, noting that the 30-year Treasury bond currently is yielding just about 8.10%.  Some fund managers also absorb all or part of the fund's expenses, either as a regular policy or to make a new fund more attractive.  Fidelity, for example, currently is deducting only 0.10 of a percentage point to cover Spartan's expenses and has pledged that expenses won't go over 0.45% at least until May 7, 1992.  Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar, which also began operations early this year, currently is waiving all expenses and says it will continue to do so at least until the fund's assets reach $3 billion, or Oct. 2, 1989, when it will consider a further extension.  The average fund's expense ratio, or annual expenses as a percentage of assets, is about 0.75%.  That means a fund earning 10% in interest from its securities would deliver a yield to investors of 9.25%.  There's some disagreement among economists about which way interest rates are headed from here.  Some predict rates will decline steadily; others predict a bump upwards and then a decline and still others forecast an increase.  Such an uncertain outlook can make money funds more attractive.  "They allow an investor to make a decision without making a lot of other decisions," says Gerald M. Cole, executive vice president and managing director of Kemper Financial Services.  Money funds can appear to be more attractive than other income-oriented investments when interest rates are falling because money-fund yields decline more slowly.  But if interest rates continue to fall, investors who stick with the funds may regret having failed to lock in longer-term returns when yields were higher.  As attractive as current money-fund yields are, investors could have locked in a full percentage point more by switching to a one-year CD in late April.  Some institutional investors have been taking advantage of the recent increase in rates by switching out of funds and into Treasurys and other money-market investments.  While assets of general-purpose money funds, those aimed at individuals, rose $2.5 billion in the latest week, according to Donoghue's, assets of funds open only to institutions declined $1.1 billion.  Some professional money managers are reluctant to take a position on interest rates.  "With the volatility we have right now, it's really a question of day-to-day monitoring," says Michael D. Hirsch, senior vice president and chief investment officer for Republic National Bank in New York.  ---  @ Money-Fund Yields  @ (Week ended Aug. 15)  @ 7-Day 7-Day  @ Compound Simple  @Fund/Assets Yield Yield  @Harbor Money Market Fund*  @$44.4 million 10.55% 10.04%  @Dreyfus Worldwide Dollar**  @$2.5 billion 9.65 9.22  @Fidelity Spartan**  @$3.4 billion 9.53 9.11  @Alger Money Market Portfolio**  @$58.8 million 9.42 9.01  @Vanguard MMR Prime  @$10.0 billion 9.21 8.82  @AVERAGE TAXABLE FUND 8.68% 8.33%  *Yield includes capital gains, fluctuates widely from week to week  **Fund manager absorbing part or all of expenses  @Source: Donoghue's Money Fund Report  Ken Heebner, known for picking winners, has picked Texas Air Corp.  A widely respected portfolio manager for Boston-based Loomis, Sayles & Co., Mr. Heebner has accumulated a 12.6% stake in the troubled airline company, or about 5.3 million of the roughly 41 million common shares Texas Air has outstanding.  The $3.65 billion leveraged buy-out of NWA Inc. and the $5.4 billion bid for UAL Corp. show that airline stocks might be good to own right now.  But those two companies have airline units with strong earnings and heavy traffic.  Texas Air had a second-quarter loss of $109.3 million even after a $250 million gain.  "I think this is a cheap stock," Mr. Heebner said, adding that he also believes that the troubles at Texas Air's Continental and Eastern airline units are over.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Texas Air closed at $17.875 a share, down 12.5 cents.  Continental, Mr. Heebner said, has worked through the service problems that came from absorbing People Express and that drove high-yield business travelers away.  "Service is better.  And I think in time the yield will go up substantially," he said.  Mr. Heebner said Eastern "will emerge as a profitable, viable carrier with much lower costs."  Eastern has been rebuilding its operations after a strike begun in March grounded flights and forced it into Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Mr. Heebner manages about $2.5 billion of assets and, except for a somewhat disastrous 1988, does so very well.  David Sylvester, an analyst with Kidder, Peabody & Co., said, "Ken's long-term track record is just terrific.  He's got an excellent reputation for discerning the next phoenix."  Tom Longman, an analyst at Bear, Stearns & Co., isn't so sure that Mr. Heebner is right about Texas Air.  "I'd like to see a little more evidence" that Continental and Eastern have turned the corner, Mr. Longman said.  He added that the industry as a whole is beginning to show some softening, which wouldn't bode well for the Texas Air carriers.  Money Market Deposits-a 6.25%  Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.05%  Six-month Certificates-a 8.03%  One-year Certificates-a 8.01%  Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.93%  Five-Year Certificates-a 7.92%  U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  The Securities and Exchange Commission adopted regulations it hopes will cripple fraudulent penny-stock operations by making it impossible to close sales of such stock over the phone.  Under the new rules, when selling low-priced stocks that aren't listed on an exchange or by the National Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotations system, brokers will have to obtain a written sales agreement from any buyer who isn't a regular customer.  Brokers also will have to get information about a buyer's investment experience and financial condition.  Penny stocks are thinly traded high-risk issues often selling for less than a dollar a share in the over-the-counter market.  The regulations are aimed at shutting down so-called boiler room penny-stock operations, which often use high-pressure telephone sales pitches to push stocks that prove worthless soon after the sale.  The rules mean brokers can no longer make a legally binding sale of such stock over the phone.  In other action, the SEC proposed to sharply increase minimum capital levels for brokers, which haven't been changed since the mid-1970s.  The proposal is partly in response to concerns about the stability of brokerages in the wake of the October 1987 market crash.  The rules will likely stir opposition from some smaller brokerages, but many brokers already meet the proposed requirements, which would be phased in over four years.  John Baldwin, president of the North American Securities Administrators Association, said unwary investors lose several hundred million dollars a year to fraudulent penny-stock operations.  "The rules are to be applauded since they put new obstacles in the path of the penny-stock firms that use the telephone as a weapon to mug unsuspecting investors," Mr. Baldwin said.  David Ruder, SEC chairman, said the regulations would be an effective "weapon against this scurrilous conduct" but wouldn't crimp the ability of small companies to raise capital.  The rules, proposed six months ago, have generated tremendous concern from brokerage firms worried about the effects on small-stock issuers.  Only stock selling for less than $5 a share and issued by companies with less than $2 million in net tangible assets will fall under the regulations.  In addition, the rules don't apply to customers who had three or more transactions in different penny stocks in the past year, or to customers who opened an account or bought stock through the broker more than a year before the sale of the penny stock.  Commissioner Joseph Grundfest voted for the regulations but argued that the SEC should focus more on quickly closing down fraudulent penny-stock operations through enforcement actions.  "I hope this works a heck of a lot better than I think it will," he said.  Brokers who don't obtain the sales agreements "will not be the worst thing we find in these operations."  "But it may be the easiest to prove," responded Richard Ketchum, director of the SEC's division of market regulation.  Joseph Goldstein, an SEC enforcement official who directs an agency task force formed in October to combat penny-stock fraud, said, "This will help the enforcement division develop cases more quickly."  In response to broker concerns, the SEC changed its original proposal so that brokers can take the information about a customer's financial affairs and investment experience over the phone.  But brokers still must make a determination about the "suitability" of a given investment for the customer.  The proposed capital rules would increase to $250,000 from $25,000 the minimum capital that must be held by firms that clear transactions and also hold customer funds and securities.  Clearing firms that don't hold customer funds or securities would have to keep $100,000 in capital, up from $25,000.  The maximum capital that market makers would be required to keep would increase to $1 million from $100,000.  The level depends on the number and value of stocks in which the broker is a market maker.  Many such firms already hold hundreds of millions of dollars in capital.  The SEC said that of about 530 clearing firms, about 170 already meet the proposed requirement.  The others would have to raise a total of about $21 million to meet the higher levels.  Some small brokerages that take orders but don't clear accounts would have to meet a minimum level of $100,000 -- depending on whether they also hold customer funds or stock -- an increase from $5,000.  There are about 2,200 such firms, but it's unclear how many firms would have to meet the $100,000 level or how much those firms would have to raise.  It's those firms, however, that are most likely to oppose the provisions.  "I think a number of smaller firms are going to be vocal in their opposition to these increases," said Joseph Hardiman, president of the National Association of Securities Dealers, which supports the increases.  "The capital levels now aren't sufficient to match the exposure or the fiduciary responsibilities these firms have," said John Pinto, the NASD's executive vice president of compliance.  "There's not much cushion to handle blips in the market or changes in earnings."  During and after the 1987 crash three small broker-dealers had to cease operations and one had to be liquidated.  Capital helps prevent customer funds from being frozen and, in the case of a liquidation, lessens the losses to the insurance fund that backs investors.  GENERIC DRUG inquiry draws few consumer complaints, but confusion exists.  Pharmacists and drug chains report little customer reaction to the House probe of improperly won approvals for two generic versions of Dyazide, a brand-name blood pressure drug.  "Some people are asking about generics not being up to standards" but the public "is generally uninformed," says Vons Cos.  Even the government is in the dark on what exactly is in some of the nation's generic pills and capsules, as evidenced by its launch of a major field test of the most heavily used generics.  The only two makers of a Dyazide generic -- Vitarine Pharmaceuticals and Bolar Pharmaceutical -- are among those questioned.  Vitarine recalled its version and Bolar denies any wrongdoing.  A generic for another brand-name blood pressure drug was recalled by Par Pharmaceuticals.  "There are more drug recalls than you might think -- one or two a week," ranging from minor mislabelings to the current "cheating," says Arthur Kibbe, an American Pharmaceutical Association official.  Walgreen and Perry drug stores are among those that switched to the Bolar product in order to stock a generic Dyazide.  But the final drug decision is a joint one by doctor, pharmacist and patient.  Adding to the generic confusion is a large layer of drug marketers, says the FDA's Jeff Nesbit.  For the top 30 branded drugs with generic equivalents, there are about 2,000 marketers, Mr. Nesbit says.  BUG SUCKER: Yes, that's what it's called and that's what it does.  The new gizmo -- named and tested by Remington Products Inc. CEO Victor Kiam -- vacuums roaches, moths, flies, etc. into a disposable cartridge so the squeamish don't have to squish them.  Pricey Hammacher Schlemmer, which sells the device as an "insect disposal system," says it met with "almost immediate popularity."  But that could change when the Bug Sucker appears in retail stores next month with a price tag $10 to $20 lower than the catalog's $49.95 (includes shipping).  Extra bug disposal cartridges are $5 each.  An outsider's idea, the Bug Sucker cost about $150,000-$200,000 to research, design and test market -- well below the typical $1.5 to $2 million Remington spends on an intricate shaver.  That's partly because research easily focused on womankind's "particular aversion" to bugs, Mr. Kiam notes.  Summoned by his own wife to remove a large, agile fly from the bathroom, Mr. Kiam admits to a frustrating time even with a Bug Sucker (all the mirrors didn't help).  "It finally lit on the door and I got him."  LATIN EXECUTIVES are more creative computer users than U.S. counterparts.  Stanford Business School research finds that top executives in Brazil and Mexico tend to use computers for planning and analysis, tackling broad problems arising from their unstable economies.  But U.S. chairmen and CEOs are more often involved in bean counting, such as scanning current data to see if the sales force is meeting its objective.  One theory: Computers enter the U.S. firm at the lower ranks while the top executives in underdeveloped countries are first users.  Jeffrey H. Moore, assistant dean for computing, notes much more data exists in the U.S., tempting executives to browse.  The study also found that 20%-25% of the U.S. businessmen use their computers for simple word-processing and electronic mailing.  "That's even more surprising because they have a secretary sitting outside," he says.  Confidentiality is often the reason top U.S. executives do the job personally.  MOTORISTS MOAN about the "other guy" but rank their own driving skills high, says a Valvoline Oil Co. survey.  Some 37% found their own driving to be "excellent," while only 2% felt other drivers are as adept.  Top complaint is tailgating.  ABOUT $3.52 A COPY. That's what the average annual report cost in fiscal 1988, says Padilla Speer Beardsley Inc.  The survey included a new $1 bill, which "helped immeasurably" in getting the 300 companies to respond.  MAYORS WANT local companies to behave ethically, show environmental concern and treat customers well more than they want their charitable donations, says a survey of 100 cities by Sirota, Alper & Pfau.  "DRY" AND HIGH sales go together in the beer industry so far.  But is it a fad?  Led by Anheuser-Busch's Michelob Dry, the "less sweet" one-year-old brews are bubbling in an otherwise flat (literally) market.  Despite the lift, total industrywide sales through June suggest 1989 probably won't match last year's 187.5 million barrels, says Beer Marketer's Insights.  G. Heileman Brewing offers several dry beers as do regional brewers.  Among the big brewers, Miller, Coors and Stroh's hold back.  "It's a little early to say if {dry beer} is going to be a very big segment or if it's a specialty," says Marc Cohen, analyst with Sanford C. Bernstein & Co. Even the most optimistic outlook gives dry beer only 1%2% of the market this year -- down quite a bit from some other rosier early forecasts.  Meanwhile, hefty sales of dry beer in Japan appear to be waning.  Michelob Dry has 132 calories to Michelob Light's 133.  Michelob has 156.  BRIEFS: Listed under beverages on the menu at Bakey's Restaurant in Beantown: "Boston tap water (if you dare) free" . . .  Ocean City, N.J., holds a suntan contest today for miscellaneous body parts -- "within the bounds of propriety."  Falling interest rates lifted stocks slightly.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average closed 5.51 points higher at 2693.29.  Some 150,060,000 shares traded -- the highest this week -- compared with 148,770,000 Tuesday.  Advancers on the New York Stock Exchange outpaced decliners, 819 to 662.  The industrial average burst above the 2700 level in the morning in heavy trading after economic reports showed moderate expansion of the U.S. economy.  Industrial production rose 0.2% in July and the factory operating rate stayed unchanged, while housing starts went up 0.8%.  Bond prices remained higher after the reports and yields continued to edge lower throughout the day.  With that data in hand, investors observed that the Federal Reserve has been able to slow the economy without producing a recession so far.  Today, eyes will be on the U.S. merchandise trade balance for June.  Institutional investors continued to buy cyclical stocks, with auto shares in favor again yesterday.  Ford rose 5/8 to 51 5/8 and General Motors gained 1/4 to 45 3/4.  Also, takeover speculation inflated several stocks.  Fruit of the Loom rose 1 5/8 to 14 3/4 on takeover rumors.  Heavy volume was also seen in the September call options on the stock -- a bet that the stock is going higher.  Tultex, another textile stock, gained 2 to 12 1/4, and was the largest gainer in percentage terms on the Big Board.  The rise in the stock was also attributed by analysts to takeover speculation.  The Bass Brothers were rumored to have launched a trading strategy in the market yesterday, traders said, that involved selling stock short against purchases of call options in the same stocks.  The strategy is a bet on the market dropping, with the call options providing a hedge against an abrupt rise in the stocks.  Pitney-Bowes and Dow Chemical were two stocks involved in the strategy, traders said. (In a short sale, investors borrow stock to sell with the hope of buying it back at a cheaper price.) Among broader averages, Standard & Poor's 500-stock index gained 0.95 to 345.66, and the New York Stock Exchange composite index rose 0.56 to 192.64.  Integrated Resources was the largest loser on the Big Board in percentage terms, falling 7/8 to 2.  The company announced a restructuring this week that involves asset sales.  Tiffany & Co. added 1 to 51 1/2.  The stock rose 3 Tuesday following a strong earnings report.  Intel dropped 1 3/8 to 28 7/8 on the over-the-counter market.  The company told analysts its third-quarter earnings per share will be unchanged from or slightly below the second quarter's 53 cents.  Analysts had forecast higher per-share earnings.  Among semiconductor stocks traded on the Big Board, Texas Instruments dropped 1/4 to 38 3/8, Motorola slipped 5/8 to 57 1/8, Advanced Micro Devices dropped 1/8 to 8 1/2 and Analog Devices eased 1/4 to 10 3/8.  International Business Machines fell 3/4 to 115 1/2, and other computer stocks also ran into selling.  Compaq Computer lost 1 7/8 to 92, Cray Research dropped 3/4 to 44 1/2 and Unisys eased 1/8 to 21 3/4 on the Big Board; Class B stock of Wang Laboratories, which suspended its principal and interest payments on certain debt pending the outcome of debt restructuring talks, lost 1/2 to 6 on the American Stock Exchange.  Computer Associates International, which issued a disappointing earnings forecast last week, slid 7/8 to 15 1/2 as 2.2 million shares changed hands in Big Board composite trading.  Another active computer stock, Tandem Computers, proved an exception to the rule by rising 1 1/8 to 23 1/4 on 1.5 million shares.  Other advancers besides GM among the 30 stocks in the Dow industrials included Philip Morris, which went up 7/8 to 158 1/2; Coca-Cola Co., up 3/4 to 66 7/8; Woolworth, up 1 3/8 to 63 1/2; Aluminum Co. of America, up 7/8 to 73 1/8, and American Telephone & Telegraph, up 3/8 to 39 1/8 on 1.4 million shares.  Pfizer rose 1 1/4 to 66 3/8 after Cowen & Co. repeated its buy recommendation on the stock.  Elsewhere in the drug sector, Rorer Group went up 1/2 to 44 5/8, Eli Lilly climbed 1 to 62 1/4, Upjohn gained 3/4 to 37 5/8, Bausch & Lomb rose 1 1/2 to 59 1/2 and Bolar Pharmaceutical firmed 1 to 24 1/2.  Trading in Bolar was halted just before the close amid indications that the Food and Drug Administration had cleared the company of charges related to the testing of Dyazide, its generic version of a blood-pressure drug.  Hilton Hotels fell 1 7/8 to 106 1/8.  All Nippon Airways and Japan Air Lines, thought to be potential bidders for the company, denied rumors that they have been holding talks with Hilton.  Fischbach plummeted 6 3/4 to 18 3/4.  The company said financing had fallen through for a $29.835-a-share takeover offer from a group led by British investor Asher DeVere.  Pansophic Systems gained 1 5/8 to 15 5/8.  Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette boosted its rating on the stock and added it to the firm's list of recommended issues.  Interpublic Group went up 1 1/2 to 36 1/2.  Its board approved the purchase of one million common shares, or about 3% of its shares outstanding, under an ongoing buy-back program.  Federal National Mortgage Association rose 2 to 98 1/4.  The spread between the yields on Fannie Mae's mortgage assets and its debt costs, a key measure of its profitability, widened in July after contracting slightly in June.  IBP added 3/4 to 15 7/8.  Prudential-Bache Securities increased its short-term investment rating on the stock and said it sees the stock rising to more than $20 a share in the next 12 to 18 months.  The American Stock Exchange Index fell 0.22 to 379.60.  Volume totaled 15,220,000 shares.  Tandy Brands tumbled 5 to 20 3/4 in the wake of its board's decision against selling the company, which was based on the interest from potential bidders and other factors.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Student Loan Marketing Association -- $250 million of floating-rate notes, due Aug. 24, 1992, priced at par to float 72 basis points above the when-issued three-month Treasury bill.  The rate on the notes will be reset weekly beginning Monday after the T-bill auction.  Interest will be paid quarterly.  The notes are noncallable.  First Boston Corp. is underwriting the offering.  @ MUNICIPALS  South Dakota Student Loan Corp. -- $290 million of student loan revenue bonds, Series 1989-B and 1989-C, due 1990-2000, 2003 and 2006, tentatively priced by a Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. group to yield from 6.70% in 1990 to 7.73% in 2006.  Serial bonds are priced at par to yield from 6.70% in 1990 to 7.45% in 2000.  There are $7.75 million of 7.60% term bonds due 2003 priced at par and $111.8 million of 7 5/8% term bonds due 2006 priced at 99 to yield 7.73%.  Interest on the bonds will be treated as a preference item in caculating the federal alternative minimum tax.  The underwriter expects a single-A rating from Standard & Poor's Corp.  City of Chicago -- $292.8 million Chicago-O'Hare International Airport special facility revenue 7 7/8% refunding bonds, (American Airlines Inc. Project), Series 1989, tentatively priced by a Smith Barney group.  The bonds, all due Dec. 1, 2024, are priced at 99 to yield 7.985%.  The bonds are rated single-A-2/single-A, according to the lead underwriter.  Alabama -- $123.7 million of general obligation refunding bonds, 1989 Series, all capital appreciation bonds due 2000-2007, tentatively priced by a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group to yield from 6.90% in 2000 to 7.10% in 2004-2007.  The underwriter expects double-A/double-A ratings.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $100 million of 17% debentures due Aug. 23, 1991, priced at 115.643 to yield 8.346%.  The debentures were priced at a yield spread 15 basis points above the two-year Treasury note.  The noncallable issue is being underwriten by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  @ EUROBONDS  New Zealand (sovereign) -- $500 million of 9% Eurobonds due Aug. 30, 1994, priced at 99.75 to yield 9.16% after fees, via Morgan Stanley International.  Fees 3/8.  LB Schleswig-Holstein Finance B.V. (West German parent) -- 75 million Canadian dollars of 10 3/8% Eurobonds due Sept. 13, 1994, priced at 101 5/8 to yield 10.44% less fees, via Mitsubishi Finance International.  Guaranteed by Landesbank Schleswig-Holstein Girozentrale (Luxembourg Branch).  Fees 1 7/8.  UBS Finance N.V. (Swiss parent) -- C$150 million of 10% Eurobonds due Sept. 12, 1994, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 10.10% less fees, via UBS Philips & Drew.  Fees 1 7/8.  Oce-van der Grinten (Netherlands) -- 50 million Swiss francs of 5 3/4% privately placed notes due Sept. 11, 1992, priced at 100 1/2 to yield 5.56% via Credit Suisse.  Democrats chose a former president of the Florida Bar Association to face a Cuban-born educator in the race to fill the House seat vacated by the death of Rep. Claude Pepper.  Gerald Richman captured 61% of the votes in Tuesday's Democratic primary, defeating former Miami City Commissioner Rosario Kennedy in the battle for the seat Mr. Pepper held for 27 years.  Mr. Pepper, who became known as a leading spokesman for the nation's senior citizens, died May 30 at age 88.  Mr. Richman's opponent in the Aug. 29 runoff will be state Sen. Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, whose campaign is being run by Jeb Bush, one of President Bush's sons.  President Bush made an appearance on her behalf yesterday before flying to Maine to begin his vacation.  Each side in the ethnically charged campaign has accused the other of being divisive.  The campaign is being waged in the district that includes Miami and has the highest percentage of Cuban-born voters in the U.S.  Vintage Enterprises Inc., reporting a first-quarter loss of $779,000, said it was considering seeking relief under the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  Acknowledging difficulties in its cash position, the Atlanta-based maker of mobile homes said the company wasn't able to pay $45,000 in interest due June 30 on a bank loan.  Some suppliers also have cut back credit terms, the company said.  Besides considering a bankruptcy filing, the company said it may further limit production at a North Carolina plant, or even temporarily close the facility.  The company also is trying to sell another closed plant and find a buyer willing to lease back a third factory to the company.  Vintage said cash problems resulted from the losses and publicity surrounding a $520,000 damage award from an Alabama suit by a mobile-home buyer for misrepresentation and faulty workmanship.  The company said it will petition the U.S. Supreme Court by the end of the month in connection with the judgment.  In the first quarter, ended July 1, the loss compared with earnings of $36,000, or two cents a share, in the year-ago quarter.  Revenue totaled $6.1 million, down 38% from $10.1 million in the 1988 quarter.  In American Stock Exchange trading, Vintage closed at 37.5 cents, off 6.25 cents.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Electronic Data Technologies, offering of 1,083,478 common shares by certain holders, including International Game Technology, which will sell one million shares, reducing its stake to about 50% from 77%.  Only 40,000 new shares will be issued in the offering, and Electronic Data won't receive any proceeds.  Raymond James & Associates Inc. will serve as managing underwriter of the offering.  Joy Technologies Inc., offering of $120 million of resettable senior secured notes, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Safety-Kleen Corp., shelf offering of up to $200 million of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale, via William Blair & Co. and Salomon Brothers Inc.  The Chinese government ordered five state companies, including one linked to senior leader Deng Xiaoping's son, to pay millions of dollars in fines for illegal activities, official reports said.  In addition, major newspapers urged state employees who engaged in embezzling, bribery and speculation to turn themselves in.  Those who surrender before Oct. 31 will receive lighter sentences, according to an anti-corruption plan adopted by the Chinese Communist Party Politburo.  The moves are the latest in a government anti-corruption campaign launched to counter charges of official corruption.  An end to such corruption was a main demand of the pro-democracy movement that was crushed June 3-4.  The state Auditing Administration, after a 10-month audit, ordered five companies to pay a total of $13.8 million in back taxes, penalties and restitution of illegally earned profits, Auditor-General Lu Peijian said in a report to the State Council, China's cabinet.  The official Xinhua news agency said the companies include two closed last month as part of the anti-corruption drive -- Kanghua Development Corp., linked to Mr. Deng's son, and China Incomic Development Corp.  The other audited companies were China International Trust & Investment Corp., the nation's leading company for attracting foreign investment; Everbright Industrial Co., which has subsidiaries in Hong Kong, and China Rural Trust & Investment Corp. i3  Wednesday, August 16, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.825% 30 to 43 days; 8.50% 44 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.90% 30 days; 8.78% 60 days; 8.68% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.25% one month; 8.15% two months; 8.10% three months; 8% six months; 7.92% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.65% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.80% 30 days; 8.67% 60 days; 8.52% 90 days; 8.42% 120 days; 8.35% 150 days; 8.27% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9 1/16% to 8 15/16% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9 1/16% one month; 8 15/16% three months; 8 7/8% six months; 8 3/4% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 14, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.01% 13 weeks; 7.83% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.12%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.04%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.23%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  TELEVISION: "Inside Edition," the tabloid news show syndicated by King World Productions, was renewed in New York.  Sources said it will move to 9 a.m. weekdays, starting Labor Day, from 2:30 a.m. in New York.  Neco Enterprises Inc. said it invested $20.5 million in real estate owned by its new chairman and chief executive officer, David F. LaRoche.  The investments had been opposed by Neco's former chairman, Richard B. Sheffield, who resigned in March partly because of disagreements with Mr. LaRoche about his plans for the Providence, R.I., utility holding company.  Neco said the LaRoche assets it purchased were a Richmond, R.I., trailer park and a "sizable" stake in Vermont's Quechee real estate development.  Richard Hayes, Neco's treasurer, said Neco's board "looked at the purchases in detail and exercised a lot of due diligence" before making them.  Mr. LaRoche didn't return calls after multiple attempts to reach him yesterday.  General Electric Co. said it signed a $165 million turnkey contract with Teco Power Services Corp. for the construction and supply of a 295 megawatt electric power plant.  The Hardee Power Station, to be built in Hardee County, Fla., and finished by November 1992, will primarily provide back-up power to Seminole Electric Coop Inc. and supply electricity to Tampa Electric.  Fairfield, Conn.-based GE, which will have responsibility for the project through its completion, will join with Metric Constructors Inc. of Charlotte, N.C., a member of Jones Group, to build the plant.  The Hardee Power Station will be the first wholesale power facility owned by Teco Power Services, which was formed recently to develop and operate cogeneration and independent power plants.  Teco Power Services is a unit of Teco Energy Inc., a holding company for Tampa Electric and other companies.  The Transportation Department stepped up its investigation into whether 1982-1984 Nissan Motor Co. cars have seat defects.  The department's National Highway Traffic Safety Administration upgraded its inquiry from a low-level "preliminary evaluation" to an "engineering analysis," which can lead to a formal investigation and a forced recall.  Federal safety officials said a possible defect in Nissan cars may cause seats to collapse backward without warning.  The officials said about 1.5 million cars may be affected.  The Transportation Department has received 96 complaints about the alleged problem, with 22 accidents and 13 injuries reported.  A Nissan spokesman said the company "maintains there's nothing wrong with the seats" but is cooperating with the government investigation.  Samuel Cole, a spokesman for the Center for Auto Safety, a Washington-based consumer group, said the cars should be recalled immediately.  Mr. Cole said the alleged defect "endangers the lives of all owners of Nissans, and an engineering analysis doesn't mean that anything will necessarily be done."  President Bush plans to make a television address Sept. 5 to discuss his anti-drug abuse strategy, the White House said.  White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater told reporters traveling here with the president that the exact time and location of the address haven't been decided.  But Mr. Fitzwater said that the urgency of the nation's drug-abuse problems persuaded the president to make such a high-profile address.  On Tuesday, President Bush received details of the anti-drug abuse strategy developed by William Bennett, director of drug policy.  Earlier this week, Mr. Bush also held meetings to elicit the views of representatives of law enforcement agencies, drug-abuse prevention activists and experts in rehabilitation.  Managers of specialty retailer Parisian Inc. agreed to pay an estimated $30 million to $40 million plus the assumption of $220 million in debt for the two-thirds stake in Parisian owned by Australian property developer Hooker Corp.  Those close to the transaction valued the total package, which also releases Hooker from various obligations to Parisian, as worth upwards of $100 million to Hooker.  As part of the sale, Parisian has agreed to open a new store this fall in Hooker's Richland Fashion Mall in Columbia, S.C., and to continue providing computer services for Bonwit Teller and B. Altman, Hooker's two U.S. retail chains.  Parisian, based in Birmingham, Ala., went private in an April 1988 leveraged buy-out by Hooker and Parisian's management valued at about $250 million.  Hooker invested $66 million in cash at that time.  Yesterday's definitive agreement caps nearly seven weeks of negotiations and reflects Parisian management's concern that vendors are associating Parisian with the cash flow problems affecting Hooker's other U.S. ventures.  Hooker rejected a $20 million cash offer made at the end of July, but talks continued on an informal basis.  "It has been a long process and an unfortunate conclusion to a transaction that we thought would work well for both parties," said Donald Hess, president and chief executive officer of Parisian.  "Although we must wait for court approval, it will give us immediate control of our board as well as providing comfort to all of Parisian's vendors."  Mr. Hess said he was advised in the talks by Ocean Capital Corp., a New York investment banking company, and that AmSouth Bank, based in Birmingham, will provide the majority of the funding for the purchase of Hooker's stake.  Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive of L.J. Hooker, the U.S. unit of Hooker Corp. that filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy law protection last week, said in a statement that the sale was in the best interests of all concerned and that he considered the price fair.  Gilbert Harrison, chairman of Financo Inc., who represented Hooker in the transaction, said, "The value of Parisian would have been hurt in the long run if the sale wasn't concluded quickly."  The sale of the Parisian stake is subject to approval by the bankruptcy court.  Hooker Corp. has invested more than $1 billion in the U.S. since January 1986 in various retail chains, commercial properties and shopping malls.  However, disappointing U.S. retail sales, together with a sharp increase in Australian interest rates and a downturn in the Australian economy, created overwhelming cash flow problems.  As of March 31, Hooker Corp. had 1.9 billion Australian dollars (US$1.44 billion) in liabilities.  Floor trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange was halted for almost three hours yesterday because of a computer "hardware" failure.  During the breakdown, from 9:41 a.m. to 12:31 p.m. EDT, brokers directed many orders to the rival Montreal Exchange and some to U.S. exchanges.  Trading also continued through the Toronto exchange's Computer Automated Trading System, which electronically matches buy and sell orders for a limited number of stocks.  Fred Ketchen, vice president of equity trading at ScotiaMcleod Inc., said the breakdown was only an "inconvenience" because more than 80% of Toronto-listed stocks can be traded through those alternatives.  The exchange said "multiple failure within a disk-drive subsystem" knocked out the computer system that serves floor traders and also shut down its backup system.  A spokeswoman said it was the first time both systems have failed simultaneously.  Because of the shift in orders, volume on the Montreal Exchange rose to 14.3 million shares from 7.1 million Tuesday.  Toronto's volume fell to 21.6 million shares from 32.6 million.  Tokyo stocks, helped by arbitrage and index-related buying programs, closed higher, sending the Nikkei index above the 35000 level for the first time.  London share prices rallied strongly as a reluctance to sell stock, renewed speculative interest, and a firm lead on Wall Street persuaded the market that further gains could be in store.  In Tokyo, the Nikkei average of 225 issues, which gained 139.07 points Tuesday, added another 273.46 points to close at 35084.15, breaking the record set July 31 of 34953.87 points.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index rose 106.23 points to 35190.38.  On Wednesday, traders said optimism about gains in the futures market buoyed cash stocks, as did recent reports of brighter earnings outlooks for many corporations.  But some analysts remained cool, pointing out that the advance mainly resulted from program buying activity led by dealers trading for their own accounts.  Investor participation increased moderately compared with earlier this week as the "obon" summer holidays drew to an end, traders said.  But the increase wasn't enough to activate the market.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 550 million shares, up slightly from 415.4 million shares Tuesday.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 621 to 258, while 205 issues remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 0.36 points Tuesday, was up 17.28 points at 2650.61.  Brokers said the market was going through a technical correction because investors are cautious about the market's high-pitched advance in July.  The Nikkei surged 1,600 points, or 4.8%, between July 18 and July 31, much more than the 1,000 points a month that is generally regarded as a healthy pace of increase.  But traders said more gains are in store after the correction because investors are encouraged by recent reports showing stronger earnings outlooks for many corporations.  Some institutional investors remain cautious, however.  They say that there is still too much uncertainty left about U.S. economic development.  Yesterday, traders noted that recently neglected sectors received renewed buying interest because of lower prices.  Auto-manufacturing, steel, pharmaceutical, housing and construction stocks were generally higher, along with other incentive-backed issues.  Car makers added to Tuesday's advance as their lower price-earnings ratios and growing domestic demand attracted investors, traders said.  Suzuki was up 42 yen (30 cents) at 952 yen ($6.71), Toyota gained 20 yen to 2,680 and Mitsubishi rose 20 yen to 1,200.  Mazda ended flat at 1,070 yen after climbing to 1,110.  Among pharmaceuticals, Sankyo advanced 70 yen to 2,810 and Shionogi was up 50 yen at 1,830.  On the other hand, high-technology issues, which had been leading the market since last week, fell on profit-taking.  Sony dropped 80 yen to 8,800, Fanuc fell 120 yen to 6,780 and Kyocera was down 80 yen at 6,470.  Meanwhile, in London, the market's move higher was partly technical, as market makers once again interpreted positive sentiment as an excuse to shift share prices higher.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended at a high for the day of 2345.8, up 19.6 points.  At its weakest, the index opened at 2329.6.  "Buying interest was fairly average, but the market rose because there was almost no selling pressure," one dealer said.  Having notched an impressive 30% rise since the beginning of the year, the market is now looking toward the 2360.4 level, its highest point in 1989.  At the close, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was up 14 points at 1961.8.  Turnover was an average 449.8 million shares, up from 436.7 million.  Dealers said institutional buying remained thin as many players steered clear of the market ahead of vital U.K. and U.S. economic data due today and tomorrow.  Brewing stocks rose sharply, mainly because of news that Scotch whisky exports in the 1989 first half were the highest since 1982.  The sector was also helped by local press comment suggesting U.K. beer consumption has reached record levels during Britain's hot summer.  Grand Metropolitan rose 16 pence (25 cents) to 631 pence ($9.97), Whitbread surged 15 pence to 383, Guinness jumped 19 pence to 597 and Allied-Lyons gained 11 pence to 544.  Scottish & Newcastle, though, encountered profit-taking following its recent surge on speculative interest; it fell 10 pence to 403.  Reuters' shares continued to leap forward in an extremely tight market, with U.S. interest once again cited as the driving force.  The stock ended 27 pence firmer at 988, following its 9 pence surge Tuesday.  In Frankfurt, share prices bounced back from a two-day consolidation to climb sharply in sometimes active trading, but profit-taking wiped out most of the market's early gains.  Stocks in Zurich gained as strong buying by Swiss investors accelerated late in the day on news of proposed regulations on pension funds and insurance companies that could increase capital flowing into the market.  Amsterdam share prices rallied to close at a record as domestic and foreign investors resumed buying selected issues.  Gold stocks in Johannesburg closed sharply higher in busy dealings, buoyed by the rise in the gold price and the steeply weaker financial rand, a restricted currency unit used by foreigners to invest in South African bonds and stocks.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Stockholm, lower in Milan and mixed in Paris and Brussels.  In Hong Kong, shares finished narrowly mixed as a wave of rumors about the health of Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping wiped out healthy gains achieved early in the session.  Stocks in Wellington surged to a post-crash high on a wave of foreign and local buying.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Sydney, Taipei and Singapore and lower in Seoul and Manila.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 15 Aug 14 Year  @ U.S. .................. 317.5 316.2 + 24.0  @ Britain ............... 702.2 701.8 + 28.6  @ Canada ................ 435.1 434.3 + 18.5  @ Japan.................. 1560.0 1559.9 + 9.8  @ France ................ 526.8 526.8 + 19.0  @ Germany ............... 246.6 249.4 + 18.6  @ Hong Kong ............. 1974.4 1975.2 - 2.7  @ Switzerland ........... 232.8 235.5 + 34.7  @ Australia ............. 343.9 345.1 + 18.4  @ World index............ 537.6 537.5 + 8.7  Talks between bargainers for Nynex Corp. and the Communications Workers of America ended with both sides apparently angrier at each other than before.  Nynex said union representatives "left the table without making any realistic, substantive proposals, particularly with respect to issues involving health costs."  A CWA spokesman called the meeting "a hoax" arranged by Nynex to try to "calm the waters" following huge rallies by strikers in New York and Boston.  The spokesman said Nynex "was totally inflexible on a whole slew of issues."  The CWA represents about 40,000 of the 60,000 Nynex employees who went on strike Aug. 6.  The other 20,000 are represented by the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers.  Meanwhile, union representatives and company negotiators continued meeting to try to end strikes against Philadelphia-based Bell Atlantic Corp. and San Francisco-based Pacific Telesis.  CWA representatives from Ameritech Corp.'s five regions were scheduled to meet today in Detroit to map strategy in that strike, which began Sunday.  ANALYSTS INTERNATIONAL Corp.'s per-share earnings of 33 cents for the fiscal fourth quarter was a positive earnings surprise of 13.8% after adjusting for a recent 5-for-4 stock split.  An earlier edition incorrectly showed the company as a negative surprise.  (See: "Quarterly Earnings Surprises" -- WSJ Aug. 16, 1989)  The Internal Revenue Service here said a Boston bookkeeper was charged by U.S. attorneys with filing $325,000 of fraudulent tax-refund claims by computer.  An IRS spokeswoman said the case was the first example of alleged electronic fraud involving the IRS Electronic Filing System, which was introduced in 1986 and will be available nationwide next year.  The bookkeeper, Alan N. Scott, couldn't be reached for comment.  The IRS charged that Mr. Scott filed refund claims over a seven-month period on behalf of "unsuspecting individuals" in the U.S. and Canada, some of whom were in prison.  He received about half of the refunds he claimed, said U.S. attorneys in Boston.  The scheme came to light partly because of a tip from a Boston bank, which reported a "suspicious electronic transfer of funds" that the IRS alleges was part of the scam.  The case is still being investigated.  If convicted, Mr. Scott could be imprisoned for up to five years and fined up to $250,000 for each of 47 counts of submitting fraudulent claims, U.S. attorneys said.  While filing tax returns is faster by computer, it doesn't offer particular advantages to criminals, an IRS spokeswoman said.  "Electronic filers receive refunds within three weeks," she said.  "But the same safeguards are built into the electronic system that are built into the traditional tax-return system."  The Nasdaq over-the-counter market continued to regroup after its record-shattering gains early this month, and investors again fled from high-technology stocks.  With Intel, Apple Computer, Mentor Graphics, 3Com and other computer-related stocks lower, the Nasdaq Composite Index eased 0.12 to 460.79 on 129 million shares.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of large technology and other non-financial stocks fell 2.00 to 429.74.  Meanwhile, the biggest financial stocks, as tracked by the Nasdaq Financial Index, rose 1.34 to 460.38.  Traders said the Nasdaq market, which peaked at 463.55 last week, is still consolidating its gains as investor uncertainty continues about the direction of the economy and stock prices.  Of the 4,402 issues that changed hands, 1,008 rose in price and 946 lost ground.  The most active issue was Intel, which dropped 1 3/8 to 28 7/8 on 4.4 million shares.  A spokeswoman for the maker of semiconductors and supplier of systems to electronics manufacturers attributed the sharp decline to comments company officials made to securities analysts, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  The officials were quoted as saying Intel expects third-quarter earnings per share to be "flat to slightly down" compared with the second quarter, while revenue will be "flat or perhaps slightly up."  Intel had second-quarter net income of $99.3 million, or 53 cents a share.  It earned 78 cents a share in the year-earlier third quarter.  Analysts' estimates of third-quarter results have ranged from 55 to 68 cents a share.  Intel also told analysts that start-up costs associated with products scheduled for delivery this year will reduce margins.  Mentor Graphics, which makes electronic systems used to design and test integrated circuits and other electronic systems, apparently was hurt by Intel's announcement and fell 1 to 16 on 946,000 shares.  Jack Carveth, the company's treasurer, said some investors told him they sold the stock after the news from Intel.  But Mr. Carveth said there is no reason for alarm.  "Our company has never been in a better position," he said.  "The outside influence of other companies' announcements is just the way it happens sometimes."  Among other computer issues, Apple dropped 1 to 40 3/8 on 1 million shares, and 3Com lost 5/8 to 11 7/8.  Conner Peripherals, a disk-drive stock, was down 1/8 to 11 3/8 on 2.4 million shares.  The company began the sale of 6.3 million shares at $11.375 each.  Elsewhere, Washington Bancorp tumbled 2 3/4 to 13 1/4, and Howard Savings Bank rose 1/4 to 17 3/4.  The companies agreed to terminate a plan for Howard Savings to acquire Washington after officials said they couldn't agree on terms.  Data Translation fell 1 1/2 to 6 3/4 after the company said the federal government may file a civil suit against it seeking damages of more than $5 million in connection with the pricing of federal contracts.  In a letter, government attorneys told the company that the suit would seek about $520,000 in damages, which the government might seek to triple, and penalties of as much as $10,000 for each of at least 386 company invoices submitted to the government, Data Translation said.  The attorneys invited the company to enter into settlement negotiations, the company said.  Data Translation said it has "meritorious defenses" in the matter and that any liabilities arising from the dispute won't have a material effect on the company's finances.  A&W Brands fell 1 3/4 to 28 on 227,500 shares after United Brands said in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that it intends to sell 701,754 A&W shares, or about a 7.8% stake.  United Brands, along with American Financial and Carl H. Lindner, owns an 8.1% stake in A&W.  Stuart Hall rose 1/8 to 18 3/4 on 260,000 shares.  The school supplies concern said it expects sales for its year ending Nov. 30 to be between $95 million and $100 million, compared with $73 million in fiscal 1988.  Cambridge Bioscience, which gained 7/8 to 8 3/4 on 559,200 shares, was helped by the recent endorsement by a homosexual men's health group of tests to detect the acquired immune deficiency syndrome virus, according to company officials.  Cambridge Bioscience makes a test, approved by the Food and Drug Administration, for the AIDS virus.  Cambridge Bioscience's stock has an average daily volume of 143,000 shares.  Biotech Research Labs also benefited from news of the endorsement, traders told the professional investor report.  The stock rose 1/4 to 5 1/4 on 360,000 shares.  Biotech has FDA approval to produce AIDS testing kits along with Du Pont, the investor report said.  Bond prices moved modestly higher yesterday, but concerns about two potentially market-moving economic reports kept many investors on the sidelines.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose more than 1/2 point, or over $5 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield slid to 8.10% from 8.15% Tuesday.  Municipal bonds and mortgage-backed securities were unchanged to about 1/4 point higher, while corporate bonds matched the gains achieved in the Treausry market.  Today the Bureau of Economic Analysis will release the merchandise trade report for June, and tomorrow the Department of Labor will release the consumer price index for July.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report forecast, on average, a narrower trade deficit.  The consensus forecast called for a seasonally adjusted deficit of $9.40 billion in June, compared with $10.24 billion in May.  Economists expect a modest 0.2% rise in the consumer price index for July.  The broad measure of inflation rose 0.2% in June and 0.6% in May.  On several occasions in the past, unexpected findings in those reports have caused the bond market to gyrate wildly -- sometimes moving opposite the direction investors had expected.  To avoid potential disaster, "many investors are sitting on their hands," said Philip Braverman, executive director of BNY Securities Inc.  Jay Goldinger, an investment strategist at Capital Insight Inc., added, "Most investors are still shell shocked," from Friday and Monday when bond prices lost nearly three points, or about $30 for each $1,000 face amount.  This week, he said, "everyone is keeping it close to the vest."  The trading that did take place was among speculators and dealers rushing to cover short positions established prior to Friday's sell-off, according to some traders.  In a short sale, investors sell borrowed securities and later seek to make a profit by buying an equal number of securities at a lower price to replace what was borrowed.  Meanwhile, the Treasury Department announced the sizes of next week's two-year and five-year, two-month note auctions.  The Treasury said it will sell $9.5 billion of two-year notes Tuesday and $7.75 billion of five-year, two-month notes Wednesday.  The size of the two-year note sale was increased by $500 million from the prior auction in July, and the size of the five-year note sale was increased by $250 million from the previous sale.  Some economists and analysts had expected the size of each issue to be increased by $500 million or slightly more.  The auction sizes were expected to be increased somewhat to help the government pay for the thrift industry bailout.  In when-issued trading, the two-year notes to be auctioned next week were quoted at a price to yield 8.12%, and the new five-year notes were quoted to yield 8.06%.  Yesterday's economic reports on housing starts, capacity utilization and industrial production were generally in line with market expectations and offered some support to bond prices.  However, some analysts said the reports reinforced growing perceptions that the economy is headed for a "soft landing" with slowing growth and moderating inflation, rather than a recession.  "A week ago, the hard landing was the prevalent scenario," said Maria Fiorini Ramirez, a managing director and money market economist at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. Now people are adjusting to the idea, she said, "that there is life in the economy."  Treasury Securities  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 100 04/32, compared with a price of 99 18/32 on Tuesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted at a price of 99 09/32 to yield 8.09%, compared with 98 28/32 to yield 8.15% Tuesday.  Two-year notes were quoted late at 99 07/32 to yield 8.12%.  Short-term rates fell yesterday.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.89%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.14%.  The discount rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.75%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.16%.  Corporate, Other Issues  Two federally chartered corporations, the Student Loan Marketing Association and the Federal National Mortgage Association tapped the market yesterday.  Sallie Mae offered $250 million of three-year floating-rate notes priced to float at 0.72 percentage point above the three-month Treasury bill to be auctioned Monday.  Fannie Mae offered $100 million of two-year debentures priced to yield 8.35%.  In the junk bond market, Integrated Resources Inc.'s bonds registered further losses.  The bonds lost between 1 1/4 points to four points yesterday following losses of two to nine points Tuesday.  Municipals  Municipal bond issuance perked up yesterday with the market's solid tone permitting the pricing of more than $700 million in new tax-exempt debt.  Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. was lead underwriter for two of the largest deals of the day: $290 million of student loan revenue bonds from the South Dakota Student Loan Corp. and a $292.8 million Chicago-O'Hare International Airport special facility revenue refunding bond (American Airlines Project) issue from the city of Chicago.  Both issues were in good shape by late afternoon, according to an official with the lead underwriter, who said institutions, including bond funds and insurance companies, and retail investors showed interest.  The Chicago issue was oversubscribed.  Some maturities in the South Dakota offering were also oversubscribed at the preliminary pricing levels.  Underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets tentatively priced a $123.7 million general obligation revenue refunding bond offering from the state of Alabama.  Among active dollar bonds, Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority of New York's 7 1/8% securities of 2019 were flat at 97 1/2 bid late yesterday, having held to a 1/8-point range for the course of the day.  The bonds were yielding 7.32%, unchanged.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities rose 5/32 to 7/32 but lagged gains of intermediate Treasurys for the second straight session.  There was market talk that New West Federal Savings & Loan Association, which was formed with troubled assets of failed American Savings & Loan Association, continued its huge mortgage liquidation program by selling about $325 million of Government National Mortgage Association 9 1/2% securities yesterday morning.  New West recently sold $875 million of Federal National Mortgage Association 9% securities that were repackaged into Fannie Mae's largest real estate mortgage investment conduit issue.  Before its liquidation program began, New West held an estimated $13 billion of mortgage securities, the most in the thrift industry.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities ended at 97 9/32, up 5/32.  The yield was 9.51% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note widened 0.03 percentage point to 1.42.  Foreign Bonds  Japanese government bond prices ended higher, boosted by the yen and speculation about a possible shortage of bonds in the secondary market.  Anticipation of tighter supply was sparked by Tuesday's large two-week discount bill buying operation by the Bank of Japan.  Speculators believe tighter supply will help accelerate price rises in the domestic bond market.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at 97.16, to yield 5.065%.  West German bond prices ended mostly 0.10 point higher.  Bonn's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 ended unchanged at 100.40 to yield 6.685%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 closed at 100.05 to yield 6.726%.  British government bonds ended with moderate gains as the pound firmed.  The Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 3/8 to 116 3/32 to yield 9.58%, while the Treasury's 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 1/32 to 100 1/32 to yield 11.67%.  A group including Sequoia Partners Limited Partnership, a New York investment partnership, said it holds a 12.4% stake in Counsellors Tandem Securities Fund Inc.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group said it holds 600,700 Counsellors Tandem common shares, including 113,200 shares bought this week by group member South Pacific Land Investments Corp. of Monaco for $10.25 to $10.375 a share.  The shares closed yesterday at $10.50, up 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The group has said it may consider seeking the conversion of New York-based Counsellors, a closed-end investment company, to an open-end mutual fund, influencing the fund's management, or seeking control of the fund for the purpose of merging, selling assets or liquidating.  Pulitzer Publishing Co., St. Louis, said it entered into a definitive agreement to sell its WPTA television station in Fort Wayne, Ind., to Granite Broadcasting Corp. for $26.5 million.  The publishing concern said it would realize a gain of $17.9 million from the sale.  The company said it also will receive a Federal Communications Commission tax certificate because closely held Granite is a minority-controlled business.  The certificate would give Pulitzer two full calendar years after it closes the sale to reinvest the proceeds into another broadcasting property.  Pulitzer also would be able to defer payment of capital gains taxes.  Pulitzer said it expects the sale to close by year's end.  The sale is subject to FCC approval and issuance of the tax certificate, among other things.  Granite Broadcasting owns NBC-affiliated television stations in Duluth, Minn., and Peoria/Bloomington, Ill.  HZN Option Partners, a market maker for the Chicago Board Options Exchange, said it sold 82,298 shares of Amserv Inc., lowering its stake in the company to 4.7% of common outstanding.  HZN Option Partners said the stock was sold in the open market from June 12 to Aug. 3 for $5.125 to $5.50 a share, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  As a result, the partnership holds 127,682 remaining shares, the filing said.  HZN Option Partners gave no reason in the filing for the sales.  Eugene J. Mora, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Amserv, which is based in Reno, Nev., said of the HZN sale: "The principal was selling for personal reasons.  It isn't a reflection of how the company is doing."  Amserv processes electrocardiograms and places temporary nursing personnel.  Engineers from nearly a dozen companies have recently paraded through the doors of Southern Co., showing off technologies that they claim will reduce harmful emissions from the utility's coal-burning power plants.  Only a few will be called back for a full-scale trial.  "I hope we're on the list," says an anxious Peter Boer, head of research at W.R. Grace & Co. Otherwise, he says, the company is going to "lose position to the competition."  Pending clean-air legislation has sparked both a heated contest to develop technologies for curbing acid rain and intense investor interest in the contenders.  But a sound technology alone may not guarantee a piece of the estimated $3.5 billion-a-year market for controlling acid rain.  Engineering companies need to find utilities willing to test their science, or be left at a disadvantage.  "It's impractical to set up a pilot plant from scratch, so you have to work with someone's site," says Mr. Boer.  A technology is "in the club" only after a utility tests it, says Paul Knight, an analyst at Washington Analysis Corp., a research concern.  "There are at least a hundred technologies out there, and more will emerge, but only a few will get the stamp of legitimacy."  Since the 1977 Clean Air Act, only a handful of engineering companies have entered the club with their "scrubber" technologies, which chemically extract pollutants from flue gases.  The newer technologies include improved versions of some old approaches, such as "coal washing," and installation of huge towers and chambers packed with sophisticated catalysts to catch the byproducts of coal burning -- sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxides -- which fall to earth as acid rain.  Coal-producing communities, especially in the Appalachian region, have a large stake in these technologies, too.  Coal-burning utilities generate 60% of the nation's sulfur dioxide emissions.  Without new solutions to the problem, power plants will likely be forced to seek more expensive, low-sulfur coal, which is usually found in the East.  The impetus for these new technologies is coming from clean-air bills pending in Congress and the high priority the Bush administration has given in its own proposed amendments to the current Clean Air Act.  How extensively the utilities will have to retrofit their plants will depend upon the final legislation expected by next year.  Even the least stringent administration bill would require a company like Southern Co. to retrofit at least half its plants with one or the other new technologies and switch to low-sulfur coals in the others.  "That will mean at least a billion dollars increase in annual costs, or an 8% rate increase for customers," says Charles Goodman, vice president of research at Atlanta-based Southern Co.  One of the reasons the utilities must find alternatives to the relatively new scrubber technology, even though it's quite effective, is that the byproducts of scrubber methods will be suspect under the new pollution regulations.  The scrubbers, which account for a quarter of the size of a power plant, use a fine spray of lime or limestone to extract sulfur dioxide from the flue emissions, and produce huge amounts of sludge.  A storage problem also arises with the tons of limestone that the process requires.  One old technology that has been refined into a leading contender for commercial application is coal washing.  An advanced process, developed by a McDermott International unit and Asea Brown Boveri of Sweden, involves crushing coal into fine powder and then "washing" it during combustion with calcium-based absorbents to soak up sulfur dioxide.  American Electric Power Service Corp. is building a small plant in Brilliant, Ohio, to test the process.  In this technology, coal is kept churning under high pressure during combustion.  Michael J. Mudd, principal engineer at the utility, says that in such a condition coal requires only half as much heat to burn as in conventional boilers, and so produces only half as much nitrogen oxide.  A major drawback of these methods is that additional technologies are required to completely remove nitrogen oxides.  Some technologies attempt to simultaneously remove both gases with catalysts, the same way catalytic converters render automobile emissions harmless.  Noxso Corp., a new company founded to develop one such technology, is designing a pilot plant at a site of an Ohio utility.  The Noxso process involves passing flue gases through a bed of alumina beads coated with sodium.  The beads, stored in tanks 40 feet high and 40 feet in diameter, absorb both gases.  The beads are then drained from the tanks in a continuous process, heated with natural gas and treated with steam.  As the final product, the process yields elemental sulfur, a basic chemical commodity widely used to make sulfuric acid.  The nitrogen oxides released by the beads are recycled back into the coal boilers, triggering a "reversible" chemical reaction in which nitrogen oxides are produced and reduced in the same amounts, at the same time.  "The net is zero emission," says L.G. Neal, president of Noxso.  W.R. Grace, which has agreed with Noxso to jointly develop the process, also has a technology of its own -- the one it's trying to market to Southern and other utilities.  It involves first mixing flue gases with ammonia and sending the mixture through a large catalytic converter, a honeycomb ceramic made of metal oxides.  The catalyst helps the ammonia react with nitrogen oxides to form harmless nitrogen and water.  But cost is a big problem with these catalysts.  "They have to be replaced every year," says Southern's Mr. Goodman.  On the fringes of these developments is RCM Technologies Inc., a Los Angeles engineering concern.  In a rundown industrial section of Camden, N.J., it has rigged up a demonstration plant.  The pilot plant appears to burn high-sulfur coal in a boiler and to send the dark fumes through looping pipes and chambers to a chimney that, according to RCM's chairman, Robert Sackett, doesn't emit any noxious gases.  RCM assiduously courts the media but declines to give details of its process.  Mr. Sackett claims that some utilities have looked at the demonstration plant, but he declines to disclose the names.  Mr. Knight, the analyst, has looked at the RCM demonstration and says the technology "looks and sounds good."  But, he adds, unless a utility checks it out at a power plant "you don't know."  The Electric Power Research Institute, a utilities trade group, is itself evaluating technologies, singling out ones that should get its stamp of approval.  Edward Cichanowicz, manager for air-quality control, says the group has identified 65 potential processes, using 40 different criteria.  He says eight of the technologies will be targeted for further development in co-operation with utilities.  "Environmental controls cannot be evaluated solely according to reduction in airborne emissions," says Mr. Cichanowicz.  "They must also produce byproduct liquids and solids that can be safely managed, or preferably sold as a resource."  ---  @ Cost Estimates for Clean Air Technologies  @ (In millions, for 500-megawatt plant)  @ ANNUAL  @ CAPITAL OPERATING  @ COST COST  @ Catalytic reduction* $125 $20  @ Scrubbers $100-$150 $15  @ Clean-coal $100-$150 $ 5  @ Low-sulfur coal $ 30-$ 50 $15-$25  @ *NOXSO technology  @ Source: Washington Analysis Corp.  New Visions Entertainment Corp., which failed to make a March 31 interest payment on its debentures, said it appeared holders would convert the debt to an unspecified amount of common stock.  The Los Angeles company also said its main institutional lender agreed to extend an existing credit agreement for $17 million until September 1993.  Joseph Miller, vice president, finance, said the company is looking for additional equity.  The film producer and distributor said two months ago that holders of more than two-thirds of its 9 1/2% convertible debt due 2001 had agreed to modify and ease the terms of the debt.  But the changes were conditioned upon New Visions making the March interest payment no later than Aug. 15, reducing the debt's conversion price and raising additional equity.  New Visions said it hadn't made the Aug. 15 payment but that it "appeared likely" debtholders would convert their debt into common shares because those holding more than $12 million of about $16 million of debt had agreed to convert.  After years of waiting in the wings, thrift stocks are finally in the limelight.  Thanks to declining interest rates and President Bush's savings-and-loan rescue plan, thrift stock prices are up an average of 44% since the beginning of the year.  Enthusiasm over the just-signed bailout bill -- especially a provision allowing commercial banks to acquire healthy thrifts immediately -- spurred additional gains of 20% or more for some thrifts in the first few days after the legislation was passed.  And despite this jazzy showing, many thrift specialists say the long run is likely to be a winning one, at least for healthy institutions.  But for individuals tempted to invest in thrifts now, the pros urge caution.  "At these prices, with so many people jumping on the bandwagon, it pays to be selective," says Joseph Jolson, general partner and senior S&L analyst at Montgomery Securities.  Buying thrifts for their takeover potential is particularly risky at this juncture, thrift specialists say.  That's because the market doesn't seem to have taken into account the numerous hurdles and regulatory unknowns that will stymie many thrift buy-outs.  "We won't see the feeding frenzy some people expect," says James Benson, a thrift analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  As the takeover euphoria runs its course, "thrifts that have run up 15% to 20% or more in price since the bailout bill was passed will give up half those gains," says James K. Schmidt, a managing director of Freedom Capital Management Corp.  Although the takeover angle remains appealing in the long haul, most specialists advise investors to keep their eyes fixed on fundamental value when selecting thrift stocks -- and to view takeovers, when they occur, as gravy.  "Buy stocks you'd be comfortable with anyway, because you can wait a long time before {Citicorp Chairman} John Reed walks through the door," says Henry Peltz, a thrift analyst with Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc.  The best long-term bets, the pros say, are prosperous, well-heeled thrifts.  These stand to benefit from better profit margins as the rescue program eliminates the competition from failing thrifts.  Previously, says Gareth Plank, a thrift analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., healthy thrifts have had to pay as much as 1.3 percentage points above commercial-bank rates to compete for deposits with the S&L industry's "brain-dead walking zombies."  The impact on profits, which analysts say has yet to be really captured in stock prices, could be considerable.  Even a modest reduction in the deposit differential to around eight-tenths of a percentage point from an average of about one percentage point would "probably result in 15% to 20% higher earnings for the industry," according to Laurence Fink, a thrift finance specialist at Blackstone Group.  This positive profit trend would also help offset the risk of recession.  What's more, as the bailout bill forces a "dramatic shrinkage in the thrift industry in the next five years," well-heeled institutions can take advantage of a buyers' market in thrift assets to increase their market share, says Peter Treadway, a thrift analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. Despite the current focus on takeovers by banking companies, "I think the thrifts themselves will be better at picking among the wreckage," he says.  "They'll have their choice of branches, assets and franchises to buy."  To spot the winners, the pros say investors should look for the following:  Strong Balance Sheets.  "Stay away from thrifts that are wallowing in good will and bad assets," says Keefe Bruyette's Mr. Peltz.  Thrifts will need tangible capital -- an excess of real assets over liabilities -- of at least 4% to 5% of assets to profit from market opportunities, analysts say.  Asset Quality.  Thrifts should show a low percentage of nonperforming loans and a high proportion of single-family owner-occupied mortgage loans, which are considered the safest kind of asset.  "As a general rule, steer clear of savings-and-loans with too diversified a balance sheet," says Shearson's Mr. Plank.  "The simpler the business, the better off you are."  Earnings and Earnings Quality.  Look for profit generated from interest on loans -- the most predictable form of revenue -- not from transactions.  Mr. Plank suggests looking for thrifts with net interest income, after loan-loss provisions, that at least covers operating expenses.  Strong Franchises.  A good market is important, as that helps buoy asset quality and allows room for growth in new loans.  The most favored markets include California, Illinois, Michigan, Indiana and Florida.  Areas to avoid include Arizona, Oklahoma, Colorado and Texas.  "You also want to see diversification," says Mr. Plank.  H.F. Ahmanson, for instance, is a blue-chip California thrift with lending operations in 17 states.  Management Quality.  Management should show a willingness to work for the shareholder.  "There's a substantial risk of getting trapped by a thrift where management has no incentive to do anything -- it just sits there," says Stephen Joseph, a senior vice president at Drexel Burnham.  Value.  Many thrifts that rank high according to all the other criteria are selling at sky-high multiples, compared with historical levels.  While the biggest, "best and brightest" thrifts, such as Ahmanson, Great Western Financial and Golden West Financial are still highly recommended by most analysts, "they're already selling at multiples comparable to commercial banks," says Smith Barney's Mr. Treadway.  Consequently, "investors may get more relative appreciation in medium-sized thrifts, many of which still sell at multiples of between six and eight times this year's earnings," Mr. Peltz says.  Among his picks are First Federal of Michigan, Great Lakes Bancorp and Standard Federal Bank in the Midwest, as well as Apple Bank for Savings and Home Savings Bank in New York.  Aside from the big blue-chip California thrifts, Montgomery's Mr. Jolson likes SFFed, HomeFed, UnionFed Financial, Westcorp and Heart Federal.  Stephen Lieber, who runs the Evergreen Fund, takes a long-range view.  He looks for thrifts he thinks will eventually be taken over by commercial banks or become commercial banks themselves.  His choices include New England thrifts such as Peoples Bancorp of Worcester, Midhudson Savings Bank and First Constitution Financial.  In a similar vein, Freedom Capital's Mr. Schmidt likes Missouri's United Savings & Loan as a bargain-priced long-term takeover play in the Midwest.  ---  @ A Thrift Sampler  @ This is a sampling of the thrift-institution stocks analysts are recommending  @ PRICE/  @ EARNINGS CLOSING  @ RATIO* PRICE**  @ H.F. Ahmanson 11 $22.50  @ Golden West Financial 11 51.00  @ Great Lakes Bancorp 6 22.00  @ Great Western Financial 11 20.00  @ HomeFed 8 43.13  @ St. Paul Bancorp 10 18.50  @ SFFed 15 20.50  @ Standard Federal Bank 7 12.25  @ UnionFed Financial 6 21.25  @ Washington Mutual Savings 10 23.00  @ *Based on 8/15/89 price and earnings reported for most recent four quarters  @ **8/16/89  The dollar drifted mostly lower in quiet trading as market players adjusted their positions ahead of the release of the U.S. June trade data.  With the dollar riding a recent wave of optimism, favorable U.S. trade figures would underscore the market's direction and quickly push the U.S. currency to between 1.96 and 1.97 marks, traders say.  However, "we will start to see what kind of clout this dollar has if it is a bad number," said Michael Guarino, vice president and chief dealer with Algemene Bank N.V. in New York.  With the market looking for a June trade gap of $9 billion, a strong performance would be anything narrower while a poor number would be a widening to between $9.5 billion and $10.5 billion.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9408 marks, down from 1.9430 marks late Tuesday, and at 142.10 yen, down from 142.20 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5815, up from $1.5750.  In Tokyo Thursday, the dollar opened for trading at 142.25 yen, up from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 141.80 yen.  Although the U.S. currency pulled back from its intraday highs of 1.95 marks and 142.53 yen in midmorning New York dealings, the drop may not have been caused by a move to flatten market positions.  "It is difficult to estimate how the market will go into the figures because Europe and North America have been enthusiastic buyers of dollars, but Asia has been sellers so things are relatively in balance," said Keith Cheveralls, vice president and chief foreign-exchange dealer with Nippon Credit Bank in New York.  One reason for last minute cold feet for dollar bears is that the U.S.  May trade deficit, reported at $10.24 billion seasonally adjusted and excluding freight and insurance costs, may have been disproportionately high because of a surge in British exports before a threatened dock strike and a one-time boost in capital goods exported from Japan.  Data showing a flat growth rate or decline in U.S. exports would indicate that the U.S. economy as a whole is slowing, which in turn will add additional pressure to the U.S. Federal Reserve to bring U.S. interest rates lower -- a bearish development for the dollar.  Conversely, "we will be looking particularly at trade with {West} Germany and Japan to see what effects this will have on the domestic economies of those two countries," said Graham Beale, foreign-exchange trading manager with Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. in New York.  If the trade surpluses these two countries routinely run with the U.S. show signs of narrowing, the data would indicate a slowdown in their growth and indicate growing pressure to cut back their interest rates -- a bullish development for the dollar.  Should the overall trade deficit and the breakdown of figures be bullish for the dollar, traders said central banks will be waiting in the wings to pour cold water on any rally.  How the central banks choose to intervene will be just as important as whether they intervene.  "We will have to see if it is surreptitious intervention, or a G-7 pummeling of the market," said Mr. Guarino.  With surreptitious intervention, central banks discretely place orders with a limited number of agents.  A "G-7 pummeling" is the coordinated, widely broadcast intervention by the Group of Seven nations' central banks acting simultaneously.  G-7 nations include the U.S., Japan, Britain, West Germany, France, Italy and Canada.  Mr. Guarino said that if G-7 central banks aggressively announce their presence in the market and diluge dealers with dollars, any rally will be quickly halted as traders duck for the sidelines and wait to buy the U.S. currency at the bottom of its dip.  With surreptitious intervention, the traders will likely push the dollar past intervention levels but then suffer the consequences later as news of the intervention filters through the market and support for the currency begins to subside.  In Wednesday's dealings, the dollar slipped to intraday lows in Tokyo dealings as traders there continued the sell-off started by profit-taking Tuesday.  After bouncing off an intraday low of 1.9327 marks and 141.40 yen, the dollar move steadily higher through European dealings before receiving a sharp boost to its intraday highs from the U.S. Commerce Department announcement that July housing starts were up 0.8% and July industrial production rose 0.2%.  Both figures were regarded as bullish by indicating the economy isn't in imminent danger of slipping into a recession.  The dollar quickly slumped back to near its closing levels by midday and hovered there for the rest of the session.  On New York's Commodity Exchange, gold for current delivery settled at $368.20 an ounce, down $2.50.  Estimated volume was a moderate 2.7 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $366.35 an ounce.  Preferred stock, once an obscure part of the U.S. capital market, is emerging as a hot new source of cheap capital for companies around the world.  Since March, more than $2.5 billion of preferred stock has been sold on U.S. markets in a variety of new forms by investment-grade companies.  The lure is capital that isn't as costly as common stock and that still can be counted as long-term equity by regulators.  Preferred stock is so named because it has priority over common stock on payment of dividends and in the distribution of assets if a company is dissolved.  Banks, the biggest issuers of preferred this year, excluding junk-bond issuers, have helped transform U.S. preferred into a $50 billion international market.  "In its never-ending search for capital, the banking industry has discovered a tool long used by utilities and industrial companies," says Paul Baeri, a preferred-stock trader at Merrill Lynch & Co., the underwriting leader.  "Preferred used to be a sleepy part of the domestic market.  But now, it's the only capital market that's showing real signs of innovation, including its sudden transformation into a global market."  BET PLC, a little-known British industrial services company, became the first foreign concern to sell dollar-denominated U.S. preferred stock in March.  Allied Irish Banks PLC, Barclays Bank PLC and Royal Bank of Scotland PLC have since raised nearly $900 million in initial preferred offerings.  U.S. banks, including Chase Manhattan Corp., Citicorp and Continental Bank Corp. also have sold novel preferred issues recently.  The rush for new capital by banks was prompted by the recent so-called Basel accord, in which the world's major central banks agreed to establish similar capital requirements in their own countries.  "Since the Federal Reserve and other {central banks} in the Basel accord have reduced the number of instruments acceptable as capital, preferred stock will continue to be a fertile area" for corporate finance, says Eric Cohen, director of capital markets at First Boston Corp.  The U.S. is the only country with a developed market for preferred stock.  Preferred, which has been issued by such industrial giants as Exxon Corp. and General Electric Co., is an attractive source of capital because it's counted as equity by regulators but has no voting rights.  The BET offering was significant because it was the first to take advantage of a U.S.-British tax treaty that makes such preferred-stock offerings mostly tax-exempt for investors.  Asian and European companies in nations with U.S. tax treaties also could be potential issuers of U.S. preferred, although the regulatory paperwork required is cumbersome, tax lawyers say.  New offerings have ranged from variations of adjustable, auction-rate preferred shares to perpetual, fixed-rate preferred.  Auction-rate preferred is a type of floating-rate preferred whose dividend is set by auction every 49 days.  In a recent $125 million offering for Citicorp, for example, the dividends on a portion of the offering are reset periodically during the first 15 years and then fixed forever.  "We were able to save Citicorp some money up front and thereby lower its overall cost of funds," says Mr. Cohen of First Boston, which underwrote the offering.  Corporations, the main buyers of preferred, have found variable-rate preferred, of which more than $20 billion has been issued, an attractive investment because 70% of the dividends they receive are tax-free.  Because U.S. corporations can claim a 70% deduction on their 34% corporate tax rate on dividends from other U.S. companies -- bringing the effective tax rate to 10.2% -- they are willing to accept a lower dividend yield than they would demand in a competing taxable security.  Thus, issuers also get a benefit from the tax break buyers enjoy.  The so-called dividend-received deduction isn't available on dividends from overseas companies, but U.S. companies can use the double-taxation treaty to claim the 25% advance corporate tax credit on British dividends.  This is subject to a 15% withholding tax, but U.S. investors can credit this against their U.S. tax liability.  Thus, the effective tax rate is 12% on the U.S. dividends, or only marginally higher than on issues by U.S. companies.  Merrill Lynch also has had some success selling the new preferred-stock issues to its retail, or individual, customers.  While individuals don't get the tax benefits from buying preferred that corporations do, they can claim some tax relief on preferred issued by foreign companies.  Dividends on preferred also traditionally have remained relatively high, compared with yields on competing debt instruments.  "This is one of the few markets where rates have lingered at higher levels in a declining interest-rate environment," says Mr. Baeri of Merrill.  ---  @ A New Parade of Preferred Stock  @ DOLLAR  @ AMOUNT MONTH  @ ISSUER (In millions) SOLD  @ BET PLC $365 March  @ First Interstate Bancorp 200 March  @ First Bank System 164 April  @ Texas Utilities Elec.  Co. 100 May  @ Barclays Bank PLC 500 June  @ Baltimore Gas & Elec.  Co. 50 June  @ Chase Manhattan Corp. 100 July  @ Allied Irish Banks PLC 175 July  @ Citicorp 125 July  @ Continental Bank Corp. 285 August  @ Royal Bank of Scotland PLC 200 August  @ Source: Merrill Lynch Capital Markets  The Justice Department said it filed suit against two top officers of troubled Continental Chemical Corp., seeking to recover more than $1 million for allegedly defective chemical products the company sold to the government.  Named in the suit alleging violations of the federal False Claims Act were Abraham Ashkin, chairman of Continental Chemical, and his son, Stephen Ashkin, the company's first vice president.  Continental, based in Terre Haute, Ind., is in bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Neither the Ashkins, nor company officials, could be reached for comment.  In papers filed in federal court in Indianapolis, prosecutors alleged that, under contracts with the Defense Logistics Agency and the General Services Administration, Continental Chemical shipped chemicals that hadn't been tested and were, in many cases, defective.  Precious-metals futures prices fell back from day-earlier advances as demand dried up.  Gold and platinum gave up almost as much as they gained Tuesday, while silver gave up a little more.  December delivery gold declined $2.80 an ounce to $374.70.  September silver was off 5.8 cents an ounce at $5.207.  October platinum was down $9.60 an ounce at $488.10.  The price movements in platinum, which were the biggest in the precious-metals complex with a rise of more than $10 Tuesday and a drop of almost as much as that yesterday, amount to zero significance, according to Neil Carson, marketing manager for Johnson Matthey Inc., USA.  "The rally and the subsequent decline tended to wash each other out and were mostly attributable to speculative trading, as industrial demand for the metal has been quiet in recent weeks," Mr. Carson said.  Industrial demand globally for platinum for the year as a whole has been generally strong, but the usual summer shutdowns have limited demand for the metal, he said.  "Investors, on the other hand, probably feel the time now is right to buy bullion because of price declines under $500 an ounce, but they're waiting for prices to show some definite sign of recovery before coming in to buy," Mr. Carson said.  A new trend may be developing in the U.S. that is favorable for platinum, according to Mr. Carson.  "Platinum jewelry used to be the biggest market for the metal in the U.S. prior to World War II," he said.  During the war, there was such a tightness of platinum supplies that none was used for jewelry, he said.  White gold replaced it, and, after the war, platinum wasn't able to recover its market, according to Mr. Carson.  "Now, Italian jewelry manufacturers are making a concentrated effort to sell platinum jewelry in the U.S.," he said.  "They believe that something new and different is needed, and why not go with a product that was once popular?"  Italians are among the world's major manufacturers of jewelry and are noted for setting trends, Mr. Carson said.  In 1988, Italian businesses exported $958 million of jewelry to the U.S., or 52.7% of the total, he said.  The setback in gold shows that the metal is still in a downward trend, according to Dinsa Mehta, chief bullion trader at Chase Manhattan Bank, New York.  "Technically, gold hasn't been able to sustain gains at the $370 level," he said.  "That means it could eventually challenge the low $350s."  If the price drops below that level, he said, a significant rally could develop.  "The supply/demand picture has changed," he said.  "Most of the gold that is to be produced from 1990 to 1994 has already been sold into the market and new gold (mining) projects, which take several years to develop, are the lowest in three years.  That means any gold price rally won't encounter the aggressive forward selling that has taken place previously, which has stifled advances."  One analyst observed that open interest figures dropped in all three metals yesterday, which, he said, indicated that the Tuesday rally was largely covering or buying back of contracts by traders who'd previously sold in anticipation that prices would go down.  Open interest is the outstanding contracts that must be offset with opposite trades or satisfied by delivery of the commodity.  Another analyst, Peter Cardillo, futures trading adviser for Josephthal & Co., New York, agreed, and added that traders yesterday appeared to be selling contracts in advance of the release of the report on the June U.S. merchandise trade deficit.  The report is due to be released today.  "Anticipation is that it will range between $8.5 billion and $9 billion," he said.  "But I think there may be a surprise.  If the figure comes in below $8.5 billion, as I think it might, it would be regarded as anti-inflationary and strengthen the dollar.  This could cause traders to sell precious metals, and prices could test their lows," Mr. Cardillo said.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Futures closed mixed, with corn rising and soybeans mostly declining.  Many traders bought corn futures and sold beans in response to technical factors.  "There are also mixed feelings on the weather, and that continues to make the market vacillate," said Steve Freed, a senior analyst for Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., Chicago.  Some brokerage-house meteorologists predicted increased rains over the weekend, which spurred the selling in soybeans.  Both the corn and soybean crops, the biggest harvests still developing in the fields, need rain in some regions.  "I expect the choppy trade to continue until we see what the weather is going to do," Mr. Freed said.  COPPER: Futures prices rose slightly on continued concern about production disruptions.  The September contract rose 0.35 cent a pound to $1.2185.  Analysts noted that the Peruvian national miners' strike, which began Monday, appeared to be losing its effectiveness.  On Monday, 35% of the miners were estimated to have walked out, while on Tuesday, the figure dropped to 30%, one analyst said.  Bernard Savaiko, senior metals analyst for PaineWebber, New York, said that the action on the first day appeared to be a symbolic gesture and that more miners may be returning to work.  Another analyst observed that if the trend continues, it would be a repetition of previous strike attempts in Peru, most of which dissipated.  The second analyst said that two mines of the Southern Peru Copper Corp. appeared to be particularly hard hit by the walkout and that "the next few days are going to be critical."  Peru is the world's sixth-largest copper producer.  Workers at the Compania Minera, Mexico's largest producer, are voting on whether to strike later this month.  All these production difficulties appear to be giving the market a lift, Mr. Savaiko said.  He also noted that the September futures rose into the $1.22-$1.23 range, regarded as a key resistance level, before falling back.  Also, he said, the three-cents-a-pound premium of the September contract over December is holding steady, but not widening much, "so I have to question how tight the supply situation really is."  ENERGY: Petroleum futures rallied on little news except an optimistic report on U.S. oil inventories.  The report, released Tuesday by the American Petroleum Institute after futures trading had closed, showed drawdowns last week of nearly 2.8 million barrels in U.S. crude oil inventories and 3.5 million barrels in gasoline stocks.  Yesterday, as a result, prices of crude oil as well as those of petroleum products were propelled higher on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  West Texas Intermediate crude for September delivery ended at $18.97 a barrel, up 29 cents.  But gasoline was the leader of the rally.  The September contract for unleaded gasoline settled at 52.93 cents a gallon, up 0.87 cent.  Robert Boslego, a Winchester, Mass., consultant who analyzes oil statistics for clients, said the fact that U.S. crude oil inventories are 14 million barrels less than the year-ago level "is a fundamental that is clearly supporting the market."  Xiox Corp., maker of computerized phone call accounting systems, said venture capitalist William Welling of Menlo Park, Calif., has purchased 270,000 shares, or 25.7% of the company's common shares outstanding, and has a contract to nearly double that stake by buying an additional 259,418 shares, or 24.7%.  The Burlingame, Calif., company said Mr. Welling told Xiox that he seeks to have one or more directors appointed to the board, but plans no merger, liquidation or major restructuring of the company.  Jiffy Lube International Inc., Baltimore, said it expects to report a loss of $5 million to $6 million for the first quarter ended June 30.  In the year-earlier period, the company earned $95,000, or one cent a share.  The company operates and franchises automobile oil-change centers.  Jiffy Lube attributed the loss to failure in collecting revenue from certain franchises and to costs associated with the closing of several centers.  These expenses were partially offset by a $4 million gain from real estate sold to Pennzoil Co.  Jiffy Lube has been in financial difficulty for some time.  Last month the company agreed to a debt-restructuring plan that will give 80% control of the company to Pennzoil in exchange for a $15 million debt conversion and $20 million in cash.  The contest for United Airlines' parent UAL Corp. edged toward open warfare as Marvin Davis raised his bid by $35 a share and took a first step toward ousting all 15 board members except UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf.  Mr. Davis acted to thwart a possible defensive transaction by UAL before its board meets today, following reports that UAL management has been negotiating with its pilot union on a possible employee stock ownership plan.  By establishing a record date of Aug. 16 for a consent solicitation to oust the board, Mr. Davis ensures that the company can't issue new stock either to an ESOP or other friendly holder that could be voted against him to block a takeover.  Struggling to maintain a friendly posture to avoid alienating United employees, Mr. Davis insisted his filing was "a contingency measure only" and "should not be interpreted as a change in Mr. Davis's strong desire to proceed on a friendly basis."  He said he doesn't currently intend to solicit votes.  However, UAL's announcement seemed aimed at portraying the development in a hostile light.  It left the impression Mr. Davis had already begun soliciting votes to oust the board by saying United had been served with a filing "requesting its stockholders to remove" all directors but Mr. Wolf.  Mr. Davis also said he is prepared to pay $275 a share, or $6.19 billion, for the nation's second largest airline, a 15% increase over his original offer two weeks ago for $240 a share, or $5.4 billion.  UAL has 22.5 million shares on a fully diluted basis.  The offer is in the range of $250 to $300 a share that analysts had valued the company at before the bid.  How hostile Mr. Davis is perceived could influence the outcome of the battle because of the importance for any buyer of reaching agreements with the airline's unions.  The pilots, for example, say they are prepared to negotiate cost concessions in exchange for equity ownership.  The filing said Mr. Davis envisions shrinking the board to five members, including Mr. Davis, his sons John and Gregg, Davis aide James Kneser and Mr. Wolf.  Keeping Mr. Wolf also seemed to be an effort to keep a friendly posture and a recognition of UAL management's importance in negotiating any deal for the company.  In a statement describing his actions, Mr. Davis said he hoped to be able to work with the board, management and labor on any takeover, saying he intends to keep UAL headquarters in Chicago.  However, based on their actions in the past, the UAL board is likely to view Mr. Davis's latest action as hostile.  The last time the company faced a possible consent solicitation was in 1987, when Coniston Partners forced the company to restructure.  Before receiving a letter from Mr. Davis yesterday disclosing his actions, the board had intended to discuss UAL's talks last weekend with the pilot union about a possible management-led buy-out or recapitalization with employee ownership.  That topic is still on the agenda, but it will probably be overshadowed by the Davis development, a person familiar with the situation said.  The board is also expected to discuss whether to appoint a special committee.  Also on the agenda is a review of the indications of interest UAL has received from other potential bidders in the past week.  One reason Mr. Davis acted yesterday was that his advisers were under the impression that the UAL board wouldn't be meeting for another week or two.  At its last meeting eight days ago, the board said it would explore all possible options.  Because the board scheduled a meeting sooner than expected and because of news stories about the talks between management and the pilot union, Mr. Davis feared the board might try to rush through a defensive stock transaction.  Partly reflecting similar fears by takeover stock traders, UAL stock fell by $2.50 yesterday to $251.75 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  The price has fallen $6.75 in the past two days.  Those fears may have been exaggerated, however.  People familiar with the company said the pilot-management talks were at such an early stage that an ESOP or other friendly takeover defense would have been difficult to engineer at today's meeting.  Meanwhile, the pilots union continued its push for an employee stake in a bid for the company by scheduling a meeting with the United machinists union and, according to unconfirmed reports, a meeting with Mr. Davis.  The machinists plan to meet with Mr. Davis late next week.  Both those meetings could be colored by his moves yesterday.  One problem facing the pilots as they try to forge an agreement that includes employee ownership is uncertainty surrounding the laws that govern employee stock ownership plans.  Legislation is pending in Congress that would curtail some ESOP tax breaks.  For instance, banks that lend money for an ESOP aren't taxed on half the interest they collect, allowing the companies and employee groups to get a lower interest rate.  But under proposed legislation, that tax break would only be available to ESOPs in which employees own 30% or more.  That large a stake may be difficult for the unions to negotiate in a managementled buy-out or recapitalization.  The more stringent tax rules would affect any transactions done after July 10 of this year.  Creation of a special committee, which could accompany a decision to put the company up for sale, was also considered a possibility because of UAL management's talks with the pilots union.  A special committee could be needed if it became apparent that Mr. Wolf and other UAL executives plan to participate in a bid.  Mr. Wolf's possible involvement in a bid of his own has been rumored since before the Davis bid was disclosed, but so far he has remained officially undecided.  Appointment of a special commitee would remove Mr. Wolf from the process of deciding what happens to the airline, keeping him out of a conflict between his interest in buying at the lowest possible price and that of shareholders in obtaining the highest price.  Such a committee would also prevent Mr. Wolf from obtaining an unfair advantage over other bidders.  However, as one observer pointed out, "It would put him out of the loop, where he doesn't know what's going on."  ---  @ Unfriendly Skies  @ Feb. 18, 1987 -- Richard Ferris, UAL Inc.'s chairman, says the company will more fully integrate its United Airlines, Hertz rental car and Hilton and Westin hotel operations.  Company will change its name to Allegis Corp. to promote itself as a total travel service outfit.  @ April 5, 1987 -- The United Airlines pilots' union offers to buy the carrier from its parent for $4.5 billion.  @ April 24, 1987 -- UAL board rejects pilots' bid.  @ May 28, 1987 -- Allegis, taking a step to ward off takeover threats, tentatively approves a plan to pay a $60-a-share distribution to shareholders.  @ June 9, 1987 -- Richard J. Ferris resigns and the company announces it will sell hotels and non-airline assets.  @ Dec. 9, 1987 -- Stephen Wolf named chairman of United.  @ Sept. 12, 1988 -- UAL shares soar to $90.625 from high 60s earlier in the year, bolstered by new management.  @ Jan. 16, 1989 -- Sources confirm that Saul Steinberg and his Reliance Group Holdings Inc. holds a stake of almost 5% in UAL. Analysts view Mr. Steinberg's investment as something other than hostile.  @ July 9, 1989 -- UAL stock shoots up $13.50 to $166 in a buying frenzy spawned by takeover speculation.  Pilots announce they may launch a new bid for the carrier.  @ Aug. 7, 1989 -- UAL shares soar $46.25 to $210.75 on confirmation of $240-a-share, or $5.4 billion, takeover offer by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  @ Aug. 13, 1989 -- Pilots and UAL in talks about possible employee stake in management-led buyout or recapitalization.  @ Aug. 16 -- Mr. Davis takes steps that could lead to removal of UAL's board.  UAL SUITOR MARVIN DAVIS raised his bid for United Air's parent to $275 a share, or $6.19 billion, and took a first step toward ousting all board members except Chairman Stephen Wolf.  Davis acted to thwart a possible defensive move by UAL before its board meets today.  ---  Goldman Sachs arbitrager Robert Freeman has tentatively agreed to plead guilty to a felony, more than two years after being arrested in Wall Street's insider-trading scandal.  Freeman has agreed to cooperate with the continuing federal inquiry.  ---  Recession fears were damped further by a slight pickup in two economic indexes for July.  Industrial output rose 0.2%, the first gain in two months, though auto production slid.  Housing starts grew 0.8%, apparently aided by lower mortgage rates.  Stocks and bonds edged up, helped by the economic reports.  The Dow Jones industrials rose 5.51, to 2693.29.  The dollar fell slightly.  Precious metals futures prices retreated.  ---  Wang Laboratories rejected unexpectedly a loan restructuring accord with its banks and halted certain interest and principal payments.  The moves heightened investor concern about the computer company's ability to rebound from its problems.  Wang's Class B stock fell 50 cents, to $6.  ---  U.S. auto makers are keeping their third-quarter production at cautious levels after building more cars than they could sell earlier in the year.  ---  The SEC adopted rules to fight fraudulent penny-stock operations by making it difficult to legally close sales of such stock over the phone.  The agency issued a revised proposal that would change rules under which corporate "insiders" report trades in stock of their companies.  ---  The FDA is collecting samples of the most heavily used generic drugs to test for product quality.  The nationwide survey follows disclosures of fraud in the generic-drug industry.  ---  Boeing has become the focus of a criminal inquiry after an ex-official was charged with improperly obtaining some of the military's most sensitive budget and planning documents.  ---  Oil prices are expected to weaken further, though the summer surge in OPEC's output is showing signs of topping out.  Still, analysts expect prices to recover later this year.  ---  Exxon launched a legal broadside against private suits stemming from the Alaska oil spill, which some attorneys said may help the company limit its exposure from the accident.  ---  Rice Aircraft admitted to refinishing surplus airplane parts and then passing them off as new.  The charges are the latest in a national probe of counterfeit aircraft parts.  ---  Intel expects third-quarter profit to be "flat to down" from the previous quarter due to lower-than-expected sales of some computer chips.  ---  The Farm Credit System's profit fell 6% in the second quarter, mostly because of a less aggressive use of an unusual accounting technique.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 150,060,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2693.29, up 5.51; transportation 1401.67, off 3.02; utilities 218.31, up 0.57.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3305.07, up 17.44.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.25, off 0.02; spot index 129.04, off 0.93.  Dollar: 142.10 yen, off 0.10; 1.9408 marks, off 0.0022.  Robert Freeman, the head of arbitrage at Goldman Sachs & Co. who was arrested for insider trading more than two years ago, has reached a tentative agreement with the Manhattan U.S. Attorney to plead guilty to a felony, according to people familiar with the negotiations.  The tentative agreement culminates a period of intense discussions between lawyers for Mr. Freeman and the government.  People familiar with the negotiations said details of the agreement are largely complete, and Goldman Sachs was preparing its public relations strategy last night.  They said they expect an announcement of the agreement as soon as today.  The tentative agreement calls for Mr. Freeman to plead guilty to a single felony carrying a maximum prison term of five years.  But, significantly, it doesn't require him to cooperate in the government's continuing investigation of wrongdoing on Wall Street, most of it stemming from former arbitrager Ivan Boesky's decision to plead guilty and cooperate in November 1986.  Mr. Freeman is expected to deny any wrongdoing beyond the single count identified in his plea agreement, and as a result isn't expected to implicate any others.  Robert Fiske, a lawyer representing Mr. Freeman, couldn't be reached for comment.  Lawrence Pedowitz, a lawyer representing Goldman Sachs, declined comment.  Benito Romano, Manhattan U.S. Attorney, couldn't be reached.  The people familiar with the agreement said Goldman Sachs itself won't have to admit to any criminal activity as part of the settlement, in much the same way that Kidder Peabody & Co. escaped criminal liability for the admitted felonies of its former top takeover strategist, Martin Siegel, who implicated Mr. Freeman in a wide-ranging insider-trading scheme.  Like Kidder, Goldman Sachs, as part of the settlement with the U.S. Attorney's office, will agree to settle related Securities and Exchange Commission charges.  Also arrested with Mr. Freeman in February 1987 were Richard Wigton, another Kidder Peabody official, and Timothy Tabor, who also worked in Kidder Peabody's arbitrage department.  People familiar with recent discussions between lawyers for Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor said the government is expected to drop its continuing investigation of them.  Lawyers for Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor couldn't be reached for comment.  People familiar with the negotiations described the sweeping convictions of Jay Regan and his colleagues in Princeton/Newport Partners as an impetus for Mr. Freeman's decision to negotiate.  Those convictions indicated that juries weren't as baffled by complicated financial cases as many defense lawyers had thought, and Mr. Freeman may have feared that Mr. Regan, a close friend and former college classmate, would attempt to further implicate Mr. Freeman in an effort to enhance his own posture at sentencing.  The settlement is likely to be viewed as a favorable one for both Mr. Freeman and Goldman Sachs, given the four felony counts Mr. Freeman faced in an earlier indictment that was dismissed in May 1987.  Still, any admission of guilt is likely to prove embarrassing for Goldman Sachs, which has repeatedly and vigorously asserted Mr. Freeman's innocence, often pointing to its own internal investigation that the firm said exonerated its head of arbitrage.  Any agreement to plead guilty would also corroborate the testimony of Mr. Siegel, who is still awaiting sentencing.  Jed Rakoff, attorney for Mr. Siegel, declined comment.  If the agreement is concluded, it will cap another chapter in the ongoing saga of corruption on Wall Street.  The February 1987 arrests of Messrs.  Freeman, Tabor and Wigton, in full view of the firms where they worked, electrified a Wall Street already skittish from the Dennis Levine scandal and the Boesky confessions.  The agreement with Mr. Freeman should deflect at least some of the criticism aimed at former U.S. Attorney Rudolph W. Giuliani after the government in May 1987 dropped its indictment of Messrs.  Freeman, Tabor and Wigton, saying it wasn't ready to proceed with the case.  Nonetheless, if as expected Messrs.  Wigton and Tabor aren't charged, Mr. Giuliani is likely to undergo renewed criticism during his current campaign for New York City mayor because of his decision in 1987 to have Mr. Wigton handcuffed and to keep Mr. Tabor in jail overnight without having prepared a stronger case.  The three had been charged with conspiracy and mail, wire and securities fraud.  The indictment alleged unlawful trading in the stocks of Unocal Corp. and Storer Communications Inc.  The government had indicated then that it would seek an expanded indictment that would charge illegal trading in stocks of at least nine companies involved in about a dozen major takeover-related transactions.  But a second indictment never came, despite repeated promises from the Manhattan U.S. Attorney's office that indictments would be filed.  Twelve Japanese and foreign concerns have received Tokyo Stock Exchange licenses to begin trading in government-bond futures, while another four non-Japanese units have been approved for local stock-index futures dealings, both beginning Oct. 2.  The approvals were widely expected since the applications were submitted earlier this year.  An exchange official said 12 concerns were approved for government bond futures trading.  The non-Japanese companies were WestDeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale's Westlb Securities Pacific unit, of West Germany; Credit Lyonnais Finanz Agzuerich, of France; CRT Group Ltd.'s CRT Japan unit, of Chicago; and Credit Suisse of Switzerland.  Four foreign securities firms, Credit Lyonnais Finanz Agzuerich; Bankers Trust New York Corp.'s BT Asia Securities subsidiary, of Hong Kong; Chemical Banking Corp.'s Chemical New York Capital Market Corp. unit; and CRT Japan, were approved for stock-index futures trading.  The Canadian government will encounter stiff opposition from some western provinces if it tries to give federal regulators authority over provincial government-owned telephone utilities, provincial officials warned.  The officials were commenting on a Canadian Supreme Court ruling Monday that gave the federal government jurisdiction over Canada's telephone companies but provisionally excluded three western provinces from the decision.  A federal agency currently regulates telephone companies in Ontario, Quebec and British Columbia.  But telephone utilities in the other seven provinces have been regulated by provincial government agencies.  Federal officials said the Supreme Court ruling indicated that investor-owned telephone utilities in the eastern provinces of Newfoundland, Prince Edward Island, New Brunswick and Nova Scotia will now require regulation by the federal regulator, the Canadian Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission.  The court, however, ruled that the telephone companies in Manitoba, Saskatchewan and Alberta -- because they are government-owned -- have "crown immunity" from existing federal telecommunications legislation.  Provincial officials said these western provinces would oppose any unilateral move by the federal government to lift the crown immunity.  The fragmented regulatory system has been a major hurdle for proposed competition in the long-distance telephone business.  Western provinces have opposed such competition because of concern they would lose long-distance revenues that subsidize their local telephone service.  The Information Technology Association of Canada, which represents major telecommunications users and suppliers, said the Supreme Court ruling "opened the door" to an efficient single-tier regulatory system.  It urged the government to introduce in Parliament as soon as possible a bill that would lift the immunity of the three western utilities from federal regulation.  The Supreme Court said that such action would be constitutional.  The federal government, however, indicated it will move cautiously on the matter to avoid a political fight with the provinces.  "I will be interested in hearing the views of my provincial counterparts as to how we can best organize the future regulation of telecommunications in Canada," said federal Communications Minister Marcel Masse.  The minister, however, is a strong advocate of a more streamlined regulatory system.  The current arrangement makes it "extremely time-consuming and costly" for anyone trying to offer telecommunications services across Canada, he said.  The court challenge to the existing system arose from a 1982 application by CNCP Telecommunications for access to the Alberta telephone system operated by Albert Government Telephones.  CNCP Telecommunications is owned 60% by Canadian Pacific Ltd., a Montreal-based industrial and resource concern, and 40% by Rogers Communications Inc., a Toronto-based communications company.  SOLIDARITY WON enough support to form a Polish government led by Walesa.  A resolution calling for Solidarity to form a government under the union chief's leadership was approved by the United Peasant Party and the Democratic Party, which had long been part of the Communist-led governing coalition.  Solidarity and the two minor parties control a majority of the votes in the Parliament, but it wasn't clear whether the Communists would relinquish control.  Walesa hurried to Warsaw for debate on the resolution, but later cast doubt on whether he would agree to serve as premier.  A Soviet spokesman said Walesa's promise not to disrupt the Warsaw Pact was "sensible," adding that Moscow wouldn't interfere in Polish affairs.  ---  BUSH RULED OUT any warming of relations with Cuba barring political reform.  The president, in Miami to campaign for the Republican candidate for the late Claude Pepper's House seat, said relations cannot be improved until Castro "stops swimming against the tide" of political reform among Soviet-bloc allies.  The U.S. severed relations with Havana in 1961.  Bush said an end of support for revolution in neighboring nations, more openness and more freedom would constitute signs of reform by Cuba.  Bush didn't mention the case of Orlando Bosch, an anti-Castro Cuban accused of terrorism.  U.S. deportation efforts have set off a furor in Miami.  ---  Lebanon's Christian commander said he "welcomes" a U.N. Security Council call for a cease-fire in five months of fighting between Christian and Moslem forces that has cost more than 700 lives.  Syria, however, remained silent on the U.N. proposal as its troops tightened a blockade around the Christian enclave north of Beirut.  ---  The Soviet leadership rejected as unconstitutional an Estonian law denying some Russian residents of the Baltic republic the right to vote.  Gorbachev and other members of the Supreme Soviet Presidium said the law's restrictions "violate human rights."  Non-Estonian workers, however, vowed to continue strikes protesting the law.  ---  A Stealth bomber test flight was cut short after about an hour when a gauge indicated low oil pressure in an accessory drive for the $530 million plane's hydraulic systems.  The flight, which was to last for three to four hours, was the second for the controversial radar-evading bomber.  The Air Force called the problem "minor."  ---  Britain and Argentina held direct diplomatic talks for the first time since the 1982 war over the Falkland Islands.  London said the two days of talks, being held at an undisclosed location in New York, were intended to establish a basis for future discussions and wouldn't address questions of sovereignty over the South Atlantic islands.  ---  East Germany issued a strong protest to West Germany, saying relations between the two would suffer if Bonn did not stop sheltering East German refugees in its diplomatic missions.  Meanwhile, Hungary gave permission for a tent city to be erected to relieve overcrowding by East German refugees at Bonn's consulate in Budapest.  ---  Pakistan's foreign minister arrived in Tehran for talks with Iranian leaders about the fate of Western hostages in Lebanon.  The Pakistani official is to travel next to Syria.  Separately, Austrian President Waldheim's office said it had received a message from President Assad of Syria saying he is seeking release of the hostages.  ---  South Korea accused North Korea of "provocative acts" in allowing a student from the south to cross the demilitarized zone after an illegal visit to the north to promote reunification.  The student, Im Su Kyong, was hospitalized following her arrest Tuesday and is to be released to the custody of a South Korean intelligence agency.  ---  Israel's Sharon received an official invitation to visit Soviet Georgia and is expected to become the first Israeli minister to visit the Soviet Union since Moscow severed relations in 1967 over the Arab-Israeli war.  Sharon, minister for trade and industry and a member of the right-wing Likud bloc, is expected to visit the Soviet republic soon.  ---  Iran's parliament elected Mehdi Karrubi, an anti-Western cleric who has been a leader in the movement to spread Iran's fundamentalist revolution, as its new speaker.  He succeeds Hashemi Rafsanjani, who resigned to assume the presidency.  ---  West Germany indicted three computer pirates suspected of giving the Soviet Union information from military and industrial computers world-wide.  Bonn called the breakup of the ring, which gave the KGB secret data from the U.S. and 11 other nations, a "major blow" to the Soviets.  The three West Germans were arrested in March.  ---  Died: Robert B. Anderson, 79, former Treasury secretary, Monday, in New York, of complications from cancer surgery.  United Grain Growers, a major farmers' cooperative, said it reduced its estimate of Canada's Prairie-region grain crop by 12% because of hot, dry weather in recent weeks.  The Prairies, which include the provinces of Alberta, Saskatchewan, and Manitoba, account for most of Canada's grain output.  Harvesting of Prairie grain crops is in its early stages.  United Grain Growers estimated this year's crop of wheat, barley and other major grains would total 44 million metric tons, down from an earlier estimated 50 million tons.  A metric ton equals 2,204.6 pounds.  Last year's drought-hit Prairie crop totaled 30.9 million tons.  The cooperative estimated this year's wheat crop at 24.1 million tons, down from an earlier predicted 27.9 million tons.  A ton of wheat equals 36.74 bushels.  The barley crop was estimated at 11.7 million tons, down from an earlier predicted 13.5 million tons.  Barley is Canada's main feed grain.  General Electric Co. and the state of Rhode Island were named in a lawsuit filed on behalf of a 15-year-old girl who claims she was sexually abused at an adolescent rehabilitation facility that GE inherited in its 1986 acquisition of RCA Corp.  The suit, filed yesterday in Rhode Island state court here, is the latest in a series of suits by former residents of the GE Evaluation and Treatment Center in Cranston, R.I.  The suits accuse staffers of misdeeds including illegal confinement and mistreatment.  Attorneys representing GE at the Washington, D.C., law firm of Williams & Connolly couldn't be reached for comment, and a spokesman for GE said he couldn't discuss any of the allegations.  But the spokesman said GE stopped operating the facility June 30 when its contract expired.  He also said contracts for two similar facilities in Pennsylvania that GE also acquired from RCA also expired June 30 and weren't renewed.  RCA was awarded a contract in 1982 to operate the Rhode Island facility, whose purpose was to care for abused and wayward children with a history of severe emotional problems.  The first suits were filed in 1984 against RCA by three boys alleging they were illegally imprisoned at the center, among other things.  GE settled those suits in February for an undisclosed amount.  In May and early August, two young women filed suits alleging emotional and physical abuse at the center.  Six other former residents have sued in the past few months to obtain their treatment records, which they claim GE has refused to give them.  Two employees of the center were indicted earlier this year by a Rhode Island grand jury on charges of sexual abuse.  "The victimization of children is especially egregious when the institutions purporting to help them conquer the impact of abuse become the abusers," said Patricia Hurst, a lawyer at the Providence law firm of D'Amico & Hurst who represents several of the plaintiffs.  "The kids come in and tell us these outrageous stories, and we get the records and find out it's worse," she said.  Ms. Hurst criticized both RCA and GE for allegedly lax supervision of the facility.  GE, she said, should have known there were problems when it took over the contract.  The state of Rhode Island, which pays for certain building costs and food at the center, signed a consent order in 1984 in response to complaints about the mistreatment of 12 children.  The state agreed, among other things, that punishments would not include solitary confinement or the deprivation of clothing.  Bolt Beranek & Newman Inc., citing inventory write-downs and restructuring costs, reported a loss of $22.7 million for the fiscal fourth quarter ended June 30.  In the year-earlier quarter, the computer, communications and consulting concern earned $5.1 million, or 27 cents a share.  Sales fell 7% to $71.9 million in the fourth quarter from $77.4 million a year earlier.  For the fiscal year, the company posted a net loss of $25.1 million, including a gain of $6.4 million from an accounting change.  In fiscal 1988, the company earned $18.1 million, or 96 cents a share.  Sales fell 4% to $291.6 million from $305.2 million in fiscal 1988.  The fourth-quarter loss stemmed partly from lower-than-expected hardware sales, the company said.  As a result of the lower sales, the company wrote down $16 million of inventory during the fiscal year, about half of which was recorded in the fourth quarter, Bolt Beranek said.  Additionally, the company said it had a fourth-quarter restructuring charge of $5.1 million related to the consolidation of its manufacturing operations and of certain facilities of its BBN Communications Corp. unit.  The company earlier reported that "operating difficulties" at the unit were contributing to its poor financial results in fiscal 1989.  The company said its fiscal-year loss included charges of $11 million as a result of cost overruns associated with a contract to install a computer reservations system for Japan Air Lines.  Also, the company "incurred significant costs" associated with introduction of its new TC2000 high performance computer, Bolt Beranek said.  A Quebec Superior Court judge is to make a key ruling Monday morning in the complicated legal battle between two rival bidders for Steinberg Inc., a large food retailing and real estate concern based here.  Superior Court Justice Pierre Tessier said he will rule on Socanav Inc.'s motion to dismiss a request for an interim injunction to block the Montreal-based shipping company's tender offer for Steinberg.  The injunction was requested by Oxdon Investments Inc., which is owned by three companies including Unicorp Canada Corp. and which has made its own offer for Steinberg.  Both offers expire Tuesday.  Justice Tessier refused to grant a temporary restraining order that would have prohibited Socanav from taking up Steinberg shares before the judge rules on the motion to dismiss the request for an interim injunction.  Oxdon requested the temporary order, because it said that under Quebec securities regulations, Socanav could begin taking up shares deposited under its offer as early as Saturday.  But Socanav said that according to the terms of its offer, it won't take up shares before its bid expires Tuesday.  Oxdon is offering 75 Canadian dollars (US$63.56) a Steinberg common share and C$53 a Steinberg Class A share for all the shares it doesn't already own.  Socanav also is offering C$75 for each Steinberg common share, and C$51 for each Class A share.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Steinberg Class A shares closed at C$50.25, down 25 Canadian cents.  In Montreal Exchange trading, Socanav shares closed at C$5.75, up 12.5 Canadian cents.  Dozens of AIDS activists will press their case for broader distribution of experimental drugs before senior U.S. health officials today.  At stake is the "parallel-track" proposal of Anthony S. Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases.  Dr. Fauci has urged adoption of a two-track system for granting access to experimental drugs to people who don't qualify as test subjects.  Volunteers are frequently denied a space in a clinical trial because their condition and specific symptoms don't match strict test requirements for entry.  Some have taken too many prior medications, while others don't live near enough to research institutions conducting a clinical trial.  "Sometimes the design of a classical drug trial seems very cold and aloof," Dr. Fauci acknowledged at a meeting with AIDS clinicians and activists last month.  At least one company, Bristol-Myers Co., has said it plans to make its promising AIDS drug DDI available to patients in critical need, even as the drug enters trials to determine its effectiveness next month.  However, officials of the Department of Health and Human Services so far have not come to an agreement on a "parallel track" distribution program.  Expense and liability, as well as entry criteria, are details on which officials haven't been able to reach a consensus.  As a preface to today's meeting in Bethesda, Md., activists have sought to hammer out preliminary agreement on some of the details.  A consensus statement signed by the American Foundation for AIDS Research and 16 other activist groups was sent to Louis Sullivan, secretary of Health and Human Services, and other government officials.  The document urges that access to the "parallel track" be accorded to all patients for whom there is no standard treatment, or for whom the standard treatment has failed or proven too toxic.  People also should be included who must remain on medications that exclude them from test participation, it argues.  In addition, it says people who live too far from a test site, or who are too sick to participate in a controlled trial, should be given equal access.  Closely held Rice Aircraft Inc. and its chief executive officer admitted to refinishing surplus airplane parts and then passing them off as factory-fresh.  Guilty pleas to a variety of criminal charges were entered in U.S. district court in Seattle, where the U.S. attorney's office is leading a nationwide government task force that's looking into counterfeit aircraft components.  Criminal charges were also filed yesterday against three others as a result of the probe, which is centering on the manufacturers and suppliers of aerospace fasteners -- essentially high-tech nuts and bolts that hold planes together.  The investigation received widespread attention in February when it was learned that a unit of Fairchild Industries Inc. had been raided by the task force.  Attorneys for Rice Aircraft, based in Hauppauge, N.Y., stressed -- and government prosecutors acknowledged -- that there appears to be no threat to air safety because of the company's actions.  But Bruce Carter, the assistant U.S. attorney handling the case, said Rice's conduct "really subverts the technical integrity of the aerospace industry."  Rice Aircraft distributed fasteners to a broad range of airplane builders -- "a virtual Who's Who of international aerospace," Mr. Carter termed the list, which includes the Israeli government, Airbus Industrie, Boeing Co., Grumman Corp., Martin Marietta Corp. and a number of airlines.  Court records show that some of the parts were purchased for military aircraft, such as the F-111 and F-14 fighters and the B-1B bomber.  Bruce J. Rice, the company's 42-year-old president, confessed to paying off both vendors and customers in return for certain favors.  For instance, he admitted giving a Grumman official up to $200 a week so business would be steered toward Rice Aircraft at the expense of its competitors.  He also admitted to giving "kickbacks" to a Boeing subsidiary manager in return for "the last look" at rivals' secret bids.  Richard K. Ohlman, who worked for Rice Aircraft, was charged yesterday with being the middleman in the Boeing transactions.  He declined to comment.  Yet at the heart of Rice Aircraft's illicit practices, according to court documents, was its procurement of surplus fasteners that it would strip, replate and turn around and sell as originals.  "It was like taking a Model-T and polishing it up to look like a 1989 Ford," Mr. Carter contended.  Records indicate, moreover, that the company paid fastener makers for test reports, arbitrarily assigning them to untested parts.  Mr. Rice, according to his statement of admission, "then knowingly used these test reports to misrepresent to certain fastener" buyers that the company's inventory could be traced to a properly inspected lot.  Mr. Rice faces up to five years in prison and has agreed to pay a fine and costs of prosecution of $500,000.  In addition, he may be required to pay an additional fine of up to $250,000 and restitution of as much as $1 million.  Rice Aircraft has agreed to pay a $50,000 fine and also faces a restitution claim of up to $1 million.  Despite pleading guilty, Mr. Rice's attorney insisted the only reason his client agreed to accept the charges was the threat by the U.S. attorney of invoking federal racketeering laws.  Under them, he said, Mr. Rice's assets could have been frozen, "preventing the defendants from hiring . . . counsel."  Dan Dubitzky, the lawyer, maintained that all the specific violations admitted to by Mr. Rice "were technical" or "committed under duress."  He said, for example, that Rice Aircraft made the wrongful payments "in direct response to threats by employees of both customers and manufacturers" to delay orders and otherwise disrupt service.  Apparently, those who received money from Rice Aircraft cooperated in the government's investigation and therefore won't be indicted.  Additional charges were filed yesterday in a separate, but generally related case.  Two former Boeing employees, John J. Rockwood and Richard K. Watson, were accused of conspiring with Southeast Connectors Inc., Miami, to give that company a peek at bids made to Boeing by competitors.  Neither man could be reached.  Southeast Connectors and two top executives were convicted last year of obtaining the bidding information from Messrs.  Rockwood and Watson.  A federal judge ruled that New York can require auto makers to provide basic warranties of 24 months or 18,000 miles for new vehicles sold in the state.  Two groups representing U.S. and foreign auto makers had argued that the so-called lemon law was unconstitutional because it regulates business outside New York and opens the door to inconsistent rules by the states.  The auto makers claimed that higher costs caused by such laws would probably result in price increases nationwide.  Judge Leonard B. Sand of the U.S. district court in Manhattan, however, said the warranty requirements are constitutional.  He also said, "There is no reason to believe that the few manufacturers affected by the {lemon law} will not do what logic dictates and continue to pass along the added costs to the consumers who benefit from the statute, namely those who purchase and register their cars in New York."  Already, General Motors Corp. and Ford Motor Co. add a surcharge to their auto prices in New York to cover the cost of complying with the lemon law.  But the judge invalidated one aspect of the warranty requirement: He said New York can't require out-of-state dealers to send auto makers written notice of owners' complaints.  William Stein, an attorney for the Motor Vehicle Manufacturers Association of the U.S. and the Automobile Importers of America Inc., said the trade groups haven't decided whether to appeal.  Intel Corp., citing lower-than-expected sales of certain computer chips, said its earnings in the third quarter may fall from the previous quarter.  Intel originally projected higher earnings.  Many securities analysts, despite a general slump in the chip industry, also expected Intel to be protected by healthy demand for its microprocessor chips among makers of high-performance desktop computers.  In a routine update in earnings projections, Intel told analysts that its net income will be "flat to down" from the previous quarter, a spokeswoman said, while revenue will be flat to slightly up.  Intel had net of $99.3 million, or 53 cents a share, on revenue of $747.3 million in the quarter ended July 1.  Still, most analysts said Intel's woes aren't too serious.  "We have here what appears to be a short-term problem," said Andrew Neff, an analyst at Bear Stearns & Co. Mr. Neff lowered his estimate for Intel's third-quarter earnings to 50 cents a share from 59 cents.  But Mr. Neff and other analysts pointed to the Intel chip's profound popularity among computer makers.  Intel "has a lock on a product when the market is moving in its direction," Mr. Neff said.  Intel's shares closed yesterday at $28.875 in national over-the-counter trading, down $1.375.  Intel blamed the earnings revision on slowing sales of its 80386 microprocessor, which is increasingly used as the "brains" of today's most powerful desktop computers.  "The growth is less rapid than expected," an Intel spokeswoman said.  Also contributing to the outlook, she said, were start-up costs associated with a line of computers that Intel plans to start shipping in the current quarter and costs of preparing for mass shipments of the company's new 80486 chip in the fourth quarter.  Last week, the Semiconductor Industry Association announced that a key indicator of the industry's health, the book-to-bill ratio, was showing a decline.  Other semiconductor companies have attributed lackluster results to seasonal slowness, to rapidly falling chip prices and to flat demand in important sectors such as computers, automobiles and the military.  Analysts expect Intel's earnings to improve in the traditionally strong fourth quarter.  As Intel's product mix shifts later this year toward its new and more powerful microprocessors, its profit margins should improve, said one analyst.  Sales of Intel's 80386 chip also should pick up again, said Eric Jansen, an analyst with Robertson Stephens & Co.  That chip accounts for about 16% of Intel's revenue and as much as 80% of its gross profit margins, he said, and "I don't see any reason to think that this baby's going to fall out of the bed."  Bruce Karatz, president and chief executive officer of Kaufman & Broad Home Corp., a Los Angeles-based home building company, and Ronald P. Spogli, general partner and founder of Freeman Spogli & Co., a Los Angeles merchant banker, were named directors of this discount retailing chain, increasing board membership to seven.  Lonely guys don't have to be good-looking to be sought after, pored over or admired from afar.  All they have to do is change into hiking boots, strike a friendly pose and the women will come running.  At least that's the experience of AlaskaMen, a quarterly publication dedicated to doing something about the solo state of men in the great state of Alaska.  America's last frontier is teeming with bachelors.  About a third of Alaska's 275,000 men are single, outnumbering single women by about 50%.  In some remote camps and settlements, the ratio runs as high as 35 to 1.  Such lopsided odds can mean large-scale loneliness.  For Susie Carter, mother of nine, these lonely guys represented opportunity.  As operator of an Anchorage day-care center, she had listened for years to single fathers asking her to fix them up with dates.  So in 1987, she took her husband's $30,000 retirement account and started AlaskaMen magazine, which she aimed at women readers in the Lower 48 states.  Each issue features quarter-page to full-page profiles -- and mailing addresses -- of about 60 Alaskan bachelors.  One bachelor, Richard Donovan, was described as "a modern day Davy Crockett."  The former New Jersey resident is a 45-year-old deer skinner who has a keen interest in black powder rifles.  Reader response to the rugged bachelors has been gratifyingly quick and direct.  Women from all over send gifts, letters, cards, photos and video recordings to the men they read about.  Some have left their homes and jobs and headed toward the Arctic Circle to seek their dreamboats in person.  So far, the magazine claims credit for 30 marriages and engagements, including Mrs. Carter's father.  Mrs. Carter, a peppy 46-year-old who describes herself as "a modern-day matchmaker," says she believes women yearn for traditional men and homespun values.  That is why AlaskaMen will never be confused with Playgirl.  AlaskaMen bans beefcake in favor of what it calls "moosecake" -- page after glossy page of wholesome snapshots of men fishing or chopping wood or just smiling politely.  Such poses are always true to character, Mrs. Carter contends.  "Alaskans are risk-takers.  They're individuals.  They're rugged."  Deriding the "pencil-pushing yes-man," presumably all those guys in the wimpier states, the magazine promotes typical Alaska men as "a breed apart . . . the men of whom legend is made."  Lately, these breeds apart are a bit overwhelmed.  Greg Wilson, the June issue's centerfold (he posed in hiking garb in the wilderness with a backpack and an apple), says he has received more than 400 letters -- and cookies, camping supplies, balloons and other gifts.  Mr. Wilson, a 33-year-old sporting-goods store manager in Anchorage, says one woman who couldn't afford to send him flowers sent a photograph of flowers instead.  Brad Webb, a former pipefitter featured in March, says he has received more than 700 letters; another bachelor boasts about getting 1,000.  "It probably did more to raise my self-esteem than anything in the last 20 years," says Bill Park, an engineering consultant who landed 200 responses and a fiancee.  Mrs. Carter says she is even prouder of the less-attractive bachelors.  One man she describes as "homely" got 12 responses and went to her home in tears to thank her for changing his life.  "He thought he would be humiliated, but he realized he was sought after," she says.  He married one of the women who wrote to him.  Some subscribers go to great lengths to pursue sub-zero romance.  Linda Brender was a Chicago sales executive making $50,000 a year when she looked at her first copy of AlaskaMen in July 1987.  One month later, she sold all her furnishings and new sports car to move to Talkeetna, at the foot of Mount McKinley, where she lives in a trailer near the man who won her heart, a diesel mechanic named Joe Watson.  "I heard about a new breed of men in Alaska, so I decided to take a vacation out there and see," the fast-talking Ms. Brender says, laughing as she recalls her derring-do.  "I sound like such a ditzy blonde when I say that, but it's true."  Mr. Watson, a burly, bearded 45-year-old, was decidedly less optimistic at the time: "I thought she was just some crazy Chicago female."  Ms. Brender, 35, complains that "there are too many mansy-pansy men."  She says she is attracted to Mr. Watson, former president of the Talkeetna Bachelors Society, because he is "real."  Mr. Watson cites another trait: "I don't paw women."  But Ms. Brender hasn't given up all links to her former life; she has held onto her Chicago job by managing accounts on the telephone, perhaps because her future is still uncertain.  "She keeps trying to get a ring on my finger," Mr. Watson says.  "But I'm not one to run into these things hastily."  Many Alaskan men say they are moved by the extent of loneliness among women in the Lower 48.  Mr. Park heard from several women who wanted to start life over again in Alaska.  Two Dallas schoolteachers sent him a videotape of themselves and told him, "If you don't like what you see, pass it along to your buddies."  One "desperate and dateless" Minnesota woman wrote that she simply wanted someone -- anyone -- to send her three plane tickets to Alaska for herself and her two kids.  Many others have called Mr. Park in the middle of the night, drunk.  Terry Logan, information and publications coordinator for the Anchorage Chamber of Commerce, says that requests from single women for information about moving to Alaska have gone up 25% to 50% since AlaskaMen began publication, with especially strong interest from women in Texas and California.  "Women are still looking for a bit of the old days," concludes Mr. Park, "and I think Alaska is what America was."  Mostly, the magazine is sold on newsstands.  Out of an average print-run of 135,000, about 10,000 go to subscribers (for $22 a year) in all 50 states and places as far away as Africa and China, while 125,000 are delivered to newsstands, and priced at $5.95 an issue.  Next month, the magazine plans a 12-state promotional tour, hauling about 150 Alaska bachelors as far as Miami, Fla.  In the works are an AlaskaMen Caribbean cruise, a syndicated television show and the second annual AlaskaMen calendar.  In January, the publisher hopes to transform her magazine into "AlaskaMen U.S.A.," expanding distribution to 500,000 copies with regional inserts.  For those women whose ideal man comes with a more temperate climate, Mrs. Carter plans to offer alternative publications beginning next year: AussieMen, BlackMen, CanadianMen, SilverMen (older bachelors) and JewishMen.  Notes Mrs. Carter, "We've had so much interest from Jewish mothers."  The Philippine bank debt settlement underlines how the Bush administration is now re-emphasizing the importance of continued bank lending to address the international debt problem.  When Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady set out the administration's strategy in March, he emphasized cutting debt and interest payments over new lending.  His approach supplanted the so-called Baker strategy devised by then-Treasury Secretary James Baker in the fall of 1985, which stressed continued bank lending and efforts to restore the creditworthiness of developing nations in international capital markets.  The proposed Philippine debt settlement that Philippine central bank Gov. Jose "Jobo" Fernandez and a committee of banks headed by Manufacturers Hanover Corp. agreed to Tuesday relies primarily on continued lending.  The new credit, which the Philippines will raise through issuing bonds to participating bank creditors, could total as much as $1.2 billion.  Its size will depend on what banks voluntarily choose to contribute to the borrowing, bankers said, but it is unlikely to amount to less than $700 million.  "It's a half-way house to the voluntary {credit} market," said David L. Pflug, the Manufacturers Hanover senior vice president who heads the bankers' committee that negotiates with the Philippines.  "New money will be bigger than debt reduction," said a banker close to the debt negotiations.  He added that the settlement should also have the side effect of helping Mexico raise the new loans it requires.  In recent weeks Mexico reached the first proposed settlement under the Brady strategy.  It placed more emphasis on cutting back debt and interest payments than the Philippine agreement does.  The Philippine settlement will include provisions for cutting back debt -- initially, at least, through the buying back of past bank loans.  The amount of money available for reducing debt and debt service isn't finally set; it could total as much as $1.5 billion, including about $500 million from the World Bank, about $420 million from the International Monetary Fund and about $600 million from Japan.  Mr. Fernandez met with IMF and World Bank officials and is set to visit Tokyo soon to complete arrangements for the funds.  The money for debt-reduction and debt service-reduction could be spent over several years, and some of it could be used for purposes other than debt reduction.  The Philippines eventually may try other debt-reduction techniques besides buying back debt once it has negotiated other matters with its bank creditors, a senior Treasury official said.  "The whole package is innovative," said a senior Treasury official, rejecting the suggestion that the Philippine settlement represents a return to the traditional Baker strategy.  "It combines debt buybacks with new money."  This official also noted that the Philippines has about $7.3 billion of medium-term and long-term commercial bank loans, suggesting the nation has less need for debt reduction than some other developing nations.  Mr. Brady said in a statement that "the new financing package demonstrates the versatility of the strengthened debt strategy" and its ability to resolve debt problems on "a case-by-case basis."  He said the package is expected to promote "significant debt reduction" as well as considerable new lending.  Mexico and its major bank creditors last month tentatively agreed to a debt settlement covering $54 billion of foreign bank debt.  That accord offers creditors three options: exchanging existing loans for new 'par' bonds that carry a lower rate of interest; swapping credits for new bonds with a discount of 35% on their principal value or continuing to lend further funds.  Bankers eagerly noted that the Philippine agreement is more "voluntary" than the Mexico settlement.  The Philippine accord, unlike the Mexico package, wasn't the result of intense outside political pressure.  And it doesn't impose terms for debt reduction or fix formulas for new credit.  The Philippines, which has about $28 billion of foreign debt -- about half of it owed to foreign banks -- is doing relatively well economically.  Its economy is growing at an inflation-adjusted rate of more than 5% a year.  The bonds the Philippines will issue to raise new bank financing will carry an interest rate of 13/16ths of a percentage point over the London Interbank Offered Rate, or Libor, and have a maturity of 15 years, with an eight-year grace period before principal repayments begin, according to a senior Treasury official.  Libor is the rate banks charge one another for borrowings in the London market.  The new bonds will be listed on the Luxembourg stock exchange.  W.H. Smith Group PLC, a British book and home products retailer, reported a 27% rise in full-year pretax profit, boosted by the addition of a slew of new or acquired retail outlets and a one-time property profit of #5.6 million ($8.8 million).  For the year ended June 3, profit before tax climbed to #89.7 million ($141.7 million) from #70.4 million ($111.2 million) in the year-earlier period, and at the top end of market forecasts that ranged between #85 million and #90 million.  Convenient Food Mart Inc. said it agreed to settle a $100 million lawsuit brought against it by franchisees in northern Ohio.  The agreement gives franchisees more say in use of fees they pay for advertising.  It also furnishes the option to hire their own bookkeepers, rather than using the company's system.  Last April, franchisees representing about 130 Convenient stores in northern Ohio filed a federal suit in Cleveland, claiming that Convenient's liquidity problems last year prompted it to defraud them of funds and benefits.  The franchisees charged the company with fraud, breach of contract and breach of fiduciary duty, and sought compensatory and punitive damages of $100 million, plus triple damages under federal anti-racketeering laws.  The liquidity crunch last year resulted from the company's costly purchases of regional territories in recent years.  Early this year, the company restated its 1987 financial results, resulting in a $6.3 million loss.  The company belatedly reported a $6.2 millon loss for the first nine months of last year, but hasn't filed any financial statements since.  Richard Harper, Convenient's chief executive officer, said the company will report losses for this year's first nine months, though they'll be less than last year's.  The losses last year prompted the Ohio franchisees to seek legal safeguards in the event that the struggling company files for protection under federal bankruptcy laws.  Thus, the settlement also provides that, in event of bankruptcy, franchisees could avert being evicted from their stores by taking over lease payments from Convenient.  Mr. Harper said Convenient doesn't intend to file for bankruptcy.  Recruited as the company's president earlier this year, he added, "I'm hired not to go bankrupt."  Ah, the Club Med vacation.  Beautiful women and handsome men frolicking in the sun.  That's the image Club Med has long evoked in its advertising, but now the resort operator is about to dump that campaign and replace it with ads featuring just plain folks.  The problem, Club Med executives say, is that its slick, award-winning campaign has helped advance an image the company has desperately been trying to shed: Many travelers still think that Club Med is little more than a romping sex camp for yuppies.  The new campaign, scheduled to make its TV debut next month during the U.S. Open tennis tournament on CBS, shows a host of ordinary people relaxing at the Club.  Emphasis here is on the flexibility of a Club Med vacation.  The sexy models, Club Med executives say, are taking a back seat.  For Club Med, there's a lot at stake.  In the face of increasing competition in the travel industry, the company has seen the number of North American visitors to its villages plateau and even drop off slightly after years of impressive growth.  It reached its peak in 1986, when 220,000 guests were entertained; last year, 218,100 spent vacations there.  Club Med executives say all they need is for travelers to try it once: It boasts that 47% of those who do return within two years.  "We just haven't effectively communicated to the masses what Club Med is all about," says Bob Schu, Club Med's executive vice president of marketing.  "We don't want people to be intimidated from going to Club Med simply because they don't look like the people in our commercials."  But that's exactly what the campaign did.  Introduced in the early 1980s, the print and television ads dripped with sensuality and double entendre.  A typical print ad showed a sleek model in a skimpy maillot languishing in a chaise lounge.  The copy: "No Standing 7 a.m.-7 p.m."  The print ads have been so popular, in fact, that enlarged versions are sold to visitors through the Club's newsletter.  Club Med's new campaign, created by the same ad agency, Ammirati & Puris, puts clothes back on many of its subjects.  And instead of dreamy shots of beautiful sunsets, the TV spots focus on all the things people can do at a Club Med resort.  In "Ed & Nancy Vick's Club Med Vacation," a father and daughter play petanque (a game similiar to bocce ball) and later read together on the beach.  In "Joe & Meri Duffy's Club Med Vacation," a couple in their 50s relax by a waterfall, play golf and then stroll on the beach.  In "Ed Crowne's Club Med Vacation," a chubby guy in his 40s is shown munching on lobster, cake and other sumptuous-looking food.  Between the various TV and print ads there are so many names that the agency used names of Ammirati employees to avoid contractual and legal tangles.  Ed Vick, for example, is the agency's president.  Near the end of one spot, an announcer says: "A lot of people come to Club Med.  But no one has the same vacation."  Another spot's line: "What's Club Med?  It's whatever makes you happy."  All of the ads conclude with Club Med's well-known tagline, "The Antidote for Civilization."  "We're trying to assure travelers that all different types of people really are at Club Med today," says Mary Herrmann, senior vice president at Ammirati.  "You can send anybody down there at this point, and they'll have a terrific time."  The ads do introduce real people into Club Med's advertising, but in fact Ammirati hasn't trashed all the good-lookers: Even the middle-agers look better than most you run into on the street.  But questions remain as to whether Club Med, which has advanced its swinger's image for years, will ever be able to shake the rap.  Because of the nature of its vacations, Club Med isn't the first destination choice for many people.  Some are turned off by the opening day rah-rah session when guests are greeted.  Others aren't crazy about the idea of sharing a room or following certain Club Med traditions like paying for drinks with special beads.  Mr. Schu says the Club has relaxed many of those rules in an attempt to get more people on the beach.  It was recently decided, for example, to give visitors the option of having their own room -- for a fee.  And he says that, as of Nov. 1, each room will be equipped with a lock on the door and a safety-deposit box for valuables (none previously had either).  "Times have changed," Mr. Schu says.  "That's what they {consumers} want."  Voit Gilmore, president of the American Society of Travel Agents, says many travelers have the wrong impression about Club Med.  He notes it's possible to take a Club Med vacation and "go off and be by yourself."  Even so, travel agents haven't completely abandoned the stereotype.  At Mr. Gilmore's agency, for example, many Club Med promotions have been targeted to "young working girls, nurses and young teachers."  "There is still the broad impression that if you're 21 and have a good figure, you're going to have a whale of a time," he says.  --- Chiat/Day, Drexel Reassess  Drexel Burnham Lambert and ad agency Chiat/Day/Mojo, which blanketed television and the business press with ads extolling the virtues of Drexel's junk bonds, are reassessing their relationship and may part ways.  Drexel has put its print and broadcast advertising plans on hold indefinitely, executives familiar with the company said.  But the two sides differed over whether Drexel currently remains a Chiat/Day client.  "Drexel Burnham is no longer a client of Chiat/Day's, since they are doing no advertising.  It was agreed mutually and amicably by both parties," a spokesman for Chiat/Day/Mojo said.  But a Drexel spokesman said, "They're a terrific agency, they've done superb work for us, and we're now working with them to redefine our strategy.  We're working with the people at the firm."  Steven Friedman, the Chiat/Day group management supervisor who supervised the Drexel account, passed on the question of whether Drexel remains a client, but said, "They're reassessing their advertising needs and what their advertising strategy should be, and the different roles of their agencies."  The beleaguered investment bank spent about $12.5 million in 1988 on ads talking about the do-good works to which its junk bonds contributed, like building playgrounds and helping finance Kinder Care.  Drexel also helped Chiat/Day finance its acquisition of Australia's Mojo earlier this year.  But the investment bank, which in April agreed to pay $650 million as part of a broad settlement related to a federal insider-trading investigation, stopped advertising early this year.  Chiat/Day/Mojo, meanwhile, is one of several agencies pitching for the J.P. Morgan banking business, which industry executives say will bill about $10 million.  The Chiat/Day/Mojo spokesman said the Drexel situation was unrelated to the attempt to win J.P. Morgan's business.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   BOZELL: Bozell opened an office in Sydney, Australia.  The office will be called Bozell Rydge.  It will be headed up by John Rydge, an ad executive who formerly ran his own shop in Sydney.  NEW ACCOUNT: Sunbeam Appliance Co., Milwaukee, a unit of Allegheny International Inc., awarded its estimated $2 million account to Tatham, Laird & Kudner, Chicago.  Chiat/Day/Mojo, Los Angeles, resigned the account in June.  The Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. sold its remaining stake in First City Bancorp. of Texas in a transaction that gave the agency a $17.8 million profit, First City said.  The Houston-based bank holding company said the FDIC exercised its warrant to purchase 1,030,636 shares of First City junior preferred stock for $20.94 a share, then sold the shares through New York-based Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. to investors at the market price of $37 each.  First City also paid the FDIC $1.25 a share, or $1.3 million, for accelerating the exercise date of the warrant from 1993 to yesterday.  First City said it didn't know who all the purchasers of the FDIC's remaining stake were, although it said 400,000 shares were bought by a partnership owned by A. Robert Abboud, First City chairman and chief executive officer, and Frank C. Cihak, vice chairman.  The FDIC's preferred shares automatically converted into common on a one-to-one basis upon the sale to the third parties.  Sea Containers Ltd. said its board rejected a sweetened $63-a-share, or $963 million, tender offer by Stena Holding AG and Tiphook PLC but promised to proceed with a restructuring even if the suitors give up their fight.  The Hamilton, Bermuda-based equipment leasing and shipping company said the board termed the offer inadequate and not in the best interests of the company's shareholders.  The board recommended against holders tendering any of their shares.  It still wouldn't value its own offer.  At the board's direction, the company appointed Goldman, Sachs & Co. as financial adviser to arrange subordinated financing for the recapitalization.  The idea, the company said, is to produce a financially superior alternative to Stena and Tiphook's latest offer.  The company said the recapitalization plan would consist of a substantial cash distribution, freely tradable securities and common shares.  Details will be announced "in sufficient time" for shareholders to make an "informed decision," the company said.  The board also said that it is committed to offering a recapitalization plan even if the two European shipping concerns withdraw their bid.  That helped lift Sea Containers' stock still further.  As it did on Tuesday, the day Gothenburg, Sweden-based Stena and London-based Tiphook raised their bid, the company's stock traded higher than the sweetened bid price.  Sea Containers closed at $68.25 a share, up $1.125, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  But, analysts said, the statement still didn't provide deals of the restructuring plan.  "They dangle all kinds of potential in front of you and they don't give any kind of hard information," said Walter Kirchberger, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc.  He also discounted the promise to proceed with the recapitalization.  "Everything is always subject to market conditions," he said.  Tiphook went further, suggesting that the recapitalization mightn't come to pass.  "There appears to be no recap plan at all," said Eric Goodwin, Tiphook's deputy chairman.  "The market is being misled on the basis that the recap is there."  Roy F. Weston Inc., West Chester, Pa., said the U.S. Department of Energy granted it a $16 million extension to a systems-management contract.  The one-year grant continues a two-year, $29 million base contract the Energy Department has with the environmental consulting concern to provide assistance in running the Office of Civilian Radioactive Waste Management, which is federally mandated to develop a system to safely dispose of nuclear waste.  Weston is helping to evaluate the feasibility of a congressionally proposed waste-burial site in Yucca Mountain, Nev.  The government has the option of extending the contract for two more one-year periods at about $17 million each.  First Union Corp. said it will eliminate 1,500 jobs and close 50 bank branches as it digests its $850 million acquisition of Florida National Banks of Florida Inc.  Bob D. Allen, First Union vice chairman, said that the jobs would be cut over a couple of years and that most of the reductions would be accomplished through attrition.  Those employees whose jobs are cut will be offered severance pay or retraining for other positions, either at First Union or elsewhere, said Mr. Allen.  About 1,200 corporate jobs and 300 branch-banking positions will be eliminated, he said.  Mr. Allen said the super-regional bankholding company is applying techniques learned in previous takeovers.  "We're just putting in standard First Union procedures," he said.  First Union had said at the time of the merger that it anticipated cost cutting, and analysts said the job reductions were in line with what the company had privately said it anticipated several months ago.  Analysts gave the company high marks for making cuts where necessary.  "They don't accept any foolishness when it comes to spending money," said Henry J. Coffey Jr., an analyst at J.C. Bradford & Co. in Nashville, Tenn.  Mr. Allen estimated that First Union would be unable to offer jobs elsewhere in the company to about 100 employees.  But Michael J. Starr, an analyst at Duff & Phelps Inc., Chicago, speculated that the number of effective layoffs probably would be higher.  "A good portion of that 1,500 probably is going to be actually laid off," he said.  For First Union, the acquisition of Florida National will vault it into second place in the go-go Florida banking market, behind Barnett Banks Inc.  The takeover, which is expected to be completed at the end of October or early November, still needs federal regulatory approval.  First Union is expanding in Florida at a particularly competitive time.  In recent months, major banks operating in the state have been forced by a rocky property market to increase provisions for losses in real-estate loans, thereby hurting earnings more than expected.  NCNB Corp. also has made a major marketing drive in Florida, paying premium rates for depositors.  Mr. Allen, though, said none of these things affected his company's decision as to the number of jobs to cut or the number of branches to close.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, First Union closed at $24.50 a share, down 25 cents.  President Bush moved to make sure that companies barred from dealing with one government agency can't deal with another.  That has been the government's policy for some time, but it hasn't always been carried out.  The president issued an order spelling out that a company or person barred from either doing business with or receiving a loan or grant from one government agency is also barred from any of those activities with any other government agency.  Policy had been set forth in a 1982 presidential order applying to contracts and a 1986 order applying to grants, loans and other "nonprocurement" activity.  But it wasn't clear whether a company barred from federal contracting by the Pentagon, for example, could still get a loan guarantee from the Small Business Administration.  In addition, agencies weren't always efficient in getting the word to other agencies when a company was barred.  The new order gives the Office of Management and Budget 18 months to work out differences with existing procurement law and to adopt regulations that would set up machinery for enforcing the policy.  The order was issued as President Bush completed an appearance here before going on vacation in Maine.  Wall Street is betting that the regulatory climate in California is about to brighten for Pacific Telesis Group.  In the next few days, analysts say, the California Public Utilities Commission staff is expected to give preliminary support to a sweeping plan for "incentive regulation" of the telecommunications company, thereby removing a number of restrictions, including the ceiling on profit of its Pacific Bell telephone business.  In exchange, the San Francisco-based company would open some of its monopoly markets to competition.  And it would return to consumers half of any profit that exceeds an agreed-upon rate of return.  Analysts generally believe the proposal will be adopted this fall.  As a result, they predict, Pacific Telesis stock could rise from yesterday's close of 43 1/4 to trade in the neighborhood of $48 to $52 a share within six months -- a jump of 11% to 20% -- as the company's earnings growth returns to healthier levels.  "This action would definitely be positive," Paul G. Aran of Bear Stearns says.  "We expect PacTel's stock price would go up and the company would definitely perform better in terms of earnings."  Ronald Altman, chairman of Altman Brenner Wasserman, a New York research firm, says: "I think this is a done deal.  I don't sense any philosophical objections to an incentive plan."  Since the breakup of the Bell System in 1984, the hard-line, consumer-minded stance of the California commission has been a source of apprehension for Wall Street analysts as they debated Pacific Telesis' long-term prospects.  But last September, there were modest signs that the commission's posture toward the company might be starting to soften.  Pacific Telesis won approval then to reduce its rates on Centrex switchboard services, private lines and custom-calling features, such as call forwarding.  The company viewed this change as vital; many large customers had taken their business elsewhere.  Now the momentum toward regulatory easing appears to be building.  Commission staff members say the agency's preliminary report on the incentive proposal will run about 350 pages, an indication that it will be an affirmative document crammed with implementation details.  Mr. Altman of Altman Brenner says he is convinced the commission "already knows what it wants to do," because its president is a former top aide to California Gov. George Deukmejian, who has gone on record in favor of such incentives.  In exchange for incentive regulation, Pacific Bell is offering to freeze basic residential telephone rates through 1992, extend local calling areas to 12 miles from eight for flat-rate billing, provide touchtone service free of extra charges, and spend as much as $700 million to upgrade its network with digital switches.  The company also wants to raise basic business telephone rates gradually to reflect actual costs, and to gain flexibility to reduce prices for other business services to meet competition.  At the same time, the commission has been considering alternative proposals, by GTE Corp.'s GTE California unit and the commission's ratepayer advocates division, that rates be indexed to inflation and expected productivity increases.  The commission could combine aspects of the different proposals.  All of them have important points in common: They all rely on price caps and on an equal split by the company and consumers of any profits that exceed a certain threshold.  Jack Grubman, who follows the industry for PaineWebber, says Pacific Telesis stock will rise with incentive regulation.  But he isn't revising his per-share profit estimates of $3.15 for this year and $3.40 for 1990, because the details of the plan aren't known.  Mr. Grubman says he doesn't expect Pacific Telesis to have the extensive revenue loss projected by Nynex, another Bell operating company, as a result of similar revisions adopted in New York in 1987.  Some analysts say Nynex didn't react quickly enough to competition and a slowing economy.  In contrast, Pacific Telesis has won back many private-line and Centrex customers since it gained the right to reduce rates.  California's booming economy helped give Pacific Telesis the highest second-quarter growth in access lines among the Baby Bells.  But the California commission could order a rate cut if it decides Pacific Bell's rate of return already exceeds the proposed profit-splitting threshold.  If such a reduction is ordered, "I might cut my earnings estimate for 1990," says Robert Morris III of Goldman Sachs, who rates Pacific Telesis stock a hold.  The shares' 51% rise in the past 12 months is the highest among the Baby Bells and compares with 41.5% for telephone utilities as a group.  "The market," he says, "is buying PacTel more for the potential for deregulation than for this year's earnings." ---  Pacific Telesis  (NYSE; Symbol: PAC)  Business: Telecommunications  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $9.48 billion  Net Income: $1.19 billion; $2.81 a share  Second Quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 79 cents vs. 76 cents  Average daily trading volume:  648,169 shares  Common shares outstanding: 412.5 million  Tokyo stocks closed higher for the first time in three consecutive full-day sessions.  But the gains were mostly supported by index-related buying, which occurred several times during the day, traders said.  London share prices ended slightly firmer as the market moved within a narrow range in thin, cautious trading.  In Tokyo, dealings remained thin as many institutional investors continued to stay away from the market for the "obon" summer holidays.  Buying activity was led by brokerage houses trading for their own accounts, traders said.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues was up 139.07 points at 34810.69.  The index fell 41.34 points Monday.  In early trading in Tokyo Wednesday, the Nikkei index spurted 164 points to 34974.69.  Tuesday's volume on the first section was estimated at 400 million shares, close to Monday's 411.3 million shares.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 499 to 365, while 215 issues remained unchanged.  The dollar's latest surge against the yen and lower bond prices also discouraged active buying, some traders said.  But others said the dollar is still within levels the market finds acceptable.  "With such small volume, it's hard to see if there were any reactions to the currency fluctuation," a trader said.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 5.23 points Monday, was up 0.36 points at 2633.33.  High-priced, advanced-technology issues, which gained last week but skidded Monday on profit-taking, rebounded quickly to regain their status as market leaders.  Their popularity derived from possible quick profits that could be skimmed even on the basis of a small amount of buy orders, traders said.  Sony was up 140 yen (98 cents) to close at 8,880 yen ($62.47) after reaching a high for the day of 8,910 yen.  TDK rose 80 yen to 6,200.  Kyocera gained 20 yen to 6,550.  Other rebounding issues included Nintendo, which closed at 18,700 yen, up 200 from Monday's close.  Steel stocks, which have been lower since investors shifted their interest to high-priced issues from large-capitalization stocks, scored modest gains.  They received buying orders after the press reported that life insurance companies and trust banks are increasing their stock holdings of the "big five" steel manufacturers to compete for pension and annuity-related business contracts.  Insurers expect to be in a better position to win the contracts by buying the stocks, traders said.  Among the steel issues bought were Nippon Steel, which rose 13 yen to 830.  NKK gained 11 yen to 816.  Kawasaki Steel went up 17 yen to 907.  Winners also included auto manufacturers because of perceptions of stable earnings prospects, traders said.  Nissan gained 50 yen to 1,600, Toyota was up 30 yen to 2,660 and Honda closed at 2,120 yen, up 60 from Monday's close.  Hino and Mazda also advanced.  Banks were among the issues that declined.  Bank of Tokyo fell 20 yen to 1,720.  Mitsubishi Bank was down 110 yen to 3,260.  Sumitomo Bank fell 40 yen to 3,880.  Meanwhile, in London, shares opened stronger on a technical bounce after Monday's sharp descent, but by early afternoon they had drifted into negative territory.  A firm lead on Wall Street temporarily kicked the market higher, but buyers' confidence waned as Wall Street's rally began to falter.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended up 0.3 points at 2326.2, below an early high for the day of 2332.4.  At its lowest, the index touched 2323.9.  Despite the lackluster performance, traders said they were impressed at the market's sturdy underlying tone.  "People are still very reluctant to part with stock," one trader said.  "No one wants to be left out if takeover action flares up again."  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index fell 2.5 points to 1947.8.  Volume was a mediocre 436.7 million shares, up slightly from 434.9 million Monday.  Dealers said the market's quiet tone was also based on caution ahead of a spate of U.K. and U.S. economic data due for release later this week.  In particular, the market is keenly awaiting tomorrow's U.S. trade figures for June and Friday's U.K. retail price index for July.  B.A.T Industries ended 14 pence (25 cents) firmer at 823 pence ($12.96), as players considered the possibility that Hoylake's hostile bid for the U.K. conglomerate might succeed.  Rumors that the Hoylake Consortium, headed by Sir James Goldsmith, might inject a large cash component into its offer helped underpin the rise, dealers said.  The stock was also due for a correction, having fallen 29 pence Monday.  If Hoylake's bid does fail, dealers reckon the consortium's attention might swing to Ranks Hovis McDougall, in which it has a 29.9% stake.  In response, RHM rose 6 pence to 460 on volume of 1.3 million shares.  A number of stocks that have spearheaded the market's recent rally bore the brunt of isolated profit-taking Tuesday.  Among these, Wellcome shed 16 1/2 pence to 507 1/2 and BTR fell 3 pence to 462.  Reuters advanced 9 pence to 961, thanks to continued interest from U.S. institutions.  The market in Reuters remains extremely tight, one trader added.  Rothmans International also benefited from a tight market, with at "least one prominent London institution pushing the share," according to one dealer.  The stock ended 15 pence firmer at 627.  In Frankfurt, share prices extended their consolidation for a second day, ending broadly lower in calm trading.  Stockholm stocks closed higher in moderate trading, propelled by Trelleborg's joint bid for Canadian metal concern Falconbridge.  Trelleborg's Series B-free shares spurted 21 Swedish kronor ($3.19) to SKr413 ($62.74) yesterday, while B-restricted shares rose SKr19 to SKr405.  Elsewhere, share prices closed lower in Zurich and mixed in Amsterdam.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Paris, Brussels and Milan were closed because of a holiday.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Taipei and Wellington, mixed in Hong Kong, lower in Singapore and Manila and little changed in Sydney.  Seoul was closed for a holiday.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 14 Aug 11 Year  @ U.S. ................ 316.2 317.6 + 23.4  @ Britain ............. 701.8 710.6 + 28.5  @ Canada .............. 434.3 434.4 + 18.3  @ Japan ............... 1559.9 1563.0 + 9.8  @ France .............. 526.8 526.8 + 19.0  @ Germany ............. 249.4 253.0 + 20.0  @ Hong Kong ........... 1975.2 1947.2 - 2.7  @ Switzerland ......... 235.5 237.5 + 36.2  @ Australia ........... 345.1 340.1 + 18.9  @ World index ......... 537.5 541.6 + 8.7  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Key Tronic $ .16 ... $ .11 (3) 45.45  @Tiffany & Co. $ .36 ... $ .33 (5) 9.09  @Home Depot $ .39 ... $ .37 (9) 5.41  @TJX Cos. $ .20 ... $ .19 (6) 5.26  @ NEGATIVE  @Analysts Intl $ .33 ... $ .36 (5) 8.33  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  Apple Computer Inc., based here, said it enlarged the memory that comes with its Apple IIGS computer at no additional charge.  The machine's memory now has been roughly doubled to one megabyte of random-access memory (RAM) and 256K of read-only memory (ROM), the company said.  Users of existing Apple IIGS computers can get about 90% of the new capacity by installing new system software, it said.  The computer's suggested price with keyboard, mouse, manuals, and system software remains at $1,149, Apple added.  John Luth, a former Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. vice president, was named vice president and treasurer of Continental Airlines, Texas Air's dominant unit.  Dick Schroeter, vice president and treasurer of Texas Air's Eastern Airlines, was appointed vice president and controller of Continental Airlines.  President Bush said he believes Iran could win the release of Western hostages in Lebanon if it wanted to, his clearest signal yet that he believes Tehran holds the key to their freedom.  "I think that if Iran decided they wanted those hostages to come out of there, there would be a good likelihood that that would happen -- perhaps not with certainty, but a good likelihood," he said.  In a news conference a day before the scheduled beginning of a two-week vacation in Maine, Mr. Bush also backed comments by Budget Director Richard Darman last weekend that the Federal Reserve is keeping interest rates too high.  "I thought what Dick Darman said was very balanced. . . .  I can feel very comfortable with his sallying forth and saying that," Mr. Bush said.  "And I think I've said essentially the same thing in the past."  All U.S. presidents have wanted low interest rates, he said, "It's the American way."  Discussing the Fed in a television interview Sunday, Mr. Darman said, "If we do have a recession, I think it will be because they erred on the side of caution."  But the president parried the question of whether the Fed should be specifically blamed for a future recession, saying jokingly that he didn't recall that part of Mr. Darman's interview and telling reporters he would take the question "under advisement and let you know at a later date."  The Fed had no comment on the president's remarks.  On other topics, Mr. Bush said "there are some hints that possibly there will be a transfer" of power in Panama, even though dictator Manuel Noriega's designated candidate is expected to be inaugurated as president next month.  The U.S. and other nations charge that the election was rigged and say a rival candidate actually was the winner.  Mr. Bush didn't offer any specific reasons to expect a change, however, and he said: "I'm not holding my breath on his {Gen.  Noriega's} voluntary departure."  Mr. Bush also suggested that the administration would still seek to have Gen. Noriega, who has been indicted by the U.S. on drug trafficking charges, brought to trial.  "I have an obligation to try to bring people to justice," he said.  The president also said some other federal programs will have to be cut to pay for his program against drug abuse, which is scheduled to be unveiled Sept. 5.  He refused to say which programs he will propose sacrificing.  On the hostages, Mr. Bush has said previously that he believes Iran has been involved in terrorism, but he has avoided assigning Tehran specific responsibility for the 16 Westerners believed to be held in Lebanon.  He has preferred instead to invite Iran's participation in efforts to win their release; for example, he said in his inaugural address that "good will" by Iran "begets good will."  But despite a series of recent hints that Iran and Shiite Moslem leaders in Lebanon might be willing to help free the hostages, Mr. Bush said he couldn't say whether the captives are closer to being released.  Mr. Bush said he hasn't ordered military retaliation for the death of Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins -- who was apparently murdered after being kidnapped from a U.N. peacekeeping detail in Lebanon -- because he lacks complete information and doesn't want to harm innocent people.  "If I could find some action -- diplomatic, military, private sector, public sector -- that I thought would help get the hostages out or guard against future hostage-taking, I would take such action," he said.  "Military action -- I'd like to know that what action we took was not going to victimize a lot of innocent people.  And I'd like to be sure of all the facts before taking action on the Higgins case.  And I wish I could tell you we had all the facts, and we don't."  Jerome H. Goldberg was appointed executive vice president of this utility-holding company's Florida Power & Light Co. unit.  Mr. Goldberg, who has been Houston Lighting & Power Co.'s group vice president, nuclear, will oversee the Florida utility's nuclear-power operations.  In essence, he succeeds William Conway, who was senior vice president, nuclear operations.  Mr. Conway left in March to join Arizona Public Service Co.  Robert C. Brown & Co. said it agreed to a plan of merger with Capitalcorp. of Delaware for $7 a share, or nearly $18 million.  Under terms of the pact, Capitalcorp., will make a tender offer for all shares of the company, after which Robert C. Brown will be merged into Capitalcorp.  Capitalcorp., an investor group led by Howe Ellison, Lorraine Legg, Leland Prussia and Ronald Schaeffer, will be the surviving corporation.  Robert C. Brown is a financial-asset management company.  In over-the-counter trading Monday, the stock closed at $6.375; it didn't trade yesterday.  Widespread labor shortages pushed down the rate at which new jobs were created in Switzerland in the second quarter, the Federal Statistics Office said.  The government's index of new jobs increased only 0.6% from the 1988 second quarter, compared with a 1.4% year-to-year increase in the first quarter.  Job growth in the second quarter, which typically shows a seasonal increase from the first quarter, rose only 1.1%; this has averaged 2% in recent years.  Swiss employers, in responses provided to the government, said the slower rate at which jobs were created in the second quarter didn't indicate business's lack of capacity to create new jobs, but rather the continuing difficulty in finding workers to fill them.  Switzerland in June recorded an annual unemployment rate of 0.5%, the lowest since October 1982.  W. Curtis Livingston was elected a director of this financial services concern, filling a vacancy.  He is managing director and chief executive officer of Western Asset Management Co., a Legg Mason affiliate.  Anthony J. Alexander, general counsel, was named to the additional post of vice president of this utility.  Grow Group Inc. said it completed the sale of its U.S. Paint division to Nippon Oil & Fats Ltd. of Japan for about $25 million.  The maker of specialty-chemical coatings and household products said the sale was part of a plan to "protect and maximize" share value.  U.S. Paint makes and distributes specialty coatings and glamour finishes for aircraft, boat and other transportation markets.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Grow Group closed at $11.125 a share, up 12.5 cents.  The Canadian government auctioned 650 million Canadian dollars (US$550.9 million) of 9.25% bonds maturing May 1,1996.  The average accepted yield bid was 9.575% for a price equivalent of 98.401.  Proceeds of the issue will be used for general government purposes.  Australia's gross domestic product in the quarter ended June 30 rose 0.6% from the quarter ended March 31 and 3.9% from the year-earlier period.  The latest rise represented a narrowing from increases of 1.8% in each of the two previous quarters, suggesting the economy started to slow, as the government wants.  The figures are adjusted for both price changes and seasonal factors.  Average GDP expansion for the fiscal year ended June 30 was 3.3%, down from 4.3% in fiscal 1988.  The government projects a further narrowing to 2.75% growth in fiscal 1990.  A rise in spending by the West German public sector next year would be risky for the economy, which is already straining under excess demand, the Deutsche Bundesbank said in its August report.  Aggregate demand already exceeds the nation's production potential, a situation that usually fuels inflation, and that trend will be exacerbated by a tax change taking effect in January, the central bank said in its monthly report on the economy.  The Bundesbank said the government should continue its policy of limiting public-sector deficits to a "budgetary and economically bearable level."  Fluor Corp. said its Fluor Daniel unit was awarded two contracts, including one valued at $32 million.  The second contract's value wasn't disclosed.  Fluor, an engineering and construction company with investments in coal and lead, said the first contract is to provide construction-management services for Cleveland-based Alcan Aluminum Corp.'s Sebree, Ky., plant.  The second contract is for Fluor Daniel's hydrocarbon sector to provide engineering-procurement and construction services for the first of a three-phase program to reduce the level of nitrogen-oxide emissions at Los Angeles-based Unocal Corp.'s Wilmington, Calif., refinery.  Consumer prices in Finland fell 0.1% in July but were up 6.7% from a year earlier, the Central Statistical Office said.  The office said the decrease was mainly due to price reductions on clothing and vegetables.  The July figures reduced Finland's annual inflation to 6.7% from 6.8% a month earlier and from its recent peak of 6.9% at the end of April.  Annual inflation through July 1988 was 5.2%.  The average operating profit of West German banks rose 1.6% to 27.2 billion marks ($13.96 billion) in 1988 from a year earlier, the Bundesbank said.  The increase was paced by strong gains at branches of foreign banks and credit unions, the West German central bank said in its monthly report for August.  Operating profit at the subsidiaries of foreign banks surged 28% to 132 million marks, and profits at credit unions rose 12% to 3.37 billion marks.  The country's largest banks also posted strong gains, as average operating profit firmed 6.3% to 3.77 billion marks, and the profit of savings banks advanced 2.4% to 9.4 billion marks.  Private banks were the biggest losers, as profits tumbled 23% to 273 million marks, and operating profits at the clearing houses of savings banks fell 7.1% to 2.19 billion marks.  Japan's wholesale prices in July rose 3.1% from a year earlier and were unchanged from the previous month, the Bank of Japan said.  The wholesale price index, where 1985 equals 100, stood at 89.7.  Lawrence J. Winston and Richard E. Landau resigned as vice chairmen and members of the executive committee to pursue personal business interests.  No announcement has been made on whether this investment concern will replace them in those positions.  Both men will remain on the board.  Messrs.  Winston and Landau founded closely held Quinoco Cos., a group of Denver oil and gas companies that were combined with Angeles in 1984.  Gary L. Depolo, 53 years old, senior vice president in charge of financial reporting, was named to the new position of executive vice president in charge of corporate staff functions of this insurance and financial services concern.  Edgar H. Grubb, 50, senior vice president and chief financial officer of Lucky Stores, will join Transamerica as a senior vice president in charge of the controller's tax and auditing departments.  He assumes Mr. Depolo's former financial reporting responsibilities.  Perini Corp. said its Eastern Building division was awarded a $31 million contract by the Massachusetts division of capital planning and operations to design and build 300 prison cells and administration buildings in West Boylston, Mass.  Construction is scheduled to start immediately at the Worcester County House of Corrections and expected to be completed in April 1990.  General Dynamics Corp. said its commercial launch services unit received a contract from Hughes Aircraft Co.'s space and communications group for 10 U.S. Navy ultra-high frequency communications satellites.  A spokesman for General Dynamics wouldn't disclose the value of the contract, but said such commercial satellites typically sell for $55 million to $60 million each.  The first of the 10 satellites are scheduled to be launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station in Florida in 1992.  South Africa's trade surplus widened slightly to 1.09 billion rand ($399.6 million) in July from 1.04 billion rand a year earlier, but narrowed from 1.29 billion rand in June, the government's Customs and Excise Office said.  The figures aren't seasonally adjusted, but export and import data are adjusted to bring them in line with the requirements for compiling the nation's balance of payments.  Exports in July totaled 5.16 billion rand, up from 4.29 billion rand a year earlier.  Imports rose to 4.07 billion rand from 3.25 billion rand.  For the first seven months of 1989, exports increased to 32.53 billion rand from 26.69 billion rand a year earlier.  Imports totaled 26.12 billion rand, up from 21.512 billion rand.  The trade figures include South Africa's exports of gold bullion, the country's principal source of foreign exchange earnings.  Imports include the country's purchases of oil and other petroleum products, despite the longstanding embargo of the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  Capital Holding Corp. said its banking unit completed the sale of $600 million of asset-backed certificates.  The privately offered issue consists of notes backed by credit card and credit line receivables.  Chase Manhattan Bank, a unit of Chase Manhattan Corp., acted as placement agent.  Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes.  The word inside Merrill Lynch & Co. lately has been that some local bankers were taking side-bets on what firm would be next to drop out of Britain's depressed government-securities market.  Merrill should have bet on itself.  Jolted by total losses of #35 million ($55.2 million) during the past three years, Merrill announced it would close its market-making operations in United Kingdom government bonds, or gilts, and would seek to reassign 20 employees affected by the closing.  Merrill thus became the eighth firm in recent months to abandon the gilt market, which has taken three serious body blows since Britain's Big Bang securities deregulation in 1986.  The market crash of October 1987 left Merrill and other firms with heavy trading losses.  Volume has dried up because the Thatcher government has been operating with a budget surplus and doesn't need to borrow.  In addition, high interest rates have battered down prices on many gilt issues already outstanding.  "Looking forward, we didn't see any substantial profit" in remaining a gilt market maker, said Mark Cutis, head of Merrill's fixed-income trading operations in London.  "There's no supply."  Merrill's withdrawal is in sharp contrast to the gusto with which it entered the gilt market three years ago.  It spent million of pounds recruiting traders.  Aggressively cutting margins and taking big trading positions, the firm garnered 20% of the market before the reverses hit.  By this year, Merrill, the largest securities firm in the U.S., had only a small fraction of the gilt market.  Mr. Cutis said Merrill's gilt operation had incurred #25 million in start-up costs in 1986 and had posted losses of #8 million in 1987 and #2 million in 1988.  This year "has almost been break-even," he added.  Until recently Merrill had been insisting that it would remain a "primary" dealer authorized by the Bank of England to make a market in gilts.  It said it would continue to act as a broker for customers wishing to invest in gilts and that it would also trade gilts for its own account.  The withdrawal reduces the number of primary gilt dealers to 21.  Merrill's move "is part of the the general slow hemorrhage that's going on, and will continue, in the gilt market," said Peter Spencer, an economist with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd. said they will increase their offer to acquire Dunkin' Donuts Inc. to $45 a share from $43 if they are successful in overturning the doughnut chain's array of takeover defenses.  The original bid, rejected by Dunkin' Donuts directors, was to expire yesterday but was extended to Sept. 15.  The Canadian bidders also modified the terms of their $43-a-share offer, making it conditional on 50.1% of Dunkin' Donuts' common shares being tendered on a fully diluted basis.  The offer was subject to 75% of the shares being tendered.  The revised offer is also conditional on redemption by the Dunkin' Donuts board of poison-pill share purchase rights.  Unicorp and Cara said they plan to file a suit in the Delaware Court of Chancery asking that the Dunkin' Donuts board redeem preferred shares issued to General Electric Capital Corp. and the poison-pill rights.  The companies also are seeking to overturn the doughnut chain's employee stock ownership plan.  "We're sweetening the bid because obviously the company is worth more to us if we're successful in court," said Eric Evans, vice-president of Unicorp.  Richard N. Hart, Jr., vice president-treasurer of Randolph, Mass.-based Dunkin' Donuts said, "There will be no comment until we've actually read the filing."  He also said the board would meet with Goldman, Sachs & Co. to study the value of a $45-a-share bid.  Unicorp and Cara said that a Unicorp unit, Kingsbridge Capital Group, already holds about 15% of Dunkin' Donuts stock and that shareholders have tendered an additional 25%.  "We're already on the threshold of that 50.1%," said Mr. Evans.  "Clearly, we're prepared to sit there and buy voting control, even if it doesn't give us real control for a while" because of the staggered terms of Dunkin' Donuts' board members.  Unicorp and Cara argue that if their bid is unsuccessful, the price of Dunkin' Donuts stock will drop to around $28 or $30, its trading range before takeover bid rumors began to circulate.  In national over-the-counter trading, Dunkin' Donuts closed yesterday at $37.875 a share, up 37.5 cents.  Sunday talk shows are a great place to peddle ideas to a large audience, but some care needs to be exercised in dealing with sensitive subjects.  Money, for example.  Some of us recall that James Baker used one of those Sunday forums in October 1987 to threaten the Germans with a hard-hitting game of competitive devaluation.  It may not have been entirely coincidental that the world's stock markets, already nervous about the dollar, promptly crashed.  Last Sunday on "Meet the Press," George Bush's budget director, Richard Darman, offered a few of his own money thoughts.  If we go into a recession, he said in effect, the Federal Reserve will deserve the blame.  Next day, the Shearson-Lehman-Hutton T-Bond index lost 40 points.  That drop may in fact have been a mere coincidence, but markets do tend to get nervous when politicians appear to be calling for a softer dollar.  That is true of bond markets in particular, since the value of bonds is dependent on long-term monetary stability.  Some economists also reacted coolly to Mr. Darman's remarks.  The AP yesterday quoted Robert Dederick, chief economist of the Northern Trust Co. of Chicago, as follows: "This is a classic situation of setting up the Fed to be the fall guy if something goes wrong."  Mr. Darman's boss, George Bush, said at his press conference yesterday that "I feel very comfortable with his sallying forth.  I think I have said the same things in the past."  Maybe so, but with the bond markets slipping Monday, the White House had taken some pains to indicate that it was not picking a fight with the Fed.  Now, it could be that the markets had very little interest in what Mr. Darman said.  Fed-bashing is not exactly a new game.  But there often are resonances to such remarks when markets face uncertainty.  More to the point, Mr. Darman's timing wasn't especially good.  The Fed's anti-inflation fight has been going reasonably well.  The Consumer Price Index, after rising at a very worrisome 7% annual rate in May, climbed at a more comfortable rate in June.  Judging from a sharp drop in growth of the Producer Price Index, further CPI improvement probably is in the cards.  Sometimes people forget it, but the main job of the Fed -- some might say the only job -- is to keep the dollar sound, and that seems to be what Chairman Greenspan is trying to do.  More interestingly, and also not reflective of good timing on Mr. Darman's part, the economy is responding well, not badly, to the anti-inflation effort.  While real economic growth slowed in the second quarter as the inflation rate climbed, lately the signals are better.  The stock market until the last few days has been strong.  Rates on 30-year Treasury bonds in late July dropped below 8% for the first time since early 1987, suggesting some market confidence that the Fed is serious about preserving long-term values.  Consumer confidence, as measured by the University of Michigan index, improved in July for the first time in three months.  Auto sales in July were up some 8.5% from June.  Unemployment fell to 5.2% in July from 5.3% in June.  Indeed, the Fed had already eased short-term interest rates before Mr. Darman's appearance on "Meet the Press."  Whether it could safely ease further is worthy of some debate.  But the Sunday talk shows don't always lend themselves to serious debate.  Mr. Darman is a talented public official and an articulate exponent of policy.  All the more reason for him to keep an eye on his critical reviews.  Congress has finally decided that its Section 89 paperwork requirements to make benefit programs "fair" was not worth bankrupting small businesses or forcing them to drop health plans.  So it will delay the rules until next year, though everyone knows Section 89 is so awful it must go.  Getting Congress to cry uncle is never easy, but this is getting ridiculous.  Robert R. Dougherty, 45 years old, formerly president and chief executive officer of Pharmacia Opthalmic Inc., Los Angeles, was named president and chief executive of this maker of high performance audio parts.  He succeeds Robert W. Carver, 47, founder of the company, who remains chairman and assumes the new title vice president of advanced research.  Guy F. Atkinson Co. of California said a joint venture received a $116 million contract to design and build a cogeneration plant near Clarksville, Va.  The joint venture by Atkinson's Tyger Construction Co. unit and an affiliate of Duke Power Co. is to begin construction in early 1990 and to put the coal-fired plant into service in late 1991.  Air Wisconsin, a unit of Air Wis Services Inc., said its July traffic rose 3% to 39.4 million revenue passenger miles from 38.2 million a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  The carrier, which operates as United Express, said its load factor, or percentage of available seats filled, dropped to 49.1% from 52.4%.  For the year to date, the airline said it flew 249.4 million revenue passenger miles, compared with 243.9 million a year earlier.  Load factor fell to 47.3% from 49.2%.  Hannaford Bros.  Co., a food retailer, said sales for the four weeks ended July 29 rose 20% to $122.5 million from $101.9 million in the comparable period of 1988.  For the latest 30-week period, sales were $843.6 million, up 24% from $680.7 million a year earlier.  Gearing up for the biggest real-estate sale in U.S. history is no cinch.  Just ask the Resolution Trust Corp., Washington's newest agency, priming itself to sell hundreds of billions of dollars of bad assets from insolvent thrifts.  The RTC, established to dispose of assets of insolvent thrifts in the S&L bill signed just last week, is already a Washington growth industry.  Attorneys and trade groups are touting seminars on how to profit from RTC deals.  At least four new trade publications have sprouted to track its transactions and explain its as-yet-unwritten policies.  Blue-chip companies such as American Telephone & Telegraph Co. are clamoring for what they expect to be a big, big account.  "This is clearly the hottest issue around," says Andrew Albert, a former editor of American Banker and Bond Buyer, who left to start a variety of newsletters -- all of which have been pushed aside in favor of launching one on the RTC.  "The interest is peaking right now."  That may be so, but the infant RTC is hardly in the best position to take advantage of it right now.  Its final two members of its five-member board have yet to be appointed.  Its patchwork of employees, skimmed from banking and thrift agencies, are still looking for permanent office space.  Half of its 50 or so current staffers are in an office sublet from the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, which had sublet the space from a law firm.  And it must spend time preparing for hearings next month before the Senate Banking Committee.  Starting from scratch isn't easy.  Last week, for example, the RTC was set to proclaim its first three sales of insolvent thrifts -- evidence that it had landed on its feet in short order.  But the RTC communications office had no telephone or facsimile machine.  The chief public relations officer had to dash across the street to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. office to type out the press releases on a computer, then run back to his borrowed RTC computer only to find it couldn't read the FDIC computer language.  It was finally printed back at the FDIC office.  "I guess this is about what we expected at this point," said Steve Katsanos, the RTC's chief communications officer, who has trod a well-worn path between his old FDIC office and his new RTC desk.  Moreover, the newborn agency must take care of such mundane administrative affairs while billions of dollars in expected transactions attracts every conceivable would-be deal-maker.  Real-estate auctioneers, asset-overhaul specialists and even curious home buyers in search of a bargain are distracting the RTC from its start-up work.  "I've had hundreds of calls from people looking for houses with three bedrooms and two baths," Mr. Katsanos said.  Eventually, as the assets of more thrifts are compiled, the real-estate assets will be listed on computer data bases at six regional offices, he said.  Even before the agency's first transaction was announced, its every move was speculated on by the wave of RTC newsletters, as evidenced by such headlines as: "RTC Specifics Still a Mystery on Eve of Creation."  Newsletters are planned by National Thrift & Mortgage News, BNA Communications Inc., the former American Banker editor, and Land Development Institute Ltd., which is headed by Washington savings-and-loan lawyers, according to the RTC.  "It used to be a small industry," observes Mr. Albert, the former American Banker editor, "but it's getting bigger every day."  Seven insiders at Harley-Davidson Inc., including its two top officers, have sold some of their holdings in the motorcycle company in the past five months, according to insider filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The largest insider sale was by Harley-Davidson Chairman Vaughn L. Beals Jr., who recently unloaded 100,000 shares, or 22% of his holdings in the company, for $2.9 million.  Richard F. Teerlink, president of the company, who sold 15,000 shares, said the insiders took profits as Harley-Davidson's stock climbed this spring and summer.  These insiders have had virtually all their assets tied up in the company since 1981, he said, when Harley-Davidson was purchased in a leveraged buy-out.  The Milwaukee-based company went public again in 1986.  "Now, some of us want some of the advantages we've worked for," he said.  "My wife wants a new house."  Mr. Teerlink sold his shares for $30.25 each, or $453,750, on May 19, according to insider filings.  He retains 40,100 shares, held directly and indirectly.  Mr. Beals sold his shares in two blocks of 50,000 on July 7 and Aug. 8, for $27.13 and $29.88 a share, respectively, according to SEC filings.  But big sales are a pattern for Mr. Beals, who unloaded even more shares as part of company stock offerings in both 1988 and 1987.  He could not be reached for comment.  According to James Brostowitz, Harley-Davidson secretary-treasurer, when the company's stock began climbing towards $30 a share in the second quarter, the insiders took the opportunity to take profits.  Other than the chairman and president, five other insiders have sold blocks of stock ranging from 500 to 65,000 shares since March 15.  Harley-Davidson stock closed yesterday in New York Stock Exchange composite trading at $29.125, unchanged. ---  HOME-TOWN BOYS: BankWorcester Corp. of Worcester, Mass., is a small regional thrift with a big distinction: Eighteen of the total 26 insiders at the company have purchased BankWorcester stock in the past year.  Although their purchases have mostly been small-scale, that number of buyers ranks BankWorcester as the seventh most-purchased stock by insiders in the last year, according to SEC filings, right after such huge, household-name companies as Delta Air Lines and Deere & Co.  James Stowe, a BankWorcester director who was one of seven insiders who bought in July, said unfavorable headlines about the troubled thrift industry "have pushed the value of the stock down considerably," making it a bargain.  In national over-the-counter trading, it closed yesterday unchanged at $16 a share, below the thrift's book value -- essentially, assets minus liabilities -- of $21.68 a share.  Mr. Stowe said he believes BankWorcester is more insulated from thrift problems than the industry as a whole, because of its location in the growing Worcester area and a conservative loan policy.  Mr. Stowe bought 4,900 shares on July 27 for $72,912, bringing his stake to 11,975 shares.  Other insiders who bought in July purchased 100 to 2,000 shares, all adding to existing holdings.  James Moynihan, an analyst who follows the Northeast banking stocks for Advest Group Inc., calls BankWorcester "a good company, fairly well-run."  According to Mr. Moynihan, it sells at a favorable price-earnings ratio, pays a $1 dividend and "is attractive on its own pure fundamentals."  Said Mr. Stowe: "When you're busy running a business, picking a stock can be risky.  But if you're near something and can see what's going on, it's the kind of {investment} you can go to sleep with."  ---  QUICK CHANGE: Three Jiffy Lube International Inc. insiders sold most of their company stock shortly after the announcement that Pennzoil Co. would acquire an 80% stake in this Baltimore-based operator of quick auto-lubrication centers.  Moreover, the insiders sold out near the stock's low for the year, at $2.75 to $3, compared with a high this year of $8.50.  The insiders sold 86% to 98% of their stakes in the firm.  Their sales were not part of the Pennzoil purchase.  The most active insider seller was Jiffy Lube's chief financial officer and executive vice president, Edward F. Kelly III, who has sold 170,138 shares in the company since July 27, the day after the Pennzoil purchase was announced.  His total take: $494,697.  Mr. Kelly said the sales "were not related to my belief in the future" of Jiffy Lube.  He said he has been "in need of raising capital" for quite some time and "was forced {under SEC insider trading rules} to hold tight until everything had been announced."  Unfortunately, said Mr. Kelly, he was forced to sell more shares of Jiffy Lube than he had originally planned to raise the needed capital because the stock price was so depressed.  SEC records indicate Mr. Kelly sold his entire stake in the firm, but a spokeswoman for the company said he still holds 3,358 shares and intends to make an amended filing with the SEC to that effect.  Nicholas A. Greville, executive vice president of retail operations, sold 86% of his stake in the firm in two sales on July 28 and 31.  He retains 2,614 shares, after selling 16,000 shares for $46,080.  He could not be reached for comment.  Arnold Janofsky, vice president and general counsel, sold 10,000 shares on July 28 for $27,500.  He has 466 shares of the company remaining.  Mr. Janofsky sold his shares, he said, "to meet expenses of a personal nature."  Jiffy Lube stock fell 12.5 cents yesterday to close at $2.625 in national over-the-counter trading.  CAE Industries Ltd. said its West German unit, CAE Electronics G.m.b.H., has been awarded a contract by the West German defense ministry to upgrade an aircraft flight simulator.  The upgrade, which will allow pilots to simulate air combat, is valued at 32 million Canadian dollars (US$27.1 million), CAE said.  Delivery is scheduled for 1991.  Star Technologies Inc., a maker of computer processors, said it will acquire Glen Culler & Associates, a closely held design firm based in Goleta, Calif.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Dayton Hudson Corp. and J.C. Penney Co., riding a wave of brisk apparel sales, reported sharply higher second-quarter earnings and said they are optimistic about the rest of the year.  Dayton's net income doubled and Penney's jumped 21% even as some other retailers reported weak results amid general uncertainty about consumer spending.  Monday, for example, K mart Corp. said second-quarter net fell 11%.  "If you're in the apparel business, results are better than expected," said Daniel Barry, analyst at Kidder Peabody & Co.  "If not, you're running a little short."  Dayton Hudson, based in Minneapolis, said net for the quarter ended July 29 jumped to a record $56 million, or 72 cents a share, from $28 million, or 34 cents a share, a year earlier.  The latest quarter was boosted by a pretax gain of $10 million from the partial reversal of a reserve taken earlier for closing a unit.  Revenue rose 15% to $3.1 billion from $2.69 billion.  J.C. Penney, based in Dallas, said net rose to $98 million, or 74 cents a share, from $81 million, or 61 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue was up 7% to $3.44 billion from $3.21 billion.  The department store and catalog retailer said sales of children's clothing led its sales gains, but that women's sportswear and men's apparel sales also were strong.  Dayton cited improved sales and earnings at its three main units, with the best sales gains at two units that emphasize clothing.  Mervyn's, an apparel and household soft goods chain, had a 13% sales gain at stores open more than 12 months, while the Dayton Hudson department stores reported a 7% gain in same-store sales.  "They're on a roll as a company" said Robert Buchanan, retail analyst at A.G. Edwards & Sons Inc. in St. Louis.  Mr. Barry said clothing retailers continue to benefit from a turnaround from last year's first half, when sales were in a slump aggravated by the heat wave and a resistance by women to shorter skirts.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Dayton's shares rose $1.125 to close at $62.25, while J.C. Penney's shares rose 62.5 cents to close at $64.125.  In the first six months, Dayton earnings climbed 63% to $96 million, or $1.23 a share, from $59 million, or 70 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose 13% to $5.92 billion from $5.24 billion.  Penney said net for the first half increased 6.8% to $226 million, or $1.71 a share, from $212 million, or $1.57 a share, a year earlier.  The latest six months includes a $20 million charge from discontinuing an interactive, home-shopping service, while the year-ago period includes a $13 million gain from the sale of a shopping center.  Sales rose 6.2% to $6.78 billion from $6.39 billion last year.  Keeping up the first half's growth may be difficult for retailers, particularly because of robust earnings in last year's fourth quarter.  Still, Mr. Buchanan said he expects such strong retailers as Dayton and J.C. Penney to continue their earnings gains.  "We're bullish on the second half," a Penney spokesman said.  Dayton said it is "optimistic" but didn't elaborate.  Tom Clancy's "Clear and Present Danger" (Putnam, 656 pages, $21.95) begins with a president sitting in his high-backed, bullet-resistant chair in the Oval Office, grumbling to his national security adviser.  "I promised the American people that we'd do something about this problem and we haven't accomplished ----," he says, crossly buttering a croissant.  Mr. Clancy's new thriller revolves around the question: What do we do about drugs, when all the speeches are over?  For Mr. Clancy's president, code name Wrangler, the answer is calling up the military in a covert operation after drug lords murder a high-ranking U.S. official.  Soon, there's an undeclared war under way in Colombia, while the talk continues in Washington.  Mr. Clancy revels in the proficiency, bravery and successes of the servicemen, but enough goes wrong with Operation Showboat to leave the reader wondering whether military action would ever work in the real world.  Which is about where the debate stands now in Washington: Civilians muse about hitting the traffickers hard, while the top brass at the Pentagon resists involvement as bitterly as it does a budget cut.  The generals seem to fear taking on an ill-defined, and perhaps hopeless, task.  They worry about the increased temptation for corruption.  They view anti-drug activity as police work, if not indeed social work.  And they point to the federal forces already mobilized and stepping on each other's toes: The Justice Department, the CIA, the U.S. Customs Service, the Coast Guard and the newly formed drug czardom.  One can certainly agree that as long as Americans demand more and more cocaine, and pay endless billions for it, no action on the supply side can possibly succeed.  Demand reduction is the only long-term solution.  Yet the generals, and others who counsel action only on the demand side, are wrong.  In the short run, tough action to interdict supply routes, blow up laboratories and capture and extradite traffickers is critical.  It will reduce the supply of drugs and, perhaps even more important, give the countries fighting on the front lines -- Colombia, Peru and particularly Bolivia -- the moral support and the resources they need to resist the immense power of the drug lords.  Since it is our citizens who, after all, create the cocaine market, do we have the right to urge those fragile Latin democracies to wage war on drugs if we plan to take a pacifist stance?  Military action is no panacea, but it is an essential tool in this war as in any other.  Mr. Clancy grasps well the need to help, not blame, democracies fighting hard against drugs.  Says his FBI director, later murdered by the drug mafia: "Colombia is trying damn hard to run a real democracy in a region where democracies are pretty rare . . . and you expect them to do -- what?  Trash what institutions they do have? . . .  go fascist again to hunt down the druggies just because it suits us?"  What helps to make "Clear and Present Danger" such compelling reading is a fairly sophisticated view of Latin politics combined with Mr. Clancy's patented, tautly shaped scenes, fleshed out with colorful technical data and tough talk.  Mr. Clancy's convincing portrait of Cuba under Castro comes through the comments of the novel's foulest character -- a former Cuban intelligence officer who now works for the drug chieftains.  Credit the author with a good nose for news about to happen.  We read the ex-officer's musings and memories of the Cuba he left behind just as the headlines have reported Stalin-style show trials in Havana.  Never mind Castro's most pious disclaimers, and the hanging of his close associates: Cuba is heavily involved with drug trafficking, and the new wave of repression is entirely consistent with the brutal, cynical communist system Mr. Clancy's villain recalls with great fondness.  The Cuban reflects happily that today "the yanquis had not yet discovered within themselves the courage to act in accordance with their power."  It is clear that Mr. Clancy thinks this leaves the world a far less safe place.  "Clear and Present Danger" is another in Mr. Clancy's Jack Ryan series, focusing on the escapades of Ryan, his friends and family, and the assorted villains he meets.  In "The Hunt For Red October," "Red Storm Rising" and "The Cardinal of the Kremlin," the bad guys were some type of communist; in "Patriot Games" they were terrorists.  A few other familiar characters are also reintroduced, although Mr. Clancy minimizes character development and concentrates on his story -- to put it politely.  Faithful fans of Mr. Clancy will not be disappointed with Ryan's new incarnation as "DDI," official lingo for deputy director of the CIA for intelligence analysis.  Like Mr. Clancy, Ryan shows no signs of slowing down, much less losing his grip.  It takes about five chapters to get all the characters straight, after which you won't stop until you hit the last pages, when Ryan and the president confront each other over the usefulness and legality of covert operations.  With its allusions to events past and present, "Clear and Present Danger" makes absorbing reading.  ---  Mr. Abrams, an assistant secretary of state from 1981 to January 1989, now practices law in Washington, D.C.  Artful Dodgers  Not knowing the answer,  He says, "Too early to tell."  Or, "That's a good question  And you put it well."  Or, "'It's so complex,  Needs further thought."  He strives to look cool,  While really distraught.  Delaying, he recoils  From the brink,  And counters with,  "What Do you think?"  I have to confess  I find it appalling  When one pretends to know,  While stalling.  -- Dow Richardson.  ---  Summer Slump  The man will be a genius,  There is no doubt of,  Who invents lawn furniture  You can get up out of.  -- Gail Cooke.  ---  Salesmanship  When they say "Reduced" I'm already seduced.  -- Betsey Freiburger.  Total cargo handled at Singapore's port was up 22% in the first six months of 1989 to 40.3 million tons from the first half of 1988, the Port of Singapore Authority said.  According to the authority, general cargo amounted to 38.5 million tons in the period, up 25% from the previous year, while bulk cargo came to 1.8 million tons, down 19%.  In the general cargo category, containerized cargo amounted to 30.8 million tons, up 32%.  Conventional cargo was 7.7 million tons, up 0.9%.  The number of vessels arriving in the port rose 6.3% to 18,314, and shipping tonnage was up 9% to 207.1 million tons.  Yields on certificates of deposit rose modestly in the latest week, their first across-the-board increase in more than four months.  The average yield on one-year CDs of less than $50,000 was 7.84% in the week ended yesterday, up from 7.80% the previous week.  A five-year CD of less than $50,000 yielded an average of 7.82%, compared with 7.76% a week earlier, according to Banxquote Money Markets, an information service here that tracks CD yields.  Yields "can go either way in the coming weeks," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote.  "But don't expect great variation in one direction or the other."  The higher yields reflect the rise in interest rates that followed reports indicating that the U.S. economy probably isn't weak enough to cause the Federal Reserve to ease credit further soon.  Six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction, for example, yielded 8.26%, up from 8.12% last week.  T-bills continue to offer better yields than comparable CDs at most major banks.  On six-month CDs of less than $50,000, which are among the most popular with individual investors, the average yield rose to 7.92% this week from 7.86%, Banxquote reported.  The across-the-board increases this week are averages.  While some Texas banks raised yields as much as a quarter of a percentage point, yields remained flat or declined in many other major markets, according to Banxquote.  Manufacturers Hanover Bank in New York, for example, reduced the yield on its one-year CD of less than $50,000 to 8.44% from 8.60% and its five-year CD to 7.79% from 8%.  Major brokerage firms, which negotiate rates directly with banks and therefore usually offer higher yields to customers, also posted increases across the board.  The highest average yield was 8.68% for three-month deposits, and the low was 8.25% for two years and five years.  Yields on CDs of $90,000 or more, which usually follow interest-rate trends more closely than smaller CDs do, rose as much as a fifth of a percentage point on average.  On a two-year deposit, the average yield rose to 8.08% from 7.88%.  Six-month CDs yielded an average of 8.09% in the latest week, compared with 7.96%.  Yields on bank money-market deposits declined a bit.  On deposits of less than $50,000, the average was 7.01% in the latest week, down from 7.02%.  On deposits of $90,000 or more, the latest average yield was 7.48%, compared with 7.54% the previous week.  Robert Wussler, the No. 2 executive of Turner Broadcasting System Inc., resigned to become president and chief executive officer of Communications Satellite Corp.'s Video Enterprises unit.  Mr. Wussler's move surprised many analysts and industry executives, who said they wouldn't have expected the veteran television programmer to trade his $400,000 a year Turner post for the helm of the loss-plagued Comsat unit, which beams pay-per-view TV to hotels.  Associates of Mr. Wussler said he was restless and often frustrated in the shadow of Chairman Ted Turner, but quit on good terms.  Mr. Wussler said he left Turner Broadcasting for the opportunity to work for a "technology blessed corporation."  Mr. Wussler is also a Turner Broadcasting director, but the company didn't say whether he'll resign that post as well.  For Turner Broadcasting, Mr. Wussler's departure will test the depth of the company's executive ranks.  He was responsible for Turner Broadcasting's extensive ties to the Soviet Union, negotiating the advent of the Goodwill Games in 1986, the use of a Soviet satellite to transmit Cable News Network, and even had a hand in the signing of a Soviet basketball player by the company's Atlanta Hawks team.  He also represented the company in negotiations with professional sports leagues, including the National Basketball Association, which plays dozens of games on Turner's networks.  Yesterday, Mr. Turner acted fast to fill the gap.  Upon hearing from Mr. Wussler in the morning that he was leaving, Mr. Turner divided the senior executive vice president's duties among the chairman's top three lieutenants, according to company insiders.  But the division came out somewhat awkwardly, they said, with responsibility for the company's sports operations going to the top cable-sales executive, Terry McGuirk, and oversight of the Goodwill Games assigned to Paul Beckham, senior vice president of finance and administration.  Gerry Hogan, president of Turner Entertainment Networks, was given responsibility for advertising, public relations, research and production.  "It's a changing of the guard," said Larry Gerbrandt, a senior analyst with Paul Kagan Associates Inc. "Wussler was part of the original core team."  Mr. Wussler was also the only senior Turner Broadcasting executive with significant industry experience before joining the company.  Messrs.  Hogan and McGuirk are both old friends and proteges of Mr. Turner.  Separately, Turner Broadcasting said CNN hired Pamela Hill, vice president and executive producer of ABC News, for the posts of vice president and executive producer of CNN's new investigative unit.  Ms. Hill was in charge of ABC News Closeup, ABC News specials and ABC News cultural programming produced for the Arts & Entertainment Network.  "This is a rare opportunity to pursue serious journalism," Ms. Hill said.  For Washington-based Comsat, Mr. Wussler's hiring may signal a renewed interest in video programming.  The company, founded by Congress to represent the U.S. in the International Telecommunications Satellite Organization, or Intelsat, lost about $80 million earlier this decade on an aborted attempt to start a direct-broadcast satellite network.  In the past three years, Comsat's Video Enterprises unit has invested $125 million to develop pay-per-view installations in hotel rooms, estimates James McCabe, senior vice president of Nomura Securities.  The effort has yielded steady losses, expected to be $10 million this year.  "They need somebody with some stature in the industry to come in and run that cotton-picking company to see if they can make some money at it," said Mr. McCabe.  Richard McGraw, Comsat vice president of corporate affairs, dispelled speculation that Mr. Wussler's arrival means Comsat wants to take another shot at video programming.  "At this point, there are no plans to do anything other than to grow the existing {hotel} business," he said.  But Mr. Wussler -- who, before going to Turner in 1980, rose from the mailroom to become president of CBS Sports in a 21-year career with the network -- acknowledges that he wouldn't have left Turner Broadcasting merely to run a hotel pay-per-view operation.  "Comsat is in the satellite business, the research and development business -- they're at the cutting edge of all the things you need going into the 1990s," he said.  "You blend a sense of programming and marketing with that, and you really have something."  Tired of being the world's richest orphan, Taiwan is trying to use its newfound wealth to end its political isolation.  The new foreign policy it is developing is based on shifting from time-worn cold-war rhetoric to creative use of this island's newest export: cash.  The government's contribution is an initial $1 billion foreign economic-development fund, announced in October, from which money is being distributed to countries that Taiwan considers friendly.  Meanwhile, the private sector is pumping billions of dollars abroad by setting up thousands of factories and investing in acquisitions and joint ventures.  Businessmen are being pushed overseas by the appreciation of Taiwan's currency and high labor costs at home, but the government hopes to transform these private economic connections into tighter political ties.  "We want to be seen, we want to be heard, we want to be respected and we want to be a contributor to the international community," says Foreign Minister Lien Chan.  For all its wealth -- Taiwan has accumulated $75 billion in foreign-exchange reserves -- and its booming trade with almost every nation in the world, Taiwan remains a political outcast.  Most of the world recognizes Beijing, not Taipei, as the government of China.  It doesn't have a seat in the United Nations or membership in many other international organizations.  Indeed, diplomatic relations are limited to 24 nations, most of them impoverished Central American countries and tiny islands in the Caribbean and the Pacific.  Only 5% of Taiwan's trade is with countries that recognize it diplomatically.  Stung by a rise in its currency of more than 40% over the past 2 1/2 years and a serious labor shortage, Taiwan's entrepreneurs are moving their factories out of Taiwan at a rapid pace.  But that economic exodus may result in a political boon.  With Taiwan-owned petrochemical complexes in the U.S., toy factories in Thailand, textile mills in Indonesia, furniture plants in the Philippines and shoe factories in China, Taiwan hopes to build financial ties that will cause it to be treated as a country in its own right, regardless of China's longtime contention that Taiwan is a wayward province that eventually will be brought under Beijing's rule.  In the next decade, Taiwan's entrepreneurs intend to invest tens of billions of dollars overseas.  "The strategy is to promote substantive relations, and then raise these to semi-official relations, and then official relations," says Bertrand Tsai, a National Taiwan University professor and a foreign-policy adviser to President Lee Teng-hui.  The policy of using money to win friends and influence nations already is producing results.  Trade and industry ministers from throughout Asia have been coming to Taipei to court investors.  Communist-bloc countries are welcoming Taiwan's entrepreneurs.  And European diplomats, who have long shunned Taiwan, are finding excuses to visit the country on "tourist" outings.  "The boldness with which countries approach Taiwan is directly related to the amount of trade and investment each country has with Taiwan," says a Western diplomat.  Taipei's $1 billion economic-development fund is attracting widespread interest.  The fund's major goal is to tighten Taiwan's ties within Asia, where it has diplomatic relations with only one major country: South Korea.  The fund's managers have been touring Asia giving seminars on how to apply for funding.  The country's Asian-diplomacy efforts received a boost from Singapore Prime Minister Lee Kuan Yew in March.  Having decided to recognize Beijing, Singapore also made clear it wouldn't leave Taiwan in the cold.  Taiwan's President Lee was invited to Singapore and given the red-carpet treatment.  Furthermore, Singapore agreed to give Taiwan investors legal protection and to provide its businessmen with customs-clearance privileges.  Taipei's next Asian target is the Philippines, which is receiving more than $500 million in investments from Taiwan entrepreneurs.  In February, Foreign Minister Lien made a quiet trip to Manila to lobby for legislation to protect Taiwan's investors in the Philippines.  In April, the chief of Taiwan's ruling Nationalist Party, James Soong, followed that up with an unpublicized trip to meet President Corazon Aquino.  Last month, Manila expanded its unofficial office in Taipei to make it easier to get visas and to conduct bilateral trade and investment.  The efforts seem to be paying off.  Hardly a week goes by without Taipei hosting ministerial or trade delegations from abroad.  "Before, these people wouldn't set foot in Taiwan," says a textile-industry executive.  Australia recently sent its Hong Kong-based trade commissioner for southern China to work in Australia's representative office in Taipei.  The move comes as Taiwan's state-owned China Steel is considering investing several hundred million dollars to build a steel mill in Australia.  "It's quite amazing: Ever since the news of our foreign-exchange reserves got out, so many countries are coming to see us," says a Taiwan government official.  While foreign officials are increasing contacts with Taipei, Taiwan officials are reaching out further -- even to once-off-limits Communist nations.  In April, the cabinet approved giving preferential tariff treatment to East Germany, Hungary and Yugoslavia.  Economics Minister Chen Luan says Taipei is planning direct trade with Vietnam, Cambodia, Laos and Cuba, and indirect trade with North Korea.  Taipei is also pushing to return to international organizations.  The government is expected soon to file a formal application to rejoin the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.  There also has been talk in Taipei about trying to rejoin the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank.  Taiwan was forced to resign its memberships when it lost its place in the U.N. in 1971.  China has long prevented Taiwan from rejoining these international groups.  But there is hope in Taiwan that the outrage over the June 4 massacre in Beijing's Tiananmen Square will prompt other nations to disregard China's complaints.  "If the PRC {People's Republic of China} keeps this up, they will alienate themselves from the international community and we will gain by default," says Su Chi, a professor of international relations at Taiwan's National Cheng Chi University.  It isn't clear how successful all these efforts will be.  Foreign Minister Lien says he wants nothing short of Taiwan rejoining the U.N. Others say they believe the best that Taipei can hope for is arrangements that allow its officials to speak openly with other world leaders.  For their part, Taiwan's businessmen say they want to easily obtain foreign visas and to get legal guarantees, such as those now pledged by Singapore, that their offshore investments will be protected.  "I don't think we have a clear idea where this is going in the next 10 years," says Wu Rong-i, an official at the Taiwan Institute of Economic Research.  "Right now, it is a push-pull thing, with the private sector pulling the government and the government pushing the private sector."  The over-the-counter market advanced slightly in quiet trading, with the Nasdaq Composite Index rising 0.92 to 460.91.  Volume, which Monday amounted to a skimpy 100.4 million shares, improved to 133.5 million but was still below the average so far this month of about 137 million shares.  Although turnover has been fairly brisk lately, traders said activity usually slows in late August.  Last year, the average daily volume for the month was 113 million shares, making it the laziest summer month and the third slowest of the year.  "The market's just sitting there in limbo," said Lance Zipper, head of OTC trading at Kidder Peabody.  Hedi Reynolds, OTC trading chief at Morgan Keegan, Memphis, Tenn., attributed a little of the trading slowdown to investor uncertainty over the stock market's next move.  But she and Mr. Zipper both said most of it was simply due to the season.  Apple Computer headed the list of active issues, rising 5/8 to 41 3/8 on 1.5 million shares.  Oracle Systems slipped 1/8 to 17 1/2 on 1.3 million shares, Intel rose 1/8 to 30 1/4 on 1.2 million shares, and MCI Communications advanced 3/4 to 38 on 1.2 million shares.  The Nasdaq 100 Index, which includes the big technology and other major non-financial issues, rose 2.12 to 431.74, while the Nasdaq Financial Index declined 0.68 to 459.04.  For another big technology stock, Ashton-Tate, it was a relatively quiet day, considering the company's announcement that it plans to significantly reduce its work force as well as other operating expenses.  The stock eased 1/2 to 13 on 1.4 million shares, slightly more than triple its daily average.  The Torrance, Calif., concern said the planned layoffs would involve about 15% of its employees, or 1,700 workers world-wide.  The company also said its revenue will continue to be "adversely impacted" and that because of this and expected severance and other costs, it may post a wider operating loss for the third quarter, compared with the second quarter.  Ashton-Tate recently reported a second-quarter loss of $19.8 million on revenue of $59.5 million.  In the quarter ended Oct. 31, 1988, Ashton-Tate had earnings of $11.7 million, or 45 cents a share, on revenue of $75.7 million.  The company said this year's third quarter, which ends Sept. 30, will not be directly comparable to last year's.  LIN Broadcasting rose 2 1/8 to 107 3/4 on 742,000 shares.  A company spokesman said there was no news from the company to explain the activity.  Medstone International dropped 2 to 16 1/2 on 718,000 shares.  The maker of kidney stone treatment equipment said it notified the Food and Drug Administration's Center for Devices and Radiological Health of non-compliance regarding submission of reports and technical standards governing an X-ray system it uses.  The company said it believes that the hazard presented by the non-compliance isn't significant and that it has developed a plan of corrective action.  The Irvine, Calif., concern also said Richard L. Penfil resigned as president and a director.  Dr. Penfil, a radiologist, will remain as a consultant to the company's chairman and chief executive officer, Freeman Rose, Medstone said.  North-West Telecommunications soared 4 1/4 to 30 3/4.  The stock rose 2 1/2 Monday on news that the company had rejected a merger offer from a suitor who wasn't identified and had hired Morgan Stanley as a financial adviser.  Yesterday, company executives reiterated to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report that they haven't "been considering the sale of the company" and "didn't hire Morgan Stanley to sell the company."  According to the investor report, Morgan Stanley representatives are scheduled to meet with North-West in the next couple of days to begin evaluating the company.  Soon, telephone networks will be able to function much like the human body's circulatory system: When important arteries are damaged or cut, the system will pump phone service through new channels, keeping communication alive.  The Bell companies and their research arm, Bell Communications Research Inc., are testing a new technology designed to give the network "self-healing" or "self-correcting" abilities.  Emergency recovery systems became a subject of urgency in June 1988, when a fire gutted a two-story Illinois Bell Telephone Co. building in the Chicago suburb of Hinsdale, Ill.  The fire crippled key elements of the company's fiber-optic system and knocked out service to 35,000 customers.  At the time, the Hinsdale station was equipped to automatically shift only 25% of its load to other hubs.  Although repair crews worked around the clock, service to some customers couldn't be restored for a couple of weeks.  The incident underscored the vulnerability of telephone hubs to natural disasters.  Since the accident, Ameritech Corp., the parent of Illinois Bell, has pushed to develop a network protection plan.  It is testing self-healing technology in Cleveland and Columbus, Ohio.  "We took a look at what happened to us," says Robert W. Humes, vice president of operations planning at Ameritech's services unit.  "We realized that a customer has got to have more than one way to get around a point."  Moreover, threats to the phone system can come from many sources: Since strikes began earlier this month at four regional Bell companies, authorities have investigated more than 100 instances of vandalism and sabotage, including 70 cases of severed cables.  Neil Crystal, a district manager for evolution studies at Bellcore, explains that self-healing technology can give the telephone network the intelligence to re-direct phone traffic around severed cables or damaged central offices.  "The system functions completely autonomously," says Mr. Crystal.  But "somebody eventually will need to fix the damage" much in the same way that a doctor would need to treat an injury.  The self-healing network has a structure that differs markedly from the regular network, which generally uses a single-file formation to connect one central office with another, like a string of beads.  An obvious problem with the conventional structure is that a major problem along the cable or in a central office can interrupt telephone service down the line.  Central offices switch a telephone call from one facility to another until it reaches its destination.  In contrast, the self-healing network links each central office with optical fiber cable in a loop, or circle.  Next, the central offices are equipped with a Ring Diversity Switch, a special device that duplicates signals and sends them in opposite directions on the ring, ensuring that at least one arrives even if there is a major service problem along the loop.  "If you have a failure, the self-correcting network allows you to go around the problem area," explains John McPherson, executive vice president for BellSouth Corp.'s South Central Bell unit.  South Central Bell began testing the technology in Jackson, Miss., earlier this month.  While self-healing technology holds promise for small and medium-sized switching hubs, such networks probably couldn't salvage a superhub like Ameritech's Hinsdale center, at least not yet.  To string together several big office complexes on a ring would require tremendous computer capacity in the network.  Says Bellcore's Mr. Crystal: "That capacity isn't here today."  An alternative to the self-healing approach is a one-for-one protection scheme.  It would require the telephone companies to install an extra line traveling parallel to existing arteries, so that if one was damaged, traffic coud be switched to the standby system.  However, the standby system wouldn't be very cost effective, because most of the time it would sit idle.  Still in the development stage is an intelligent advanced routing system that could channel traffic in other directions in case of failure.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co., which manufactures the Ring Diversified Switch, already uses a similar system, known as dynamic nonhierarchical routing, which changes network patterns to direct swelling rush-hour traffic.  To re-direct traffic when there is a break, the network would need to locate the cut and the traffic.  To do that, Mr. Crystal says, special software must be developed and extra capacity added.  What's more, he says, the network would need to monitor the system constantly for signs of damage.  Eastern Airlines said it plans to boost its schedule to 600 flights a day by Sept. 7, but will need more help from its sister carrier Continental to pull it off.  To entice passengers to its expanded schedule, Eastern also reduced fares in a special fall promotion.  The September goal represents a 53% jump from the 390 daily flights Eastern managed this month.  If the airline succeeds in putting the additional flights in the air, it will be three-quarters of the way toward its ultimate goal of 800 flights a day.  Eastern has been rebuilding its schedule since a strike begun in March virtually grounded the carrier and forced it into Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings.  With pilots honoring the machinists union strike, Eastern had to hire and train new pilots, a time-consuming process.  Even pilots who have crossed the picket lines have had to undergo some retraining after being on strike for months.  The dearth of pilots caused Eastern to stumble a time or two in its rebuilding efforts and forced it to turn to Continental Airlines planes and crews to help it meet its projections.  Both Eastern and Continental are units of Houston-based Texas Air Corp.  To date, Eastern has used five Continental aircraft, complete with crews.  To meet the September schedule, Eastern will lease an additional 10 Continental planes and crews.  A spokeswoman said that the 15 leases represent about 10% of Eastern's capacity.  Some of Eastern's creditors are dismayed that the leases were entered into without the approval of U.S. Bankruptcy Judge Burton R. Lifland, but Eastern attorney Harvey Miller said the leases are part of Eastern's ordinary course of business and outside the purview of bankruptcy court.  Eastern's creditors committee has yet to take a formal position on the leases, however.  The fare cuts apply to trips throughout the U.S. on Eastern for travel between Sept. 7 and Oct. 31.  One-way fares between New York and Florida are $79 during the promotion, while fares one-way between Atlanta and the West Coast will be $129.  Eastern has relied heavily on low fares with minimum or no restrictions during its resuscitation.  But George Brennan, Eastern's vice president, marketing, said that service at Eastern has improved and has attracted additional business.  "We are putting out an excellent product," he said, pointing to the carrier's on-time performance.  "Among the major airlines, we've been No. 1 for nine of the last 10 months."  For July, he said, Eastern had a load factor of 74%, "by any measure a strong performance."  Has Tony J. Lozano got a deal for you]  Dressed in black slacks and a bright plaid shirt, he strolls around his 20-acre lot, hawking the bargains parked there.  A vintage cream-colored number, ready to drive away, can be yours for only $24,000.  Something a little plainer, but which had only a single owner, goes for $29,000.  "We're just like a used-car lot -- only we sell houses," says the owner of Tony J. Lozano's Used-House Lot, where the inventory currently consists of 16 homes and one tiny office building, some of them perched on timber frames with wheels.  Looking for a three-bedroom, one-bath, green stucco beauty with a one-car garage?  How about a three-bedroom stucco model in off-white with brown trim, complete with the makings of a brick flower bed heaped on the living-room floor?  Some of the offerings even come with drapes, carpeting and the odd piece of furniture -- an abandoned recliner, perhaps.  "That's a sweet house," says the 68-year-old Mr. Lozano, pointing to his latest acquisition: a wood-frame structure that, unlike many of its neighbors, still has all of its gutters intact.  In a state where the median price for an existing single-family home is $201,833, the highest in the country, Mr. Lozano is the patron saint of affordable housing.  For 29 years, the former roofing contractor has stocked his lot with houses bought cheaply -- some for as little as $1 each -- through condemnation proceedings or from homeowners wanting to build from scratch.  Such savings allow him to sell single-family houses for between $19,000 and $49,000, including the transportation.  Most of his customers couldn't afford to buy a home any other way.  "He's the Mother Teresa of housing," says John T. Reed, publisher of a real-estate newsletter based in Danville.  On any given day, up to a half-dozen families will descend on the lot, testing the houses' sturdiness in time-proven ways.  Some jump up and down on the porch or swing a foot against the walls.  Others peer underneath.  And for reasons that escape Mr. Lozano, some buyers give the tires on which the houses rest a good, swift kick.  So far this year, business has been relatively modest, with 20 houses sold.  None of the homes are exactly candidates for House Beautiful magazine, and some are real clunkers.  One has a gaping hole in the roof; another, an inconveniently large opening in the floor.  Still others have entire walls missing.  "This place," says Mr. Reed, "gives 'detached housing' new meaning."  Not to mention the phrase "home delivery."  After Mr. Lozano finds a house to buy, his crew moves in to disconnect the plumbing and wiring and dismantle any brickwork.  The movers then use a 14-inch industrial-strength saw to sever the building from its foundation.  It typically takes a day or two, depending on size, to prepare the house for transportation either back to Lozano's or directly to the buyer's lot.  Mr. Lozano will haul a customer's purchase to a specified site anywhere within a 125-mile radius of this northern California farming town, with the cost included in the purchase price.  In some cases, he has to work with utility companies to remove low-hanging power lines.  He has also had to negotiate narrow bridges and contend with hilly and winding roads.  "Sometimes," Mr. Lozano explains, "I have to cut up a house like a loaf of bread."  Though he says he has had only one accident (a garage once fell off a house in transit), there have been other problems, including hijackers.  A few years ago, while the crew was moving a four-bedroom Victorian to a customer's lot, a woman who had earlier expressed interest in the house -- but balked at the $16,000 price -- saw it being towed down a local highway.  She dashed to her bank, got an $8,000 certified check and presented it to the driver, ordering him to deliver the house to her own lot.  The crew complied, believing the sale had been cleared by Mr. Lozano.  The woman eventually paid the balance and kept the house.  But Mr. Lozano was sued by the original buyers, who sought damages for two big shade trees they had chopped down to accommodate the house.  The case, he says, was settled out of court for $1,900.  Because of the bargain-basement prices, such buyers as Bob and Christina Clark shrug off the houses' imperfections.  Thanks to Mr. Lozano, the Farmington couple last year found a three-bedroom, two-bath house with 1,700 square feet of floor space, about 400 square feet more than their previous home.  "It looked terrible on the lot," says Mrs. Clark, who remembers trying to ignore the weather-beaten exterior and battered interior as she stepped over the dead birds inside.  Nevertheless, her husband adds, "Once we saw it, we decided this was the house for us."  The cost of the Clarks' dream house was $27,500, and Mr. Clark says he spent about $20,000 more on plumbing, wiring, paint and other restoration costs.  He estimates that a comparable house in a new development would go for at least $100,000.  For needy customers who can't manage the payments, Mr. Lozano has even provided financing for up to a year.  "The little guy couldn't do it without us," he says.  "There's just no way that they can afford to buy.  Once they find out they can buy, the wives just cry."  Donna Patton nearly cried last month when Mr. Lozano delivered her Tudor-style home -- but for a different reason.  She and her husband had seen the house intact on its original site, set on a landscaped lot; it arrived cut in half with the roof sheared off.  "When it pulled up, I said to myself, 'Uh-oh, this can't be the house I purchased,'" she recalls.  Mrs. Patton and her husband are now planning to "stretch" the four-bedroom, two-bath dwelling by setting the pieces several feet apart and filling in the gaps.  The Pattons paid $36,000 for the house and figure it will be worth at least double that when set on a foundation.  Mr. Lozano's operation hasn't gone unnoticed.  Letters have reached his desk from as far away as Great Britain and West Germany, and inquiries have come in from some 24 states.  "Even Hawaii," boasts Agnes Lozano, Mr. Lozano's sister-in-law and personal bookkeeper.  Locally, word-of-mouth endorsements have made advertising unnecessary.  Elizar Caballero, a Manteca farmhand, first found Mr. Lozano a few months ago when he happened to drive down Airport Way, the narrow road that runs past Lozano's and a nearby goat and chicken sales lot.  He returned to the lot three times to house hunt.  Josephine Caballero, his wife, sniffed at the assortment, saying the kitchens were too small.  But Mr. Lozano found a house to their liking: a gray three-bedroom stucco, with an expansive living room and a fireplace, for just $20,000.  "It's a real charmer," Mr. Lozano says, noting that it came with a blue plastic shower curtain, beige carpeting and gold drapes.  The Caballeros jumped at the deal, and a few weekends ago the dealer's crew sawed the house into three sections and delivered it straight to the family's lot.  Mrs. Caballero is tickled with the oversize kitchen.  Mr. Caballero is happy, too.  "The wood," he says, giving the elevated living-room floor a solid thump with his hand, "is real good."  Stena Holding AG and Tiphook PLC sweetened their tender offer for Sea Containers Ltd. from $50 a share to $63 a share, or $963 million.  The new offer comes nearly two weeks after some unproductive talks among the parties on the possible sale to the two European shipping concerns of certain ferry and container assets of Sea Containers, which is based in Hamilton, Bermuda.  The sweetened bid, which analysts had expected, energized the equipment leasing and shipping concern's stock, which closed at $67.125 a share, up $4.125, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Analysts said the stock was trading above the new offering price because investors believe that shareholders will get even more in a restructuring.  James Sherwood, Sea Containers' chief executive officer, has said the company is considering a restructuring valued at $70 to $100 a share, but he has offered few details.  "You have to wonder about how realistic that {$63-a-share} bid is," said Walter Kirchberger, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc. Michael H. Carstens, an analyst at Tucker, Anthony & R.L. Day Inc., also termed the price low, saying a bid of $75 to $80 a share would be more appropriate.  Sea Containers refused to comment on the sweetened offer.  But the suitors say the all-cash offer is better than a restructuring that probably would involve cash and securities.  "We think $63 all cash more than matches" any possible restructuring, said Eric Goodwin, Tiphook's deputy chairman, adding that the offer represents a "full and fair price."  The latest bid, meanwhile, may pressure Sea Containers into providing more details about the restructuring, analysts and arbitragers said.  "With the higher bid, they're going to have to provide a little more information on the restructuring," Mr. Kirchberger said.  But Sea Containers can't immediately move forward with a restructuring because of a legal entanglement.  The company has been at least temporarily barred by the Bermuda Supreme Court from buying back its own stock in a case brought by Stena, based in Gothenburg, Sweden, and London-based Tiphook.  A final ruling isn't expected until the end of this month at the earliest.  Brooding beneath its black water tower, alone amid an immense stillness, this near-ghost town is a reminder -- and perhaps a portent.  Something terrible happened here.  Deserted sidewalks, pathways to nowhere, thread past yawning cellar pits of homes that no longer exist.  The town bristles with boarded-up buildings and don't-tread-on-me signs -- "Keep Out," "Private," "No Trespassing" -- and at least one don't-tread-on-me resident, who tells a visitor to "get the hell out of here."  The land itself, sometimes the sickly color of window putty, sometimes blown away to expose fist-sized rocks, is a Dust Bowl wound still healing over with grass.  Here is a landscape so vast that only its titanic thunderheads, boiling up in the slanting afternoon sunlight, seem in scale.  Yet there is something mesmerizing about its sweep and its solitude.  The Indian word Keota, by one definition, refers to a fire died out.  And so it symbolizes the question overhanging this least-known, least-appreciated region of the U.S.  Is the fire dying out in the Great Plains?  The Plains, the area between the Rocky Mountains and the 98th meridian, encompasses a fifth of the contiguous 48 states -- but only 1/40th of the U.S. population.  This is the American Outback.  The region is so young that the lives of men like Willie Engelhardt, 73, can encompass three-fourths of the post-Indian history of a place.  Sitting in the Mingo, Kan., grain elevator he owns, surrounded by postcards addressed simply "Willie/Mingo, Kan.," he talks of growing up in a sod house and of Dust Bowl days so bad he was forced to eat supper beneath a dampened bedsheet.  And, paradoxically, of his love for the incessant wind -- "It kind of keeps you honest" -- his town, and "this flatness."  But Mingo, a major Union Pacific shipping center in the 1890s, has melted away to little more than the grain elevator now.  It is an apt symbol of a region confronting stark choices about its very future, a region losing its rural towns, using up its water, and -- in one apocalyptic prediction -- inexorably slipping back into the grassland whence it came.  Writing in Planning magazine, Frank and Deborah Popper of Rutgers University in New Jersey describe the Plains as "an austere monument to American self-delusion."  The delusion, embodied in the Homestead Act, was that sodbusters should plow up the semi-arid, windswept region -- land better suited to ranching than farming.  The Poppers -- he is the chairman of the urban studies department, she is a geographer -- predict that over the next generation, the region will inevitably become almost totally depopulated.  The wisest thing the federal government could do, they argue, is start buying back great chunks of the Plains, replant the grass, reintroduce the bison -- and turn out the lights.  There is a precedent for something like that.  After the Dust Bowl, the government did buy back a New Jersey-sized empire of ravaged Plains land, establishing a network of national grasslands that includes the Pawnee National Grassland in northeastern Colorado.  But the Poppers are thinking on a grander scale.  They call their idea Buffalo Commons.  "The Buffalo Commons will be the world's largest historic preservation project, the ultimate national park," they say.  "Most of the Great Plains will become what all of the United States once was."  Empty.  "Unbelievable," retorts Congressman Pat Roberts, a Republican who represents the western half of Kansas.  A tart-tongued and practical man who keeps the daily price of Kansas wheat chalked up on his Washington blackboard, he says such ideas amount to "Walden Pond agriculture, complete with a three-legged dog named Lucky who reads the Saturday Evening Post."  Yet there is no doubt that the region, like the Rust Belt before it, is in the midst of a wrenching transition.  What is emerging, says President Philip Burgess of the Center for the New West, a Denver think tank, is an "archipelago society" -- urban islands along the interstate highways separated by a sea of wheat, corn and grass.  The small towns that once linked them are disappearing.  Michael Krier, 41, battles drought, hail and the wind on a 2,000-acre farm near Keota.  But he does so by commuting some 100 miles, round trip, from his home in the comparatively big city of Greeley, Colo.  He bought the farm and broke the sod four years ago.  Now, amid a four-year drought, he wonders if this harsh, unforgiving land might better have been left in its natural state.  "The dust blows pretty easy out here," he says.  A few other plainsmen, almost heretics in a land of high-tech agriculture and can-do optimism, are thinking similar thoughts.  Former rancher Robert Scott, through an Institute of the Rockies forum, has proposed that 10% of Montana be converted into "The Big Open," a privately owned Serengeti-like hunting preserve.  University of Oklahoma geographer Bret Wallach suggests that the Forest Service start a long-term program of buying out marginal farmers.  Even without any sweeping master plan, up to 25% of some Plains counties is going back to grass anyway under the federal Conservation Reserve Program, which pays farmers to take marginal acreage out of production.  Meanwhile, a Kansas State University team has recommended a state policy of "triage" that would gradually write off many towns of fewer than 2,500 people, freeing scarce state resources for places with a better chance of survival.  "We don't need political rhetoric," says study member Mark Lapping, professor of regional and community planning.  "We're in deep trouble here."  The economic stakes are far-reaching.  If the Plains were a separate nation, estimates Christopher McKinnon of the Western Governors Association, "it would be the world's fourth-largest wheat producer and its sixth-largest oil producer."  He roughly estimates its gross regional product at $146 billion.  Populations of many of the 400-odd High Plains counties have been in erratic decline throughout this century.  Evelyn Everhart, who runs a combination filling station and sundries store in Last Chance, Colo., lives in a hamlet that has peaked and all but died in little more than six decades.  The consolidated school district covers some 650 square miles.  But she likes it here.  "A lot of people come by and say, 'What do you do?'" she says with a smile.  "We do the same thing as anybody else."  An estimated 4,000 miles of Kansas streams and rivers, strangled by irrigation, now run only intermittently.  In Hays, Kan., where the Smoky Hill River was essentially dry for a year and a half, the riverbed itself caught on fire.  But what is also under siege is a way of life.  Small towns where youngsters on bikes dart like swallows at dusk.  A Marlboro Man world where farmers patrol beneath a limitless sky on $50,000 tractors.  Tribune, Kan., newspaperman and author Dan Epp calls the Plains a last refuge of an earlier era -- real people, still making real things -- in "a nation of clerks."  Perhaps that is one reason the region suddenly finds itself the subject not only of a flurry of academic studies, but also of a flurry of literary works.  Among others, author Ian Frazier has just published "Great Plains," a celebration of the region, and Tony Parker is out with "Bird, Kansas," a study of an actual Plains town given a fictional name.  "People in pith hats," grumbles Rep. Roberts, "are discovering the Plains the way they used to discover New Guinea."  What they are discovering stands at least one common assumption on its head.  The Plains are overwhelmingly agricultural, yet the new jobs being generated there seem to be non-agricultural.  A North Dakota study by the Council of State Policy and Planning Agencies finds that nearly a fourth of North Dakotans are employed in businesses that didn't exist in 1980.  And only 2% to 4% of those new businesses are agricultural.  "The fundamental question is what you're going to do with all those acres," says Mark Drabenstott, a Federal Reserve economist in Kansas City, Mo.  The Plains are like some auxiliary generator, kicking in additional acreage in times of high demand for its grain and beef.  The questions are whether world demand will continue strong -- and how long the Plains can meet it if it does.  Today the heart of the Plains is an oasis culture nurtured by an aquifer.  It is called the Ogallala, and some think it may contain almost as much recoverable water as there is in Lake Huron.  Trouble is, "we're pumping it out 20 times faster than it's recharging itself," says Richard Black, a Kansas State University irrigation specialist.  A decade or more ago, scattered Texas Panhandle farms began reverting to dryland farming -- farming without irrigation -- at the Ogallala's southern edge, where the water-bearing formation is thinnest.  This process is expected to spread northward over a period variously estimated from decades to a century or more.  What seems inevitable is a slow, semi-abandonment of marginal lands.  But good land, even if eventually reduced to dryland farming, could remain in production indefinitely, experts say.  "You could make an argument for continued Great Plains agriculture on national security implications alone," says John Wunder, director of the University of Nebraska's Center for Great Plains Studies.  Mr. Wunder says apocalyptic proposals like Buffalo Commons remind him of "ghost dancing," the strange and poignant ceremony that gripped the Plains Indians and their dying culture around 1890.  Dancing themselves into exhaustion, the Indians believed they could reverse history to pre-white days.  "There's a certain ghost danciness to these ideas too," says Mr. Wunder.  "The buffalo will come back, the land will be lush, few people will venture into it."  The consensus view -- that technology can continue to stay one jump ahead of nature -- explains the look of Plains towns.  They resemble military staging areas: Plainville, Kan., with its huge piles of tires, oil pumps and great spools of cable; Burlington, Colo., crammed with tractors, grain augers and disks.  There is a war on.  When the white man ripped up the sod, he substituted an artificial ecosystem for a natural one.  Nature, writhing as if under a net, struggles to reassert itself.  The net is composed of herbicides, irrigation systems which draw down the water table and radical new tillage practices.  Maintaining the net requires ever-more-ingenious innovations.  One Texas experiment, for example, has tested a dryland tillage scheme that, in effect, requires abandoning half the land in order to save the remaining half.  Alternate strips of land are super-hardened so rainwater runs right off of them.  The water collects in the adjacent strips, where the crops are planted.  But most innovations are more benign.  A new Texas irrigation technique "spoonfeeds" precisely measured amounts of water to small machine-formed basins around cotton plants.  It cuts the water needed by one-half, while actually increasing yield.  "I'm extremely optimistic," says William Lyle, a Texas A&M agricultural engineering professor who helped develop the technique.  "Twenty years ago I thought we were in a water-depletion spiral that possibly wouldn't stop.  Now I believe we can effectively irrigate for another 50 to 100 years."  In northwest Kansas, where the Ogallala formation is thicker than in Texas, agriculture experts are nevertheless more cautious.  Kansas State University specialists predict that, at the present rate, irrigation could last a half-century.  But they are working on an underground drip-irrigation system that could double that, and new drought-tolerant crops could extend the day of reckoning longer still.  The inescapable fact, however, is that one day the water is going to run out or become too expensive to pump up.  "We're going to see less production.  There's no way around it," says Kansas State extension economist Mark Nelson.  "But it's not going to be a cataclysmic thing."  He predicts a gradual switch-over from corn -- an "oasis" crop that can survive in these parts only through massive irrigation -- to dryland farming and wheat.  With the corn, though, may go the sprawling, smelly beef-cattle feedlots that now pump economic vitality into Plains towns like Garden City, Kan.  But the land itself will remain -- the great, windswept land of gentle hills that turn blue-violet in the dusk.  The land, and perhaps bison too, and certainly leathery survivors like rancher Howard Schreiber.  A lean and laconic 65, Mr. Schreiber talks in his living room, near Last Chance, Colo., as the meadowlarks sing outside.  He talks of violent weather: Of the 24-hour period last winter when the temperature plunged from 80 degrees to 8 below, of the day last March when howling winds blew eastern Colorado and western Kansas topsoil all the way into Missouri.  But mostly he talks of surviving along his Plum Bush Creek, surviving to the end of his days if he can.  "I think it's the desire of everybody in the world to own their own land, don't you?" he asks.  Two companies that have been in court for the past two years over antitrust charges are battling each other over press releases.  Laser Lube Inc., a Berlin, N.J., franchiser of automotive-lubrication shops, planned to discuss the status of its $295 million lawsuit against Witco Corp. and Avis Corp. at a news conference this morning.  But late yesterday afternoon, Witco sought a temporary restraining order to keep the franchiser from "disseminating court documents that are subject to protective orders under the court."  Alan M. Abrams, vice president and general counsel for Witco, a major chemical company, declined to comment on the case.  The suit had been languishing in U.S. District Court in Camden, N.J., since August 1987, with an amended complaint filed in May 1989.  The case drew public notice this week when Laser Lube sent out a press release touting partial results of its pretrial investigation.  The case isn't expected to go to trial until February 1990.  Asked why Laser Lube hadn't made a public anouncement earlier, a spokesman explained, "They were waiting until they gathered enough information.  There are a lot of fresh depositions."  The suit charges that Witco's Kendall Refining division, Bradford, Pa., interfered with agreements between Laser Lube and its franchises and, working in concert with Avis, developed a plan to drive the chain out of business.  In September 1986, Kendall and Avis, based in Garden City, N.Y., agreed to form K&A Partnership to develop a nationwide chain of Avis Lube Centers.  The suit charges that during meetings in the first half of 1986, Kendall obtained valuable marketing information from Laser Lube regarding the franchise operation, without disclosing that it planned to enter the market as a competitor.  Those meetings led to an agreement in which Laser Lube agreed to buy fast-lube dispensing equipment from Kendall.  But later that year, Laser Lube President Ralph Venuto spurned offers by Kendall to acquire Laser Lube.  Unable to acquire the company, and fearful that Laser Lube would cause competitve problems for the Avis lube chain, the suit charges, "Kendall engaged in a scheme to drive Laser Lube out of business."  Australian Treasurer Paul Keating projected a record budget surplus of 9.12 billion Australian dollars (US$6.93 billion) for the current fiscal year but said the government would spend "every cent" of it to reduce the nation's growing debt.  Mr. Keating warned that Australia's budget success isn't enough to head off other economic perils.  Specifically, he said interest rates are likely to remain high as the government tries to rein in an overheated economy, and he predicted Australia's big trade deficit would grow.  "This government isn't prepared to countenance a premature fall in interest rates," Mr. Keating said in his budget message for the year ending June 30.  "Rates cannot and should not fall until it is economically responsible."  Among the economic clouds on the horizon, Mr. Keating said, is an expected increase in Australia's already hefty A$130 billion foreign debt -- much of which is owed by the private sector -- as the country's payments deficit widens.  And he indicated that inflation probably won't fall significantly in fiscal 1990.  Mr. Keating forecast that economic growth will slow to 2.8% in the current year from an estimated 3.3% in the year just ended, though some treasury officials believe the latest estimate may have to be raised.  The budget news produced a lukewarm response from financial analysts.  "The government is concerned to portray a vision of {economic} growth slowing down and that in turn points to improvement in inflation and the current-account deficit," said Els Termaat, an economist at investment bank Fay, Richwhite Australia Ltd.  But implicit in the government's forecasts, she said, is that any improvement "really won't happen till next {fiscal} year."  The crux of Australia's economic problems is its foreign debt.  Each monthly current-account deficit adds to the foreign debt and pushes up debt-servicing costs.  "It feeds on itself," said Andre Morony, chief economist at Bankers Trust Australia Ltd. Australia's goal must be to start posting trade surpluses so that it can cut its foreign debt and debt servicing costs, economists say.  Mr. Keating said that tight monetary policies will slow demand for imports and help curb the burgeoning current-account deficit.  Still, he said the current-account gap is expected to widen to A$18.5 billion in the current year from A$17.4 billion last year.  Even though the federal government plans to repay around A$1.75 billion of its foreign debt, the nation's total foreign debt this year is expected to balloon to nearly A$150 billion because of the current-account deficit.  Maersk Line Ltd. received a $61.4 million Navy contract for the operation and maintenance of ocean surveillance ships.  Martin Marietta Corp. got a $59.4 million Air Force contract for navigation and targeting equipment.  Lockheed Corp. was awarded a $36.9 million Navy contract for development and production of Trident II missiles.  Williams International Corp. received a $10.7 million Navy contract for Tomahawk missile engines.  The Economist is the best newsmagazine in the world.  In the scope of its coverage, the grace of its editorials, and the well-written analyses provided by its reporters, it is far superior to Time, Newsweek, U.S. News and World Report, and their European counterparts.  Yet there is one section of the Economist that is far weaker than the rest of the magazine -- the "American Survey," which covers the U.S. Bias, condescension and misplaced priorities ensure that the Economist's readers are given a distorted version of America and American life.  A majority of the articles in the "American Survey" section are written from Washington.  Of the 224 articles published in the "American Survey" section in the six months between Jan. 1 and June 30, 1989, 117 had Washington datelines.  Even the Exxon Valdez oil spill was covered from Washington.  Except for San Francisco and New York, where the Economist has regular coverage, other sections of the country were treated as if they were as remote -- and as important -- as Ouagadougou or Bandar Seri Bagawan.  Chicago, for example, was mentioned only as part of a roundup story; Philadelphia was ignored.  Phoenix and San Antonio were surveyed as part of a series on "America's larger small cities," even though their populations (estimated by the Census Bureau to be 894,350 and 914,350, respectively, in 1986) make them larger than any British city except Birmingham and London.  The Economist's U.S.-based reporters also have the irritating habit of interrupting their articles to critique American manners and mores.  Most Americans, we learn, are gun-crazed, lawyer-loving narcissists.  An April 6 story noted, "Americans who don't take out their frustrations with a gun tend to do so with a lawsuit."  Kennesaw, Ga., a March 25 story added, is a "gun-totin', all-American city" because it requires city residents to own weapons.  Americans, we are told, are strangely obsessed with fame.  Black educator Joe Clark, an April 1 profile opined, "has achieved the American dream: he is more than just a success, he is a celebrity."  And unlike more civilized countries, Americans like country music.  President Bush's "taste in music is if anything worse than Mr. Reagan's," said the Jan. 21 issue.  Mr. Bush had, you see, invited Loretta Lynn and Crystal Gayle (whose name the Economist misspelled) to sing at the inaugural balls.  The Economist's political coverage is as quirky as its views on American culture.  With some notable exceptions, the Economist's reporters in the U.S. follow this rule: Democrats tend to be noble, selfless guardians of the public trust.  Republicans at best are lowbrows; at worst, wrongminded fanatics.  Speaker of the House Thomas Foley, we learned from the April 22 number, is "honor personified"; a June 3 profile offered the additional news that Mr. Foley is "trustworthy, well-grounded, fairminded, distinguished."  Democratic National Committee chairman Ron Brown was described, meanwhile, in a Feb. 4 article, as a "smooth, smart Washington insider."  When the Economist cannot think of anything nice to say about a Democrat, it prefers to say nothing at all.  During the protracted fall of Jim Wright, for example, the Economist restrained its usual urge to offer illuminating comments until June 3, when the speaker's character was finally summed up as "impetuous, pugnacious, courageous."  While Republican House Whip Newt Gingrich was regularly pilloried as an obnoxious loudmouth ("It must be agony for Mr. Gingrich," the magazine sniffed on April 22, "to be quiet and reasonable"), when Tony Coelho, the similarly combative House Democratic leader, resigned under a cloud, the Economist merely noted that he was a "brilliant fund-raiser."  Being rife with Republicans, President Bush's cabinet naturally fails to meet the Economist's standards.  William Bennett, director of the Office of National Drug Control Policy, though "an unpompous, clever man," is best known for his "outstanding, demagogic gifts" (Jan. 21).  HUD Secretary Jack Kemp and Secretary of Transportation Samuel Skinner, a March 11 piece sniffed, are both "brighter spots" in the cabinet who "fade when examined closely."  According to a June 24 story, "the finance ministers of other countries have formed a low opinion" of "weak" Nicholas Brady, the Treasury secretary.  The Economist's rare gentleness to Republicans is double-edged.  In the John Tower affair, for example, the Economist attacked Democrats who argued that Mr. Tower was a dangerous alcoholic likely to confuse a bourbon bottle with a cruise missile.  Noting that Winston Churchill regularly drank several glasses of whiskey, brandy, champagne, and at least one high-ball during the working day, the Economist observed on March 4, "he could never have been trusted to run the Pentagon."  But Mr. Tower seems to have won the Economist's sympathy not on his merits but as a victim of America's alleged moralism.  "America sometimes seems torn between its puritan roots and its hedonist instincts," the magazine wrote, quoting former Arizona Gov. Bruce Babbitt's notion that the anti-Tower campaign was but the latest manifestation of a "fundamentalist revival."  The Economist's worst scorn, however, is reserved not for Republicans but for conservatives.  Consider its handling of the think-tank world.  Liberal think tanks, such as the Urban Institute, the Brookings Institution, the Center for Science in the Public Interest, and the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace are treated respectfully, and their scholars and studies are regularly used as the basis for stories.  In contrast, the major American conservative think tanks are ignored.  In six months, the American Enterprise Institute, the Hoover Institution, and the Center for Strategic and International Studies were not mentioned at all; the Heritage Foundation was mentioned once, in a story about urban homelessness quoted Department of Housing and Urban Development official Anna Kondratas, a former Heritage employee. (Even then, the Economist misspelled her name.)  Meanwhile, British market-oriented think tanks, such as the Institute for Economic Affairs, the Centre for Policy Studies, and the Adam Smith Institute, are mentioned frequently in the Economist's "Britain" section, and their publications often are given full-page analyses.  It should be noted that the editor of the "American Survey" during the first half of 1989 was the editor of the New Republic, Michael Kinsley.  It would be nice if Mr. Kinsley and the other Anglophile Americans who work for the Economist in London and the U.S. refrained from traducing American ways as they embrace British ones.  As for the British contributors to the Survey, probably nothing can be done about them: Sneering at America seems to be in the water, a cultural equivalent of fluoride.  But it would be a major advance if the Economist would at least regard America's conservatives in the same way as it thinks of their trans-Atlantic counterparts: not as demons or as deviants, but as sources who should be quoted when they are intelligent and ignored when they are dull.  ---  Mr. Wooster is the Washington editor of Reason magazine.  As Hilton Hotels Corp.'s financial advisers begin contacting potential bidders for the hotel-casino company, two major foreign companies thought to be possible buyers denied rumors that they've been talking to Hilton, while another said it isn't interested in acquiring the company.  Two Japanese concerns, All Nippon Airways and Japan Air Lines, denied that they've been talking to Hilton, but analysts said that doesn't necessarily rule out their participation in a joint bid with other investors.  In Tokyo, a spokesman for JAL said Hilton had approached it several months ago about buying a Hilton hotel near Los Angeles International Airport, but the airline decided not to pursue it.  Analysts in Japan say the two airlines aren't likely to bid for Hilton, but it's possible that they might take part in consortia that may make an offer for the company.  Sources here and abroad say that several Japanese financial and real estate concerns already have contacted Hilton's advisers, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Eastdil Realty Corp., to express interest.  Meanwhile, Ladbroke Group PLC, the hotel, gambling and property concern that owns the Hilton International hotel chain, said it's not interested in bidding for Hilton's Nevada casinos or network of 270 owned, leased, managed or franchised properties.  In late 1987, the British firm paid $1.07 billion to acquire the Hilton International chain from UAL Corp. of Chicago and has since expanded the operations to include hotels in the United States under the Vista name.  Hilton International was sold off by Hilton Hotels Corp. in the 1960s.  While some market sources speculate that Hilton hasn't been able to attract firm bids for its properties and is pressed to solicit bidders, Hilton officials reiterated that the company and its advisers have received "numerous" inquiries since May.  William C. Lebo Jr., Hilton's general counsel, declined to comment on specific bidders but indicated that the company isn't rushing into the bidding process.  "It's still very, very early in the process, and no one has had a chance to see our information," he said, referring to the packages of confidential information that should be available in early September.  Any transaction is expected to close in 1990.  Hilton's stock, which has traded as high as $115.50 in recent weeks on speculation that a bid would emerge soon, closed yesterday at $108 a share, up $1.375, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  ---  Yumiko Ono in Tokyo contributed to this article.  Network Equipment Technologies Inc., a communications products concern, said it adopted a shareholder-rights plan to discourage unfair takeover tactics.  The plan calls for preferred stock purchase rights to be distributed as dividend to stock of record Aug. 25.  The rights are exercisable under certain conditions, such as when an investor or investor group purchases at least 20% of its stock or announces a tender for at least 20%.  If Network is acquired or sells 50% or more of its assets to an investor, the rights entitle holders to purchase stock in the acquiring company at a discount.  Full details of the plan are to be mailed to shareholders, the company said.  Ruddick Corp.'s Harris Teeter Inc. supermarket unit said July sales rose 14% to $101.6 million from $89.3 million in July 1988.  Same-store sales rose 5.1%, the retailing and venture-capital concern said.  PRIVATE-RULING DEMANDS spark an IRS plea for guidance from the public.  A desire to ease burdens on its limited resources from taxpayers' requests for individual rulings led the IRS into controversy.  As expected, it is delaying until Feb. 5 a plan to curtail "comfort" rulings -- issued just to confirm the clear effects of proposed transactions -- while it reviews practitioners' protests.  But in announcements 89-104 and 89-105, it also poses broad questions about how to cut the load and speed the process and asks for suggestions.  The IRS lists nine possible steps.  Among them: limiting the ban on comfort rulings to specified issues, expediting rulings on certain issues and giving lower priority to others, or raising comfort-ruling fees.  The IRS notes that of the 2,233 private rulings issued in the nine months ended June 30, 30% took over six months to prepare and 22% took four to six months; 39% of the 147 general public rulings took over a year.  People who suggest stepping up activities in one area should also suggest areas for cutbacks, the IRS cautions.  THIS PAYROLL ERROR compounds the pain of a once disabled worker.  A luckless employee we'll call Lucy returned to work in February 1986 after getting temporary disability pay.  Wrongly, the personnel office listed her as a re-employed annuitant.  Thus she continued to get a disability annuity from an insurer, and her employer deducted an equal sum from her wages.  In July, the annuity stopped; yet the deductions went on.  Finally in 1987, the employer gave Lucy $7,000 in back wages; but now the insurer wants a $3,000 refund.  Lucy asked the IRS when to report the back wages and whether the refund is a deductible business loss.  Here is what private ruling 8930029 prescribes: The back wages are 1987 income.  Lucy may deduct the refund as a miscellaneous item in the year paid -- but that means she needs enough deductions overall to itemize and that she may deduct only miscellaneous items that exceed 2% of her adjusted gross income.  A RULING OVER a rollover error saves a Sears retiree from tax on his IRA.  Lump-sum pension payouts are taxable when received, unless transferred within 60 days into another tax-deferral plan, such as an individual retirement account.  When William Wood of Warwick, R.I., retired in 1983, he had until Sept. 12 to roll over $26,423 in cash and $41,854 in Sears stock.  In August, he signed papers to open an IRA with Merrill Lynch and turned over the payouts.  Records show Merrill Lynch put the cash in the IRA before the deadline -- but kept the stock in another account until January 1984.  Although Wood got statements showing this, he didn't notice and didn't discover the error until the IRS audited his 1983 return and claimed tax on the stock's value.  He turned to the Tax Court.  The IRS argued that Wood should have known the stock wasn't in his IRA and that he was bound by the firm's error.  But Judge Ruwe, ruling for Wood, says a mere bookkeeping slip doesn't govern the substance of a transaction.  In fact, the rollover occurred when Merrill Lynch, as trustee, accepted the cash and stock for deposit in an IRA.  UNCLE SAM WON'T HELP finance this crime.  Convicted of fraud, Jon T. Stephens of New York was fined and sentenced to prison and paid $530,000 in restitution in lieu of more prison time.  Now the Tax Court says the restitution is like a fine -- not deductible as a loss or business cost.  CHARITABLE GIFTS of appreciated assets, such as art, have shown "dramatic decline" since tax revision brought them under the alternative minimum tax, Sen. Boren (D., Okla.) says.  S. 1577, entered by Boren and five others, would remove such donations from the tax's reach.  ARROGANT DEFIANCE of bankruptcy law must cost the IRS $100,000 in punitive damages, a U.S. judge in Houston rules.  He says the IRS wrongly seized property of restaurant owner Thomas A. Lile that was protected by proceedings in bankruptcy court.  THE PUBLIC FUSS over its IRA opinion catches the Labor Department off guard.  Officials saw nothing surprising in their reply to one bank's query on a proposed incentive.  The reply said the law bars individual-retirement-account customers from getting free checking in return for investing IRA funds in the bank's products.  That stand on IRA come-ons is an old one, says Labor's Ivan Strasfeld.  But officials apparently weren't aware that banks had thought it was all right to offer service incentives after dropping the appliance and like premiums outlawed years ago.  The department's opinion is "misguided," the American Bankers Association protests.  If applied generally, the opinion could affect millions of customers using IRAs to help earn free checking, cut-rate loans, or other deposit-based rewards.  And when Labor labels an IRA transaction as prohibited, the IRS must nullify the IRA's tax breaks and may apply penalties.  Now bankers want a clear reprieve for existing IRAs and some exemption for future incentives.  Taken aback by the reaction, Labor is reconsidering a 1983 proposal -- left dormant because it didn't seem necessary -- to allow IRA premiums valued at up to $20.  But Labor isn't indicating what it may do or when it may act.  BRIEFS: In October, Louisiana will begin to give foreign travelers refunds of state and local sales taxes, much as many foreign nations rebate value-added taxes. . . .  82,539 Maryland taxpayers gave $964,008 to environmental-protection programs through a new checkoff provision on state returns.  The Internal Revenue Service has launched what may become one of the service's biggest attempts to snare private investors for participating in an allegedly abusive tax shelter, according to people familiar with the company's affairs.  IRS officials have begun seeking back taxes from people who invested in limited partnerships sponsored by Amcor Capital Corp.  The action follows a nearly two-year IRS criminal probe of Amcor that came to light recently and looms as the first direct financial fallout for the company's roughly 4,000 limited partner investors nationwide.  Amcor has been a major syndicator of agricultural tax shelters since 1981.  But in June, the company was accused in a Los Angeles federal court affidavit of generating between $600 million and $1 billion in "fraudulent deductions" for its investors.  While no formal criminal charges have been filed, an IRS agent asserted in the affidavit that hundreds of thousands of acres of crops supposedly grown for Amcor partnerships weren't ever grown or that Amcor engaged in an elaborate charade using farmers as front men on lands that were never planted for the partnerships' benefit.  The charges, which allege one of the largest tax scams in recent memory, were considered all the more surprising because Amcor maintained a good record in the now-ailing syndication industry, and attracted a number of wealthy and prominent investors, including the likes of "Jeopardy" game-show host Alex Trebek and baseball star Wade Boggs.  Amcor itself has denied the charges, and has asserted that the IRS is acting on "incomplete, misleading, and in some cases, inaccurate" information.  Nonetheless, last month, according to the sources close to the company, the IRS notified Amcor that it intends to disallow deductions for at least some of the partnerships, exposing individual investors in those partnerships to potentially large payments of back taxes and probably interest and penalties to boot.  One source indicated that perhaps only a handful of the more than 100 partnerships that the company has syndicated since 1981 were currently being targeted.  But some people familiar with the case speculated that refund orders would proliferate.  Tax-law experts said it wasn't unusual for the IRS to distribute these so-called deficiency notices piecemeal, often choosing test cases that could later serve as grounds for challenging additional partnerships.  In its June affidavit, the IRS has alleged that most of the company's partnerships were tainted by improper deductions.  Said one individual close to Amcor with knowledge of the notices sent thus far: "The basic position is that the contracts {to grow the crops} were a sham."  Officials of Amcor, based in Irvine, Calif., didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  The company is believed to have up to 60 days to respond to the IRS position after receiving the notices.  Following a likely administrative proceeding, the service will issue a final order.  At that point, the company can, on behalf of its investors, still challenge the adjustments in tax court or pay the additional tax and seek a refund in federal court.  In recent meetings with investors, Amcor has discussed the possibility of retaining special tax counsel to represent investor interests before the IRS.  It wasn't known whether the company has notified its investors of the IRS deficiency-notice proceeding, but some attorneys with Amcor-investor clients said they weren't aware of any such word being communicated.  The IRS notices may likely inflame relations between Amcor and its investors, many of whom have until now been supportive of the company in the face of the IRS investigation.  Amcor was recently served with a class-action suit by an unhappy investor, and the litigation could now well escalate.  Attorneys for other investors around the country had previously said they were holding off on legal action until the service attempted to collect past-due taxes.  The government is believed to be barred by federal statutes of limitations from seeking refunds for deductions that investors took in 1981 and 1982.  And the tax liability of more recent investors could be somewhat mitigated because Amcor partnerships were structured so that investors had to essentially recoup some of the deductions in subsequent years.  But the tax bite is still apt to be substantial.  Like many limited partnerships, Amcor's were structured to give investors deductions that were often three times the amount of an investor's cash investment.  Moreover, tax experts said it was likely that the IRS was seeking substantial penalties against investors along with the routinely assessed interest on allegedly past-due taxes.  These items could quickly run up the total bill.  Since Amcor began syndicating partnerships, the IRS interest assessment has ranged as high as 20% a year, meaning that interest alone could more than double the amount that investors in some early Amcor partnerships may have to pay.  Penalties, meanwhile, range up to 30% of the tax due, and "the IRS has sort of automatically asserted penalties" following a recent strengthening of federal tax laws covering partnerships, according to Bill Morris, an attorney for the Investment Partnership Association, a Washington, D.C., limited-partnership trade group.  The government's investigation of Amcor, meanwhile, appears to be compounding some company financial difficulties.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing last month, for instance, Amcor said that publicity from the IRS probe had "severely hampered" its syndication business and that "it is unlikely that the company will be able to generate significant syndication fees in the near future. . ."  It said holders of about 8% of roughly $4.9 million in debentures it recently issued had rescinded their purchases as a result of the IRS probe.  It also disclosed that 88% of its current assets at May 31 were debt and receivables due from its partnerships, "some" of which were "presently not operating successfully. . . ."   Viacom International Inc. said it arranged for a $1.4 billion, 10-year senior unsecured credit facility with Citibank and the Bank of New York.  Viacom said the purposes of the credit facility are to refinance senior secured bank debt outstanding and to provide increased credit for general corporate purposes, redemption of other debt securities and support for the company's entrance into the commercial paper market.  A spokesman for the communications and entertainment company said the credit pact isn't being arranged for purposes of acquisition, but "to strengthen the financial structure of the company."  Viacom International's parent company is Viacom Inc., which is approximately 83%-owned by National Amusements Inc., a closely held corporation that owns and operates movie screens in the U.S. and United Kingdom.  Andrew Wallach, a media analyst with Drexel Burnham Lambert, said: "I think what is going on is that Viacom is reducing its borrowing costs now that its credit quality has improved in the past year."  Mr. Wallach added that cash flow is better than expected at Viacom this year, "primarily because of very strong growth in cable-television advertising."  The Massachusetts Hospital Association sued Gov. Michael Dukakis and other state officials, seeking to speed payment of about $350 million the hospitals claim are owed to them under the Medicaid program.  The suit underscores Massachusetts' budget problems and related strains in the state's health-care system that threaten to undermine the state's new universal health-care law.  The suit seeks to force the state to accelerate its Medicaid review process, but doesn't specify exactly how to speed up the review.  The association, which represents 154 Massachusetts hospitals, charged in its suit that last year the state implemented strict new rules for reviewing the hospitals' Medicaid billings that needlessly delay payment.  The federal-state Medicaid program helps pay for health care for the needy, aged, blind and disabled.  In Massachusetts, hospitals submit claims to the state for treating patients covered by the program.  The state pays 50% of the claims, and the federal government pays the rest.  Under Medicaid rules Massachusetts adopted last year, all claims under the program of $10,000 or more for inpatient services are subject to review, compared with a previous review threshold of $40,000, the hospital association said.  The new rules have overloaded the state's reviewing system and led to a backlog of unpaid claims, the association charged.  The suit was filed in federal district court in Boston and alleges violations of the federal Medicaid statute and other federal laws.  "A number of hospitals are having difficulty staffing their critical care units and providing adequate emergency care" because of the unpaid Medicaid bills, asserted William T. McGrail, general counsel and vice president of the hospital association.  Boston's Children's Hospital, for example, is owed $11.3 million, of which $2.4 million has been due for more than a year, the association said.  Massachusetts officials countered that the hospitals have exaggerated the problem and pledged to fight the lawsuit.  "The hospitals' position is that we should just pay bills of $10,000 without reviewing them," said Philip Johnston, Massachusetts secretary of human services.  "That would deregulate and destabilize the {Massachusetts} health-care industry, thereby endangering efforts to implement universal health care."  Last year, Massachusetts adopted a law to provide health insurance for some 600,000 of its residents who don't have it.  The Medicaid dispute won't directly affect the new program, but it may weaken the fragile coalition of consumer, business and health-care groups that originally supported the plan.  Businesses, for example, already are fretting about the looming costs of the program, which is scheduled to be phased in by 1992.  Mr. Johnston said the state estimates its unpaid Medicaid bills total about $128 million, instead of $350 million claimed by the hospitals.  He added that state legislators recently adopted a tax package that will fund payment of the bills by year end.  Arizona regulators agreed to lift an order barring financially troubled Pinnacle West Capital Corp. from taking unusual amounts of cash from its utility unit in return for Pinnacle West's assurance that it won't do so.  The agreement, entered into yesterday by the Arizona Corporation Commission, Pinnacle West, and its Arizona Public Service Co., resolves for the moment a bitter dispute that Pinnacle West contended had restricted its access to much-needed capital.  "The effect of the agreement is to take the thing out of the political arena and to let business people make business decisions about this situation," said Henry B. Sargeant Jr., executive vice president and chief financial officer of Pinnacle West.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, stock of Pinnacle West, a Phoenix-based holding company, rose 50 cents a share, to close at $12.125, on volume of 368,400 shares.  Pinnacle West's financial woes stem mostly from its wounded MeraBank thrift unit, which is under Federal Home Loan Bank orders to boost its capital more than $200 million.  Pinnacle West had objected bitterly to a July temporary order limiting dividend payments to it by its cash-rich Arizona Public Service unit.  Pinnacle West asserted that the order had a chilling effect on its ability to raise capital.  Regulators argued that the order was needed to forestall any temptation by Pinnacle West to drain cash from the utility to resolve problems at MeraBank.  The order temporarily limited the utility's dividend payments to its parent to $52.7 million a quarter -- the current rate.  Hearings were planned for Oct. 16 on whether the dividend limitation was to be applied permanently.  Yesterday's agreement holds that Pinnacle West and Arizona Public Service won't increase the dividend or boost other cash transfers until the holding company settles its problems with MeraBank or until March 1, 1990, whichever comes first.  Pinnacle West also agreed to withdraw a suit filed last week in state court challenging the commission's power to limit the dividend.  The commission agreed not to hold the Oct. 16 hearing.  Mr. Sargeant, in an interview, maintained that, by removing the specter of further regulatory hearings on the dividend, Pinnacle West has removed a major impediment to financing it needs very much.  "That hearing was scaring lenders; it was scaring me," Mr. Sargeant said, adding that there was speculation the permanent order might sharply reduce the level of dividends paid to the parent.  Pinnacle West's chief financial officer said the company now hopes to "review a number of options" for financing.  In addition to funds needed for MeraBank, which are likely to run into the hundreds of millions of dollars, Pinnacle West must raise about $100 million to repay commercial paper coming due Jan. 8, 1990.  Mr. Sargeant testified last Friday in an Arizona Corporation Commission hearing that Pinnacle West's bankers had at least temporarily shut off the company's access to a $300 million line of credit, of which the company has already borrowed about $150 million.  Currently, Pinnacle West is negotiating with the Federal Home Loan Bank to set an amount of capital that Pinnacle West would inject into MeraBank.  In return, thrift regulators would release the holding company from a promise it made when it acquired MeraBank in 1986 to maintain the thrift's reserves at required levels.  It's expected that Pinnacle West then would spin off MeraBank to its shareholders.  In addition to Arizona Public Service and MeraBank, Pinnacle West also has investments in uranium mining, real-estate development, and venture capital.  Three shareholder lawsuits were filed against Smith Corona Corp. alleging that the prospectus for the company's initial public offering in July misrepresented its financial condition.  Friday, two weeks after the offering, Smith Corona announced it would lay off 10% of its factory workers because of reduced demand.  The lawsuits say the company's prospectus should have included information about the planned layoffs.  Smith Corona, based in New Canaan, Conn., makes typewriters and word processors.  Smith Corona was acquired in 1986 along with its parent SCM Corp. and other assets for $930 million by Hanson PLC, which retains a 47.9% interest in Smith Corona.  "Smith Corona's registration statement and prospectus portrayed the company as both highly efficient and competitive, without a hint of the problems which were belatedly disclosed to the investing public," the two lawsuits filed in federal district court in Manhattan said.  The third suit was filed in federal court in Connecticut.  As a result of those omissions, the lawsuits claim, the stock price fell from its $21 offering price July 28 to $18 at the close of trading Monday.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Smith Corona closed at $18.25, up 25 cents, after falling $4.375 Monday.  "The investors should have been told," said Paul Bernstein, an attorney for one of the shareholders.  He said the alleged omissions "make the prospectus misleading."  The suits seek damages of the difference between the offering price and the market price when the suits were filed.  Also named as defendants in the suits are G. Lee Thompson, Smith Corona's chairman and chief executive officer; other company executives and directors; Hanson PLC; and Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner & Smith Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., underwriters of the initial public offering.  Mr. Thompson said Smith Corona hadn't yet seen the suits and couldn't comment.  Representatives of Hanson, Merrill Lynch and Shearson also said their companies hadn't seen the suits and had no comment.  FIRST FIDELITY BANCORP., Lawrenceville, N.J., said it executed a pricing agreement with its underwriters for the sale of $150 million aggregate principal amount of 9 5/8% subordinated notes.  Under the agreement with Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Morgan Stanley & Co., the notes will be sold to the public at 99.9% of the aggregate principal amount and will be due Aug. 15, 1999.  Your reproduction of the first Wall Street Journal of July 8, 1889, reflected an annual subscription price of $5.  I couldn't resist calculating the annual compounded increase over 100 years, to the current price of $129 a year.  It works out to about a 3.3% average annual increase.  Sounds reasonable to me.  I think I'll keep my subscription for a while.  Happy 100th birthday.  Irwin Fischman  Northfield, Ill.  ---  Your advertisement, welcoming all who come upon it to the Journal's second century, carries the illustration of a champagne cork traveling forcefully upward after having been pried loose from the bottle assumably by thumb pressure.  The opening of a bottle of champagne is appropriate.  However, for a publication for which a new Simmons study shows readers representing "the highest quality demographic profile" I am curious as to why the cork is shown being removed in a way individuals representing so high a demographic profile would find gauche and incorrect.  The cork of a bottle of fine or even inexpensive champagne is properly removed by being grasped firmly by a clenched hand while the bottle is turned slowly by the other hand -- to the right or to the left -- and the cork gradually lifted free with only a muted pop and no explosive loss of as much as a few bubbles.  The bottle, in effect, is removed slowly from the cork.  It may not be as noisy or as much fun, but it is less messy and considerably more economical.  Walter Weir  Newtown, Pa.  ---  Your June 23 Centennial edition said that the pneumatic tire was invented for bicycles in 1888 by a British physician John Dunlop.  I think that John Dunlop was not a physician, but a veterinarian.  In England they do not call veterinarians Dr. but call them Mr.  Samuel H. Wood Jr. DVM  Honolulu  ---  I was born in 1901, so I have lived most of the same years as The Wall Street Journal.  After reading the Centennial Edition, I think it was about as accurate a history of these times as is likely to be published.  Robert E. Jacobsen  Minneapolis  ---  There you go again] In your centennial "mea culpa" "The Sad Truth . . ." while confessing your preoccupation with Vietnam watermelons the day Tet broke, you re-lay the egg regarding the "seizure by the Viet Cong" of the U.S. Embassy in Saigon.  On Jan. 31, 1968, 19 VCs attacked the embassy at 3 a.m. by blowing a hole in the perimeter wall and entering the yard.  Three Marine guards stopped them, killing their leader.  Subsequently, the rest were mopped up.  At no time did any Viet Cong gain entrance to the building.  The "seizure" occurred only when we abandoned the building and the country.  This event was reported and re-reported as that "seizure by the Viet Cong," including the baloney that the inside of the building was littered with bodies.  It's time you straighten this one out, too.  Gene Oathout  Vero Beach, Fla.  ---  I read with great interest your June 20 Centennial article, "Unthinkable Heart Surgery Opens an Era, 1944."  If reported accurately, apparently Drs.  Helen B. Taussig and Alfred Blalock were not the first to perform successful heart surgery.  On Oct. 25, 1944, Dr. Rollie Daniels performed heart surgery on me at Vanderbilt Hospital in Nashville, Tenn.  Dr. Amos Christy was director of the children's hospital at that time.  The surgery was performed a few days before my fifth birthday on Nov. 1, 1944.  I remember that the first solid food I was allowed were my birthday cake and ice cream.  I, too, was a "blue baby."  I understand that I was the second patient on whom Dr. Daniels performed this surgery, but the first longterm survivor.  The surgery was complicated by the fact that I was allergic to sulfa drugs, so I was treated with another of Vanderbilt's cutting-edge medical practices, penicillin, which was then experimental.  As a testament to the success of the procedure I now am able to live a very normal life.  I have just completed a 50-mile hike of the High Sierra campgrounds in Yosemite, a feat far beyond the expectations of anyone who knew me as a child.  No day goes by without my appreciating the pioneering efforts of these outstanding physicians, and I want to make sure the record is straight about the first successful heart operation.  Virginia Rhea Blansett Langrehr  Omaha, Neb.  ---  Your article on cardiac surgery as pioneered by Drs.  Blalock and Taussig referred to Ms. Vivien Thomas as an important contributor to the introduction of modern cardiac surgery.  Ms. Thomas is in fact Mr. Thomas, a black man who is revered at the Johns Hopkins Medical Institutions as a valuable contributor to Dr. Blalock's research efforts as a teacher of surgical techniques to hundreds of Hopkins-trained surgeons.  The development of modern cardiac surgery and the careers of many Hopkins-trained physicians are due in part to the contributions of this remarkable man.  Stephen V. Neville M.D.  Corvallis, Ore.  ---  The Centennial Edition section on inventions contains a reference to Japan inventing the transistor radio in 1955.  The transistor radio was invented by the Regency Co., an American firm.  How quickly we forget.  Frederick Matos  Annapolis, Md.  ---  Your 100th edition had some facts wrong.  MCI was not founded by William McGowan.  That credit belongs to John Goeken, who ran a small aircraft radio repair shop in Joliet, Ill., and flew a beat-up Piper Cub as a hobby.  As district sales manager for General Electric two-way radios in Chicago in the 1960s, I was looking for a sales-service rep in Joliet.  John wasn't much of a salesman (I thought), but his service was good.  John and the Chicago rep wanted to sell radios to motor carriers that needed communications between Chicago and St. Louis.  Two-way radios didn't have that kind of coverage and one answer was a microwave link between these cities.  Everyone knew AT&T held an ironbound monopoly on this service -- everyone, that is, except John Goeken, who flew his Piper Cub to Washington, banged on the FCC's door and demanded a microwave license.  To the utter amazement of the communications worLd, the FCC granted John a license.  He was besieged immediately with offers of money, equipment and manpower by industry moguls who sensed the lucrative bonanza he had opened.  Enter Mr. McGowan and friends.  They eventually bought out the country lad and took over.  There is a compelling reason why Mr. McGowan would never have founded MCI. Like all the rest of us at the time, he was knowledgeable enough to know that the FCC would never grant a microwave license to a small commercial operation.  Jack Najork  Duncanville, Texas  ---  In Jerry Bishop's piece on modern-day advances, the development and marketing of synthetic Adrenalin is ascribed incorrectly to three unnamed scientists and the German dye maker Farbwerke Hoechst.  In 1901, while working in cooperation with Parke, Davis & Co., Dr. Jokichi Takamine first isolated and crystallized Adrenalin.  It was then marketed under that trade name by Parke, Davis -- now a part of Warner-Lambert Co.  Dr. Takamine's discovery prompted the mayor of Tokyo to offer a gift of cherry trees to President William Howard Taft's wife, evident even now as the source of Washington's annual cherry-blossom explosion.  A major figure in the early history of American biotechnology, Dr. Takamine received the patent rights for his work on Adrenalin.  At his death in 1922, he was said to be the most famous Japanese living in America.  Peter Wolf  Media Relations  Warner-Lambert Co.  Morris Plains, N.J.  J.P. Morgan & Co. said it holds a 5.2% stake in Centex Telemanagement Inc.'s common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the SEC, Morgan said it holds 490,000 shares, including 130,000 shares acquired between June 5 and Aug. 4 for $17.25 to $19.37 a share.  The stock was bought as an investment, the filing said.  Morgan is based in New York and Centex Telemanagement is based in San Francisco.  Henry P. Huff, vice president finance of Centex, said Centex welcomes the Morgan stake, which is seen as a passive investment.  HYBRID FAX Inc. is based in Redwood City, Calif.  A recent edition misstated the location of the company's headquarters.  (See: "TECHNOLOGY" -- WSJ Aug. 15, 1989)  The Transportation Department stepped up an investigation to determine whether 1,064,000 General Motors Corp. cars have a potential rear-brake defect.  The investigation involves all of GM's 1986-1987 C-body and H-body cars, which include the Buick Le Sabre, Oldsmobile 88, and the Pontiac Bonneville.  An official said that failing parts may cause the rear brakes on those models to jam.  He said the agency has received 59 complaints, with one reported accident and injury.  The department's National Highway Traffic Safety Administration said in its latest monthly report that it upgraded the GM inquiry from a low-level "preliminary evaluation" to an "engineering analysis," which could lead to a formal defect investigation and recall.  The agency also said it launched a preliminary evaluation of GM's 1985-1988 G-body cars.  The 1.5 million cars, which include the Chevrolet Monte Carlo, the Pontiac Grand Prix, the Oldsmobile Cutlass, and the Buick Regal, may have defective parking-brake cables, the agency said.  A GM spokesman said the company is gathering information to comply with the government investigation.  But he said, "just because there is an 'economic analysis' does not mean necessarily there's a safety defect with our product."  In addition, federal safety officials opened inquiries into all Chrysler cars with front-wheel-drive and tilt steering wheels.  The issue is whether the steering wheels may inadvertently lock.  The officials said the possible defect could involve 500,000 cars, and the agency has received seven complaints.  Several 1985-1987 BMW models -- the 325, 524td, 528e, and 535i -- will be the subject of a preliminary evaluation into whether their brakes are prone to drag and fail without warning.  The cars are made by Bayerische Motoren Werke AG of West Germany.  The agency knows of four complaints out of the 30,000 BMWs possibly affected.  Federal investigators also started an inquiry into 400,000 1982-1988 Toyota Motor Co. Tercels for the possibility of broken front stabilizer bars.  The agency has received four reports blaming the alleged defect for loss of steering control.  ROGERS COMMUNICATIONS Inc., Toronto, said it will issue 200 Canadian dollars (US$169.4 million) of convertible 7.5% debentures.  The communications concern said it reached an underwriting agreement with a group of investment dealers led by Scotia-McLeod Inc., under which the latter will buy the debentures for resale in Canada.  The debentures will be convertible for 10 years into Rogers Class B nonvoting shares at C$145 a share, the company said.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Rogers Class B shares closed at C$126.50, off C$5.  Freeport-McMoRan Copper Co., New Orleans, said it will further expand its Indonesian copper mining and milling operations.  The copper concern, which is owned 77% by Freeport-McMoRan Inc., said it will increase its operations to 52,000 metric tons of ore a day.  In February, Freeport-McMoRan Copper started expanding capacity to 32,000 metric tons a day from 20,000.  The additional expansion should be completed by 1992, according to the company, and will push total expansion costs to $511 million.  Freeport-McMoRan Copper said it expects to complete bank financing by year's end.  Freeport-McMoRan Copper said recent exploratory drilling of the Grasberg copper and gold deposit pushed its proved reserves to about 230 million metric tons of ore -- yielding an estimated 7.3 billion pounds of copper and about 6.7 million ounces of gold.  Zapata Corp., citing a slump in the oil region, said that it won't make $8 million in interest payments on two issues of debentures because of "comprehensive restructuring" planned at the oil and marine concern.  Affected are interest payments due Sept. 15 to holders of 10.25% subordinated debentures due 1997 and interest payments due Nov. 1 to holders of 10.875% subordinated debentures due 2001.  Houston-based Zapata has about $92 million of debt outstanding, including interest, involved in the two debt issues.  Zapata anticipates presenting a financial plan to its subordinated debt holders once a restructuring agreement can be reached with the company's banks, a Zapata official said.  Zapata said the company isn't in default to its bank lenders and expects to remain in compliance with its loan covenants through 1990.  Heavy discounts and consumer concerns about higher prices on next year's models pushed North American-made car and truck sales up 8.2% in early August, even though General Motors Corp.'s car sales fell.  As a result, sales in the first 10 days of August hit a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 7.9 million vehicles, the second strongest showing this year.  A year earlier and in July, domestic cars sold at a 7.6 million unit clip, according to a Commerce Department formula.  Each of the Big Three posted domestic car sales gains except General Motors.  The No. 1 U.S. auto maker saw its domestic car sales fall 2.7% because of weaker results from its Chevrolet and Oldsmobile divisions.  Sales of the Chevrolet Corsica/Beretta models, which have been Chevy's best-selling car this year, plunged 29.7%.  Oldsmobile, meanwhile, was hurt by a 34.1% decline in sales of its Cutlass Supreme coupe.  Ford Motor Co. led the way in domestic car sales with a 17.6% improvement.  Chrysler Corp.'s domestic car sales -- a weak spot for the No. 3 auto maker all year -- rose 5.6%.  The strong early August results may help clear out backed-up inventories of unsold cars in time for 1990 models to arrive this fall.  But the results aren't necessarily a signal that the auto industry's fortunes will continue to brighten.  Instead, 1990-model cars and trucks will come with significantly higher sticker prices, and dealers say those prices will be certain to douse buyer enthusiasm.  In the meantime, dealers are capitalizing on the expected price increases to generate more showroom traffic.  Dave Sinclair Sr., a Ford dealer in St. Louis, said he warned buyers in advertisements last month about the future price increases.  Sales in early August jumped 25%.  "There's no question that the threat of higher prices" has brought some people into the showroom, Mr. Sinclair said.  "On some models, they can save a grand by buying a 1989 model and a grand with the incentives out now, and that's enough to get people to come in," he added.  Another inducement to buy now: Auto makers have hinted they may trim some of the incentive programs they sweetened at the end of July to reduce unsold inventories.  Scott Merlis, an auto analyst with Morgan Stanley & Co., estimates that the Big Three are currently offering an average of $900 off sticker prices compared with an average discount of $750 a year ago.  Thus, Christopher Cedergren of J.D. Power & Associates Inc., an Agoura Hills, Calif., market research firm, expects the current sales strength to cause "a pay-back period hitting the auto industry in the fourth quarter."  However, Ross Roberts, a Ford vice president and general manager of the Lincoln-Mercury division, said the improved sales are the result of attracting buyers who weren't planning to buy new cars and trucks, instead of inducing consumers to make their decisions sooner than they had planned.  Domestic truck sales, which increased 9.4%, improved more than domestic cars, which rose 7.4% above year-earlier levels.  Chrysler's truck sales led the way by jumping 16.8%.  GM domestic truck sales climbed 9.2%, while Ford's gained 5.1%.  ---  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 x-%  @ Aug 1-10 Aug 1-10 Chg.  @ GM total vehicles ......... 142,585 138,231 + 3.1  @ Domestic car ............ 84,310 86,676 - 2.7  @ Imported car ............ 6,977 4,791 + 45.6  @ Total car .............. 91,287 91,467 - 0.2  @ Domestic truck .......... 51,075 46,764 + 9.2  @ Imported truck .......... 223 0 d  @ Total truck ............ 51,298 46,764 + 9.7  @ FORD total vehicles ....... 99,076 88,843 + 11.5  @ Domestic car ............ 61,430 52,239 + 17.6  @ Imported car ............ 1,961 2,661 - 26.3  @ Total car .............. 63,391 54,900 + 15.5  @ Domestic truck .......... 35,685 33,943 + 5.1  @ CHRYSLER total veh ........ 51,249 47,559 + 7.8  @ Domestic car ............ 25,515 24,167 + 5.6  @ Imported car ............ 2,371 2,922 - 18.9  @ Total car .............. 27,886 27,089 + 2.9  @ Domestic truck .......... 22,372 19,156 + 16.8  @ Imported truck .......... 991 1,314 - 24.6  @ Total truck ............ 23,363 20,470 + 14.1  @ NISSAN total vehicles ..... 6,446 6,019 + 7.1  @ Domestic car ............ 2,943 2,961 - 0.6  @ Domestic truck .......... 3,503 3,058 + 14.6  @ HONDA domestic car ........ 9,002 9,531 - 5.6  @ TOYOTA domestic car ....... 5,218 862 +505.3  @ MAZDA domestic car ........ 789 709 + 11.3  @ MITSUBISHI-c .............. 1,094 0 d  @ Total cars ................ 201,610 187,519 + 7.5  @ Domestic ................ 190,301 177,145 + 7.4  @ Imported ................ 11,309 10,374 + 9.0  @ Total trucks .............. 113,849 104,235 + 9.2  @ Domestic ................ 112,635 102,921 + 9.4  @ Imported ................ 1,214 1,314 - 7.6  @ Total domestic veh ........ 302,936 280,066 + 8.2  @ Total vehicles ............ 315,459 291,754 + 8.1  a-Totals include only vehicle sales reported in the period.  c-Domestic car  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%.  x-There were 9 selling days in the most recent period and 9 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  WESTINGHOUSE ELECTRIC Corp. remains in the photovoltaic business but is no longer active in the solar-thermal business.  A recent edition incorrectly implied that Westinghouse had quit the solar-power business altogether.  (See: "Industry Focus: U.S. Falls Behind in Alternative Energy" -- WSJ Aug. 15, 1989)  Sun Microsystems Inc. said Valid Logic Systems Inc. agreed to buy $120 million of Sun's products through November 1990.  The purchase is the largest from any electronic design automation, or EDA, dealer, Sun said.  Valid Logic is one of Sun's major resellers.  "This market is very important to Sun, since 85% of EDA vendors make their products available on our systems," said Ed Zander, Sun's vice president, corporate marketing.  "Agreements with leading vendors like Valid have made our growth in their area possible."  Sun Microsystems is a supplier of network-based computing systems incorporating the technology known as RISC, or reduced instruction set computing.  Transco Energy Co., a Houston-based energy concern, said a unit completed its previously announced sale of a 50% interest in seven energy projects for $30 million to a unit of SCEcorp. of Rosemead, Calif.  Transco said its Transco Energy Ventures Co. unit and the SCEcorp. unit, Mission Energy Co., also have entered into a joint agreement to pursue the development of future power-generation projects.  Mission owns and operates unregulated energy-supply facilities for SCEcorp., which will become the nation's largest investor-owned utility in its pending acquisition of San Diego Gas & Electric Co.  FIRST EXECUTIVE Corp. declared the following quarterly dividends on its preferred stock: Series F Cumulative Preferred Stock, $0.71875 a depositary preferred share, payable Oct. 16 to shareholders of record Sept. 29; Series G Cumulative Convertible Preferred Stock, $0.390625 a share, payable Sept. 15 to holders of record Sept. 1.  BRIDGFORD FOODS Corp. declared a quarterly dividend of five cents a share, payable Oct. 5 to shareholders of record Sept. 7.  Diamond-Star Motors Corp. and the United Auto Workers union said they reached a tentative agreement on a three-year contract covering the company's 2,300 production and maintenance workers.  Diamond-Star, a 50-50 joint venture between Chrysler Corp. of Highland Park, Mich., and Mitsubishi Motors Corp. of Japan, builds cars for Chrysler's and Mitsubishi's U.S. dealer networks at its only facility, in Normal, Ill.  Diamond-Star and the union declined to disclose details of the contract, pending ratification by employees.  But a spokeswoman for the venture did say that the contract continues the "team concept" of building vehicles.  A UAW spokesman said details of the ratification vote haven't been worked out yet.  The parties had been bargaining intermittently since late March.  Diamond-Star began building cars last September and its workers elected to be represented by the UAW in December.  The company didn't oppose the union's organizing effort.  The union is reeling from a humiliating defeat suffered last month in Smryna, Tenn., where employees voted more than 2-to-1 against UAW representation at Nissan Motor Co.'s. facility there.  The union hasn't yet succeeded in gaining the right to organize assembly plants in the U.S. that are wholly owned by Japanese auto makers.  But the UAW has organized all three U.S. assembly plants where Japanese auto makers are teamed with U.S. auto makers.  Workers at Diamond-Star build the Plymouth Laser, Eagle Talon and the Mitsubishi Eclipse; all are subcompact sporty coupes.  The plant has the capacity to build 240,000 vehicles a year.  This fall, Diamond-Star is scheduled to begin building two compact sedans -- the Mirage for Mitsubishi, and the Summit for Chrysler's Eagle division.  Both of these models currently are produced in Japan.  Currently, new production workers, called "associates," earn $9.85 an hour, while more skilled employees initially earn $11.74.  Tuesday, August 15, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 3/16% high, 9 1/16% low, 9 1/16% near closing bid, 9 1/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.85% 30 to 44 days; 8.50% 45 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.90% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.70% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.25% one month; 8.15% two months; 8.09% three months; 7.98% six months; 7.90% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.75% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.82% 30 days; 8.68% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days; 8.47% 120 days; 8.40% 150 days; 8.30% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9 1/16% to 8 15/16% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/ 16% five months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9 1/16% one month; 9% three months; 8 15/16% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 14, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 8.01% 13 weeks; 7.83% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.19%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.09%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.05%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.29%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  An arbitration panel said a former Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. client owes about $1.8 million to the securities firm for trading losses he suffered immediately before and during the stock market crash of 1987, but also said the firm owes him more than $900,000.  The three-person National Association of Securities Dealers' panel ruled in favor of Richard Sane, a Kissimmee, Fla., investor, on certain issues but also said he didn't adequately protect himself.  Mr. Sane's attorney said yesterday he would seek to have the award to Dean Witter vacated.  Dean Witter, a unit of Chicago-based Sears, Roebuck & Co., had sought $1,536,469.72 for Mr. Sane's debit balance of late October 1987.  Mr. Sane entered a counterclaim of between $1,987,588 and $6,113,085.  The panel said the firm "did not notify Mr. Sane by telephone of margin calls to his account" and noted that certain "key" Dean Witter employees were absent during the "vital week" of the crash.  Dean Witter, the panel said, sent Mr. Sane mailgrams informing him of margin calls after the close of business on Oct. 9, but they were sent to his former billing address in New York and didn't arrive in Florida until at least Oct. 20.  No cash was available in the account after trading that day.  By Oct. 19, the day of the crash, the margin calls had grown to at least $1.3 million.  Mr. Sane rightly expected margin calls to be phoned to him at the Kissimmee address, where, the panel said, he had been receiving monthly statements.  He believed he was "on safe ground" trading put and call options as long as he maintained a cash available balance of at least $1 million, the panel said.  But in finding fault with Mr. Sane, the panel said he was a "sophisticated, professional investor who closely directed and followed his various accounts with numerous securities firms."  It added, "Because he was receiving margin calls from his accounts with other brokerage firms, Mr. Sane was, or should have been, aware that his Dean Witter account was deteriorating and in distress."  Dean Witter also was ordered to pay $19,000 in forum fees for the 19 arbitration proceedings.  Each side was denied its request to have the other pay attorney's fees.  At the beginning of October 1987, according to Mr. Sane's attorney, Robert Pearce, of Fort Lauderdale, Fla., the equity in Mr. Sane's Dean Witter account was about $4.5 million, which represented most of his liquid net worth.  Mr. Pearce said he didn't know Mr. Sane's current financial position.  Louisville Gas & Electric Co. agreed to a settlement with Kentucky's Public Service Commission that, if approved, will resolve the long dispute over its Trimble County power plant.  Under terms of the proposed settlement, LG&E will reduce its electric rates by $8.5 million for the year beginning Jan. 1, and refund $2.5 million to its current customers.  The 450,000-kilowatt Trimble County unit will begin commercial operation Jan. 1, 1991.  The plant will cost $750 million to build, and LG&E will be entitled to recover 75% of that amount from customers in rate increases.  Any earnings that LG&E receives from any transaction related to the remaining 25% of its investment in the new plant will be retained by shareholders.  Power grows from the barrel of a gun, opined Mao Tse-tung.  And in the absence of politics, he might have added, there is no recourse save the gun.  That, tragically, is the state of affairs here in Sri Lanka, a once-idyllic island state of 16 million now entering its seventh year of widespread internal strife.  Signs of deterioration are everywhere.  Normal life is at a standstill, and the economy is faltering.  Troops line the streets of Colombo, the capital; counterguerrilla operations daily take in hundreds of suspects in rural areas.  Despite its promises of renewal, the newly elected government of President Ranasinghe Premadasa has been unable to break loose from the rigidity and corruption that paralyzed the previous administration.  Two years after they entered the country in a Cyprus-style solution to allegedly safeguard Sri Lanka's three million Tamils, Indian troops continue to occupy the north and east.  They have suffered more than 1,000 deaths fighting Marxist guerrillas demanding establishment of an independent state, or "Eelam," yet have been unable to end the conflict.  Instead, they are viewed as a hostile occupation force by many of the people they came to protect.  Further, their presence has inflamed the nationalist passions of the Sinhalese majority in the south, where the once moribund Marxist JVP ("People's Liberation Front") has gained a new lease on life by portraying itself as an anti-foreign standard bearer.  JVP insurgency has brought to the island as a whole the suffering once generally restricted to the Tamil areas.  Deaths related to the insurgency now number between 700 and 1,000 per month.  Behind this process are a number of factors.  Most significantly, though, is the absence of politics.  This leaves nowhere else for popular discontent to go save the streets or the ranks of the insurgents.  This seems a contradiction in a nation that since its independence in 1948 has maintained a functioning parliamentary democracy (it is now headed by a French-style president rather than the prime minister).  But if politics is defined as shaping the human environment -- setting forth the rules of the game in response to the desires of those who make up that environment -- Sri Lanka's system has been a failure.  Behind the facade of democracy, successive governments have severely restricted representation of the popular will.  Recent electoral mechanics have seen a nearly 50-50 split in the popular vote reflected in lopsided parliamentary majorities for either of Sri Lanka's major parties, the United National Party (UNP), in power since 1977, or the Sri Lanka Freedom Party (SLFP), which ruled with an enormous parliamentary margin during 1970-77 despite losing the popular vote.  The result is a political system manned by individuals owing their allegiance not to their constituencies but to their parties.  Electoral corruption, intimidation and manipulation of voting rules prevented popular discontent from fielding alternate representatives.  Rather than see its four-fifths majority endangered in 1982 -- a crucial level because it allowed the amending of the constitution -- the UNP simply held a referendum to extend the life of the parliament another term.  Though it won the vote, the narrow margin of victory reflected the true polarization of the electorate, increasingly resentful of official corruption and deteriorating services.  The worsening lives of the people escaped notice in many quarters, foreign and domestic.  Progress in economic macro-indicators served to conceal serious problems in the micro-world of Sri Lanka's majority, problems of health, nutrition, livelihood, and access to opportunities for advancement.  Discriminatory legislation and regular episodes of anti-Tamil rioting culminating in the nationwide explosion of July 1983 were passed off by the world as communal conflict.  Actually, they reflected attempts by the Sinhalese majority to claim from the successful Tamils their slice of what increasingly was viewed as a zero-sum distribution of rights, resources and privileges.  Faced with a system unwilling to provide for their livelihood or even to protect them, the conservative Tamil population turned to the only viable option championing their interests -- existing Marxist guerrilla movements.  The Sinhalese community also has been driven to self-defense.  Contrary to a view fashionable in many circles of the Colombo elite, the JVP has not caused the present insurgency.  Neither can it even be said to be leading it: It is racing to keep up with it.  What the JVP has demonstrated is a tactical sophistication that has allowed it to ride each wave of discontent as it has surfaced.  In this sense, the JVP has learned a great deal from its earlier lack of success in 1971, when a popular explosion placed the survival of the government in question but was crushed when it moved too far ahead of its popular base.  Previously sympathetic to the Tamil cause, the JVP flipflopped and adopted a hard-line pro-Sinhalese stand when it became clear that it was to its advantage.  This served it in good stead when the Indians entered the picture, because it allowed the party to wrap itself in the mantle of nationalism.  Indeed, JVP documents say virtually nothing of its ideological stance, instead concentrating on the betrayal of the country by its rulers.  It is but a logical next step to advance a simple connection: The same people who sold you out are responsible for the poor conditions of life in which you find yourselves.  Yet this linkage is so far reserved for instructions to JVP cadres.  Meanwhile, the insurgency gains strength.  Whole areas of the countryside have effectively become "no-go" areas, and urban unrest has grown dramatically.  Anonymous "struggle committees" now function in virtually all businesses and close them down at will by simply posting notices instructing work to cease lest reprisals be taken.  By killing prominent people who do not comply with their demands, the insurgents have gained authority far beyond their numbers.  The industrial sector functions at what appears to be just 20% capacity.  Such economic paralysis, in turn, feeds the JVP cause.  Already, many businesses report they are unable to meet their loan and tax obligations, concentrating only on at least paying their workers.  As this, too, becomes impossible, the ranks of the unemployed will provide fertile ground for JVP recruiters.  Significantly, when Colombo's curfew was lifted temporarily late last month, the overriding complaint was an inability to find bread.  The government would do well to look at history: It was the bread riots of the urban "small people" in Paris that led to the French Revolution.  Sri Lanka has not yet reached that point, but it could.  It will if the reformist sentiments of the new administration are not matched by the political will to implement significant changes.  If this is not done, the gun rather than the vote will express the political demands of Sri Lanka's disillusioned masses.  ---  Mr. Marks, a former U.S. military intelligence officer who specialized in revolutionary warfare, has traveled extensively in Sri Lanka since 1983.  Cablevision Systems Corp. reported second-quarter earnings after a year-earlier loss as it took a one-time gain from a sale of operations.  In the first six months, Cablevision's loss narrowed to $35 million from $74.5 million a year earlier.  Cablevision owns and operates cable-television systems in 11 states and has interests in companies that produce and distribute cable programming.  For the quarter, net income was $24.1 million, or 99 cents a share, compared with a year-earlier loss of $39.9 million.  Included in results was a gain of $104.8 million from the sale of 50% of the company's programming operations to National Broadcasting Co., a unit of General Electric Co.  For the six months, the company said, the gain from the sale to NBC was more than offset by interest, depreciation and amortization expenses related to acquisitions, including the purchase of cable-television systems from Viacom Inc. Feb. 17.  Revenue for the quarter rose 1% to $125.4 million from $124.4 million.  For the six months, revenue was flat -- $236.1 million compared with $236.2 million a year earlier.  Cablevision said its operating cash flow rose substantially in the quarter.  That figure represents operating profit before depreciation and amortization.  For the quarter, Cablevision said operating cash flow rose 39% to $53.3 million from $38.2 million.  As of June 30, Cablevision said it served about 1.2 million subscribers, having gained about 25,700 during the six-month period, exclusive of acquisitions.  The June average monthly revenue per subscriber was $32.63, an increase of 19 cents from the March level.  Bankruptcy lawyers Philip I. Palmer Jr. and Linda Coffee were ordered acquitted of federal charges that they concealed a false statement in a bankruptcy-law case.  The unusual order by Judge A. Joe Fish directed the jury to find the two lawyers innocent without deliberating.  The ruling marked the end of an equally unusual criminal case.  Mr. Palmer, 59 years old, and Ms. Coffee, 46, were indicted in April.  Many lawyers in Dallas contended that the allegations against the two were more appropriate for possible disciplinary action rather than criminal prosecution.  Several bankruptcy lawyers contributed to a defense fund on behalf of Mr. Palmer, one of the most veteran bankruptcy-law practitioners in Dallas.  Assistant U.S. Attorney Jack C. Williamson, who represented the government in the weeklong trial, couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Palmer was represented by Abbe David Lowell of Washington, D.C., and Ms. Coffee was represented by Dallas lawyers William Ravkind and Kim Wade.  Bond prices staged a comeback after Monday's sharp fall, while stock prices climbed in moderate trading.  The dollar was mixed.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 9.86 points to 2687.78.  Long-term Treasury bonds, which plummeted in a late afternoon sell-off Monday, recovered about half of their losses yesterday.  Nervous currency traders, facing what they perceived as a growing threat of central bank intervention, bid the dollar lower against the West German mark, although the U.S. currency gained slightly against the Japanese yen.  Analysts said financial markets are still adjusting to the likelihood that the Federal Reserve isn't going to be more accommodating on lower interest rates.  Until the past few weeks, investors were assuming that the economy was weakening and the Fed was intent on preventing a recession by letting short-term interest rates fall.  That prospect buoyed bond prices, and stock investors bid so-called defensive issues higher in anticipation of a slower economy.  But as government statistics in recent weeks have shown a moderately expanding economy and a declining threat from inflation, investors have had to change their strategies.  That change was at the heart of Monday's bond market sell-off.  Uncertainty about which way to move next is putting some stock investors on the sidelines.  That's reflected in the considerably lighter trading volume so far this week.  And as volume falls, the effect of program trading, which contributed to Monday's retreat in stock prices, becomes more pronounced, making investors even more wary.  Programs "are really dominating here and whipping the market both ways," said Ralph E. Blair, a partner at Montgomery Securities in San Francisco.  "People are reluctant to get caught in the whipsaws."  Bond traders attributed the rise in prices yesterday to "bottom fishing" in the wake of Monday's big sell-off.  Traders are now looking ahead to this morning's release of industrial production and factory utilization statistics for clues to how strong the economy is growing and to Friday's release of July consumer price index for an indication of the inflation outlook.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rose in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 148.8 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of losers, 809 to 689.  Bond prices were up.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond rose seven-eighths of a point, or about $8.75 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield on the issue slipped to 8.15%.  The dollar was mixed.  In late New York trading the dollar was quoted at 1.9430 marks and 142.20 yen, compared with 1.9485 marks and 141.95 yen Monday.  Summit Technology Inc. said it was issued a patent by the U.S. Patent Office for its disposable corneal mask, which is used in an experimental procedure to correct nearsightedness, farsightedness and astigmatism with laser surgery.  Separately, Summit said in Watertown, Mass., that it expects revenue of $4 million to $4.5 million for 1989, up from $1.1 million a year earlier.  During the surgery, called photo-refractive keratectomy, the corneal mask is dissolved by a laser in a process that sculpts the cornea to correct vision, the company said.  The masks are expected to be priced at about $200 each, the company added.  Summit is one of several companies developing specialized lasers for corneal sculpting.  Summit said that although the procedure isn't yet approved by the Food and Drug Administration, the company is selling its lasers to ophthalmologists while clinical trials are under way.  The Santa Fe Opera's more exotic offerings this season were a pair of star vehicles for mezzo-sopranos and the American premiere of an opera by a British composer.  The singers and the composer are all deserving of such notice, but the company could surely have done better by them.  Impossibly broad direction or musical crassness sabotaged all three shows, making Santa Fe look more like a busy, toss-'em-together repertory house than the lovingly crafted festival that it supposedly is.  Of the two featured mezzos, Frederica von Stade got the lesser vehicle but the marginally happier production.  Massenet's "Cherubin" chronicles the next stage in the adventures of Beaumarchais's and Mozart's amorous page, who is now a 17-year-old army officer with his own chateau and is busy romancing four women at once, with considerably more success than he had in "The Marriage of Figaro."  The opera has some wonderful music, but most of it doesn't show up until the third act.  Until then, undistinguished, workman-like stretches alternate with operetta-style hijinks.  Fortunately, in Santa Fe, most of this was enlivened by the eager young Cherubin of Ms. von Stade, whose magical stage presence and fresh, ebullient singing are an all too rare combination.  Sheryl Woods, as the young peasant Nina who loves Cherubin, was a worthy colleague, direct and lyrical; the rest of the singing was acceptable, though Karen Huffstodt, as the dancer L'Ensoleillad, could sound unpleasantly strident, and John Kuether was rather colorless as Cherubin's tutor.  Mario Bernardi was the sometimes overpowering conductor.  The production, though handsomely designed by Ulisse Santicchi, could also have used a subtler hand: Giulio Chazalettes, the director, took his cue from the buffo parts of the opera and went in for broad slapstick.  Cherubin's two noble conquests, La Comtesse (Melanie Helton) and La Baronne (Judith Christin), for example, were crude caricatures, swooning and flouncing tiresomely around the stage like the wicked sisters in "Cendrillon."  The second star turn, Cavalli's "La Calisto," featured Tatiana Troyanos.  It also suffered from a production team that didn't trust the work, this time with less cause.  "Calisto," in Raymond Leppard's performing edition, is a delightful, witty romp about sex and love.  The nymph Calisto (Janice Hall), who serves the virgin goddess Diana (Ms.  Troyanos), is seduced by Jove (Kevin Langan), who takes Diana's shape in order to get his way.  This creates all sorts of complications.  Diana in the meantime is tormented by her not-very-virginal love for the shepherd Endymion (James Bowman), and pursued by Pan (Brian Jauhiainen), the god of the woods.  The conductor, Justin Brown, missed a lot of the wit and favored too-slow tempi (Where is Mr. Leppard, with his deft harpsichord playing, when we need him?  Off conducting Mahler, no doubt), while director John Cox and designer Robert Perdziola created static tableaux on an ugly, hard-to-navigate set that recalled the flying saucer "Rings" of yore.  One effect worked nicely, though: Calisto's apotheosis as the constellation Ursa Minor was mirrored by the starry Santa Fe night.  Ms. Troyanos, in good form, played Diana -- and Jove disguised as Diana -- as a tough character.  She seemed most comfortable in the heavier dramatic bits -- wit isn't her strong suit either -- but unfortunately her passionate moments with Endymion were spoiled by Mr. Bowman, whose countertenor was unsure and harsh.  Ms. Hall started out underpowered, but gained strength as the evening went on, and Joanne Kolomyjec was an excellent Juno.  One singer who clearly got the point of the opera was Kathryn Gamberoni, pert and tangy as the woodland satyr Satirino.  ---  Santa Fe specializes in premiering new works.  "A Night at the Chinese Opera," by the 35-year-old British composer Judith Weir, is one of the company's more curious forays into the contemporary arena, in concept at least.  It features an opera within an opera.  The outer acts tell the story of Chao Lin (James Busterud), a 13th-century Chinese man who tries to take revenge when he discovers that the invaders who brought him up caused his father's death.  The central act is a version of an actual 13th-century Chinese play, "The Orphan of Chao," which Chao Lin sees.  Its events mirror his own life, and persuade him that revenge is just and possible.  Unfortunately, life does not imitate art.  The play's protagonist succeeds; Chao Lin is executed.  The production, which uses some modern dress, clearly refers to recent flouting of authority in China and its consequences.  Ms. Weir's music is beautiful and evocative, both vocally and orchestrally satisfying (George Manahan was the sensitive and serious conductor).  Arias for the Nightwatchman (John David De Haan), an ensemble at the end of Act III for the three actors (Joyce Castle, Anthony Laciura, Kathryn Gamberoni) who do the play, orchestral effects that are both lyrical and astringent -- these are only a few of the musical pleasures offered by the opera.  One musical choice, however, is questionable: the role of Military Governor, nemesis of Chao Lin and his father, is scored for countertenor.  The range is doubtless intended to make him sinister and otherworldly, but instead, though sung here ably by Drew Minter, the high, thin countertenor sound robs the character of weight and intelligibility.  The oddest thing about this intricate opera is that it isn't operatic enough.  I mean it doesn't have enough music.  The second act is largely dialogue, and in this production it overpowers the other two.  According to Ms. Weir, in the program notes, the play-within-the-opera should be performed at breakneck speed; here it was slowed by director Robert Carsen and packed with pratfalls and tedious protracted physical comedy.  Ms. Castle, playing the evil Gen. Tu-an-Ku, even had an inexplicable Southern accent (was he supposed to be from Shanghai?).  The three actors were obviously having a wonderful time, but finally slipped over the edge into self-indulgence.  But that was where Mr. Carsen's production was headed all along.  ---  Ms. Waleson is a free-lance music writer based in New York.  A Virgin Islands charter boat operator whose business was grounded when the National Park Service rejected his reapplication for a charter permit has filed suit claiming that the government unlawfully deprived him of his livelihood.  Wilfred E. Allick Jr., the 42-year-old owner of Junie Bomba's Charters Inc., of St. Croix, filed suit Monday in federal court in Washington to get the U.S. Department of Interior to re-issue his permit.  The lawsuit also seeks to have the department's licensing and price-regulating policy declared an unconstitutional violation of his rights to due process and equal protection under the Fifth Amendment.  Spokesmen for the Department of Interior declined to comment yesterday, saying they hadn't seen the complaint.  Mr. Allick's dispute with the department's National Park Service was chronicled last month in The Wall Street Journal about entrepreneurs hurt by state and federal anti-competitive sanctions.  For seven years before the Park Service denied his reapplication, Mr. Allick ran a charter boat service from St. Croix to the Buck Island Reef National Monument, about a mile away.  The charter business grossed as much as $40,000 annually, said Mr. Allick's wife, Susan.  Since 1982, the Allicks have pulled in no more than $8,000 annually, she said.  The suit also seeks unspecified monetary damages.  Mr. Allick is represented by Clint Bolick of the Landmark Legal Foundation Center for Civil Rights in Washington.  after reducing the estimated value of its assets to $1.2 billion from $1.8 billion -- proposed a debt restructuring that would slash the payout to creditors.  Under the plan, a sort of reorganization outside of bankruptcy court, senior creditors might get only 70 cents on the dollar while common shareholders would get almost nothing.  This last-ditch restructuring attempt of the troubled financial services and real estate concern would essentially involve breaking up the company and liquidating much of its business to pay creditors, who hold $2 billion in claims.  Even if Integrated can avoid a bankruptcy-law filing, which many creditors doubt, it might have to sell its valuable insurance units and other properties at fire-sale prices, some Integrated holders say.  Under the proposed plan, Integrated would put its insurance and mutual-fund units into a separate company that would be sold or turned over to senior creditors.  Its limited partnerships, also in a separate company, would be liquidated over time.  Arthur Goldberg, the company's co-chief executive officer, said "it was not an easy decision" to propose splitting up and selling pieces of Integrated, a once highflying real estate syndicator that was financed with junk securities.  But the proposed asset sales are necessary because of the "deterioration in values" caused by the company's liquidity crisis and other problems, he said.  Integrated presented its new restructuring proposal to a creditors' meeting in New York and expects to file documents on its plan with the Securities and Exchange Commission after Labor Day.  Separately, Integrated announced that two directors, David R. Markin and Allan R. Tessler, resigned Monday.  Integrated hasn't lined up a buyer for its insurance businesses, Mr. Goldberg says, but has started serious talks with several parties.  Robert Bass, Kaufman & Broad and some Bronfman family members are rumored to be interested in parts of Integrated.  Meanwhile, Integrated hopes to sell its stake in American Real Estate Partners for more than $35 million.  The new restructuring plan shows how rapidly Integrated's operations have eroded since it first defaulted in June on almost $1 billion of short-term debt.  According to Mr. Goldberg, the financial overhaul now being contemplated might produce about $1 billion of value for creditors.  But that falls far short of total claims amounting to $2 billion that are held by creditors and preferred shareholders.  At the creditor meeting, said one bondholder, Integrated disclosed that annuity sales had fallen to about $13 million a week from $20 million before the liquidity crunch.  Meanwhile, terminations climbed to $34 million a week from $7 million.  Partly because it has had to write down its asset values, Integrated expects to report a $600 million loss for the second quarter.  "You learn about the company's assets as they write them off," joked one Integrated bondholder.  Less than two months ago, Integrated's longtime investment banker Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. proposed a much more optimistic restructuring.  It valued the company's assets at about $1.8 billion and envisaged that Integrated would keep operating as a going concern.  Some people think Drexel, after scrutinizing Integrated's businesses, found far less value than it expected.  But Stephen Weinroth, a senior Drexel officer who is now Integrated's co-chief executive, says the 30% write-down of asset values reflects the fact that "you're not likely to get the best bids in the world when you're liquidating assets quicker than you expected."  He adds, "You want to project conservative numbers," so as not to get people's hopes up.  Creditors' mood during the meeting was relatively pessimistic, and the gossip was about big losses sustained on Integrated securities.  "Ugly, ugly, ugly," said one short-seller.  All Integrated securities got clobbered yesterday.  Its common shares fell 75 cents, or 27%, to close at $2, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Some of its preferred shares had losses of about 35% to 50%.  Its junk bonds dived several points, with some junior debt securities trading at only 14 cents on the dollar.  Creditors seem to fear above all that a bankruptcy-law filing would mean further deterioration in Integrated's businesses, leaving even less for creditors.  At the same time, they worry that Integrated might have trouble reconciling its diverse senior and junior lenders.  "There are an awful lot of people that can pull the trigger," precipitating a bankruptcy-law filing, says William Jacobs of Prudential-Bache Capital, an Integrated bondholder who attended the meeting.  He thinks Integrated will wind up in bankruptcy court.  For senior and junior creditors at this point, he says, "The only question is how much cash will they get, and when?"  Besides defaulting on its short-term debt, Integrated in recent months has missed payments on two of its bond issues.  Usually, all creditors must agree on a restructuring plan.  But Mr. Weinroth says that as an alternative, Integrated could seek what's called a "prepackaged bankruptcy," which wouldn't require 100% creditor approval.  It would file for bankruptcy-law protection, telling the judge it had significant creditor support for its plan.  The whole process might be completed in 30 to 60 days, he says.  A big holder of Integrated preferred says he's disappointed in the new restructuring plan.  He says Integrated's board should have brought in an experienced financial services executive to run the business and create some stability.  Some dissident Integrated directors recently tried to do that but were voted down.  While Integrated's earlier restructuring plan would also have asked creditors to forgive some debts, their "haircut" would not have been nearly as drastic as under the current proposal.  A person close to Integrated estimates that the company's senior creditors -- commercial banks, short-term commercial paper holders and senior bondholders -- might come out with "better than 70 cents on the dollar"; holders of Integrated's more speculative junk might get half as much, while preferred shareholders might get about 10 cents.  "The preferreds would be murdered," this person concedes.  Common shareholders would get a small stake in some real estate partnerships, he says.  The process of making partial payments to lenders might take anywhere from a few months to several years, he adds.  "You have to leave me some latitude as to the timing" of such payments, he says, adding that the process might take even longer in a bankruptcy court.  The current plan is to sell Integrated's insurance and mutual-fund units together with the company's big sales force.  But if Integrated cannot fetch at least $450 million, this entity would be turned over to senior creditors.  They would have to operate or sell the entity.  According to Integrated, most of the $600 million decline in the company's asset values in the past two months is attributable to its insurance units.  However, one Integrated bondholder worries that if the insurance units aren't sold soon, they might be taken over by regulators and liquidated to pay policyholders.  Insurance regulators have apparently placed certain restrictions on Integrated's insurance units.  Holders of Integrated policies would rank senior to bank lenders in a liquidation, the investor says.  The company values its real estate and other partnerships at about $700 million.  All creditors and preferred shareholders would get a stake, in the form of debt and equity, in this entity.  The current plan is gradually to liquidate the partnerships, though Mr. Goldberg says, "I have some hope that they can be revitalized."  But the big question, says Paul Debban of Seidler Amdec Securities, is just what value Integrated's partnership assets have.  "And will you get more if you force them into Chapter 11?"  Negotiators for Nynex Corp. and the Communications Workers of America agreed to resume informal talks today in an attempt to end a strike that began Aug. 6.  Both sides are trying to negotiate a new three-year contract, but the union has remained opposed to a company proposal for shifting a greater portion of health-care costs to employees.  The CWA represents about 40,000 Nynex workers.  Also on strike are 20,000 employees represented by the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers.  No progress was reported in other strikes against San Francisco-based Pacific Telesis Group; Ameritech Corp., based in Chicago; or Bell Atlantic Corp., based in Philadelphia.  In all, about 160,000 workers are striking the four regional phone companies.  Wang Laboratories Inc. is expected to announce today that it has reached a long-delayed loan restructuring agreement with its banks, led by Bank of Boston Corp.  Cash-strapped Wang, which recently reported a $424.3 million loss for its fiscal year ended June 30, has been struggling to reach an agreement to restructure a total of $962 million of short- and long-term debt.  Details of the agreement couldn't be learned.  But individuals familiar with the negotiations said it will eliminate the violations of Wang's existing revolving credit agreement caused by a sharp decline in Wang's net worth.  The agreement lifts a cloud over the company.  But Wang still faces crisis conditions as it searches for a new president and seeks to slash costs in the face of slumping sales.  Last week, in a sudden move, An Wang, its founder, chairman and chief executive, forced his son and heir apparent, Frederick, out of his posts as president and chief operating officer.  One individual said that the three-person directors' committee charged with finding a new president has retained executive recruiter Thomas Neff of Spencer Stuart Inc.  The individual added, "I think they have the pedal to the metal to find a person fast."  The most frequently mentioned candidate is John Cunningham, a former president who left when An Wang told him the company's top job was reserved for a family member.  Mr. Cunningham, 46 years old, managed a painful revival of Computer Consoles Inc., a small computer maker that was acquired by STC PLC, a British computer maker, last year.  In an interview, Mr. Cunningham refused to rule out taking the Wang job.  "I've learned to never say 'never,'" he said.  But he added that returning to Wang "is inconsistent with my personal plans and how I want to spend my time."  Mr. Cunningham made about $17 million through the sale of Computer Consoles, providing an annual income of well over $1 million a year.  Friends say he enjoys his current life style, which revolves around his family, playing golf and consulting.  Moreover, friends of Mr. Cunningham say he is reluctant to take a job where he would lack total authority.  Even though Frederick Wang is out of operations, he remains a director, and the Wang family elects a majority of the board through its holdings of Class C stock.  In addition, Mr. Cunningham might not want to take a job where selling the company probably wouldn't be an option.  The Wang family has said it would welcome a minority equity investment by another company, but analysts question whether An Wang would be willing to sell the company he created.  The new loan agreement has been difficult to achieve.  Since June, when European buyers of Wang's commercial paper began to balk at refinancing, Wang has been trying to negotiate a new bank line.  Last week the company and the banks extended existing loans to today after failing to reach an agreement in talks that one individual described as "difficult, even downright nasty."  Junk bonds accounted for more than two-thirds of corporate bond issues that have defaulted since 1980, a new study shows.  Junk bonds accounted for 70.1%, or $21.1 billion, of the $30.1 billion in corporate bond issues that have defaulted over the past nine years, according to the Bond Investors Association.  The association, a nonprofit bondholders' group based in Miami Lakes, Fla., said 631 corporate bonds have defaulted from 1980 until earlier this year, and that the average settlement was 49.6 cents on the dollar.  "Based on the volume of junk bonds issued during the period, this represents an 11.2% default rate," the group said in a statement.  In dollar terms, 1989 ranks as the worst year so far, according to the study, with $5.6 billion of high-yield debt now in default.  Investment-grade bond defaults since 1980 total $9 billion, or about 1% of all high-grade bonds, the group said.  Richard Lehmann, president of the group, said that the default and settlement rates mean that investors in high-yield debt should require a premium of as much as seven percentage points over U.S. Treasury securities in compensation for risk.  Greg Scott, executive vice president of the junk bond lobbying group, Alliance for Capital Access, said, "We don't dispute the default number or the net recovery number.  We vigorously dispute the premium" recommendation.  Mr. Scott said that the risk statistic was calculated on a nine-year basis rather than a yearly basis.  Rather than receiving 0.78% a year for nine years, investors have demanded a risk premium of about 3.5% a year.  Currently, the spread of junk bonds over Treasurys is about 5.5 points.  He added that the study failed to note that the average yearly net return -- including defaults -- on junk debt is about four percentage points over Treasury yields.  Lucky Chance Mining Co., Reno, Nev., filed for protection under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  Newly elected President Daniel Lezak said directors authorized the filing and removed all former management members who hadn't already resigned.  Mr. Lezak said that a plan of reorganization would be submitted to the creditors of the company and that he plans to run the company from his office in Calabasas, Calif.  Company officials weren't available to answer questions about the size of Lucky's debt or prospects for a speedy exit from Chapter 11.  Under Chapter 11, a company seeks protection from creditors while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  The company's major asset is believed to be the Sixteen to One Gold Mine in Allegheny, Calif.  This isn't the first time Lucky Chance has hit hard times.  It emerged from an earlier bankruptcy-law filing in June 1983, and briefly became profitable last year when it posted profit of $66,394 for its second quarter ended Dec. 31.  The company didn't give reasons for its current insolvency.  Comedian Bill Cosby has picked up his pen and paper and moved to MCA Inc.'s Putnam Berkley Group from Doubleday.  Putnam Berkley will publish Mr. Cosby's new comedy book, which is tentatively titled "Childhood" and is set to hit the book racks in 1991.  Doubleday, a unit of Bantam Doubleday Dell Publishing Group Inc., has published three best-selling books by Mr. Cosby: "Fatherhood," which is said to be the fastest-selling hardcover book of all time, with 2.6 million copies in print; "Time Flies," which had a record-breaking first printing of more than 1.7 million hardcover copies; and "Love and Marriage," which has been on the New York Times bestseller list for 16 consecutive weeks.  Norman Brokaw, president and chief executive officer of William Morris Agency, Mr. Cosby's talent agency, said that the comedian became acquainted with Putnam Berkley through other projects he is doing with MCA, Universal City, Calif., the parent of Universal Pictures.  "Bill has been doing a lot of work for Universal," Mr. Brokaw said, noting that Mr. Cosby is co-starring in the Universal Pictures movie "Ghost Dad," set for release next summer, and that his successful TV series, "The Cosby Show," is syndicated on MCA's WWOR-TV.  Mr. Brokaw said Mr. Cosby's work for Putnam Berkley will be on a project-by-project basis.  The clear, tranquil water mirrored the movements of Ron Kruger, reflecting the long, ivory-colored fly-line that gracefully glided back and forth above his head and the small puffs of pipe smoke that rose into the windless sky.  Mr. Kruger lowered the tip of his graphite fly-rod and a combination of hook, tinsel, cork and fur settled onto the lake's surface, as gently as a leaf falling from a nearby cottonweed.  He let the lure rest at the edge of a weed-line for a few seconds before giving the fly-line a jerk to begin the retrieve.  Water flew and the fly-rod sprang to life at the fish's jolting strike.  Twice the fish leapt from the water, each time flying higher than its 15-inch length.  When the battle was over, Mr. Kruger lifted the fish from the water, gently removed the hook from its jaw, admired it, and eased it back into the lake.  Seconds later he made another presentation with the lure, and again the result was a savage strike and a powerful fight.  It was a scene repeated dozens of times in the fading two hours of daylight.  For many fly-fishermen such an experience would be associated with an expensive, heavily stocked private trout water or a long, back-country trek to a secluded mountain lake.  But Mr. Kruger's success was due more to selection of species than location.  The expert angler from Dora, Mo., was fly-casting for bass rather than the traditional trout.  It's a sport that's now occupying a large part of his life.  Until recently a St. Louis-based editor at a successful outdoor magazine, Mr. Kruger moved to the Ozarks to focus on flyfishing for bass -- to write about it, to guide float-trips and to develop a line of lures.  Industry experts say his timing is perfect.  "People have really started to get turned on to bass fishing with a fly-rod," said Howard West, project manager for Scientific Anglers/3M, a leading manufacturer of fly-fishing equipment and videos.  "A real good barometer is the dramatic increase that companies like L.L. Bean and Umpqua (Feather Merchants, which produces fly-fishing lures) have had in bass bug sales.  It's going right through the roof."  To many, something as seemingly slow and deliberate as a fly-rod might appear out of place for a fish that's developed a following among conventional anglers who cast rapid-fire big baits that shine, shimmy and rattle.  But those who've tried it will tell you that fly-rodding for bass can be very, very effective.  "I've been fishing against guides and good bass fishermen using regular tackle for years," said Mr. Kruger, "and there's only been one time that the other person caught more bass than I did on a fly-rod.  I've often out-fished them 10 to one, though they might catch a bigger bass."  The next morning Mr. Kruger literally fished shoulder-to-shoulder with an accomplished conventional bass angler.  Mr. Kruger was the runaway winner in terms of quantity, while the other fisherman caught a bass that was slightly larger than the flyfisherman's best.  Still, Mr. Kruger said, you'll seldom hear a fly-fisherman complaining about size.  Bass that are a disappointment to conventional anglers armed with high-speed reels and flagpole-stiff fishing rods are always welcomed by those using a long, limber fly-rod.  "A two-pound bass on a fly-rod is more fun than a six-pounder on a bait-casting rod," said Mr. Kruger.  "Because the rod is so long and you hold the line directly in your fingers, you can feel every little fin vibration a bass makes."  Both Messrs.  Kruger and West said the ability to have fun with small and fair-sized bass fits well into the fish's population trends.  The past two decades of growing popularity has taken their toll on big bass over most of the U.S.  Most bass get taken from the water as soon as they pass the local length limit.  There also appears to be another bit of demographics precipitating the rising interest in fly-rod fishing for bass.  "Every year we have a lot of people moving south, to states like Texas and Florida," said Mr. West.  "That's hardly trout country but they're still looking for something to fly-fish for."  Those transplanted anglers, as well as any fisherman in the U.S., will find plenty of places to work a fly-rod for bass.  "No matter where someone lives, there's usually a pond, lake or river with bass in it close by," said Mr. West.  And bass offer another bonus -- they're easily caught by beginners.  "Trout fishing can be pretty delicate for beginners," said Mr. West.  "The casting has to be exact . . . and then they'll often only sip a bait so softly it's hard to detect a strike unless you're experienced.  But bass are explosive by comparison.  With a bass it's more like someone throwing a bowling ball into the water."  The future will see it getting easier and easier for anglers to experience such a jarring strike and powerful fight on a lightweight fly-rod.  Companies such as Scientific Anglers/3M are constantly improving lines, reels and rods to assist bass fishermen.  Fly-fishermen are also seeing a new generation of lures that are specifically designed for bass.  One of Mr. Kruger's pet projects is to take the principles that have worked so well for conventional fishing and apply them to fly-fishing.  I watched in amazement as one of his Krugercraft creations -- the Desperate Diver -- led both of us to nearly nonstop action on that small Kansas lake.  "It's designed to dive and wobble underwater just like a traditional bass lure you'd throw with a regular fishing rod," said Mr. Kruger.  "But it's much more effective and the fish are a lot more enjoyable to catch on a fly-rod."  ---  Mr. Pearce is a free-lance writer in Manhattan, Kan.  Mickey Mouse may be getting ready to step out with Miss Piggy.  Walt Disney Co. is negotiating to acquire closely held Henson Associates Inc., the New York-based company that controls rights to the Muppets and a host of other characters, according to individuals close to the talks.  A value for the transaction wasn't available, and Disney and Henson declined to comment.  It couldn't be determined whether there were any other suitors for the Henson concern.  The merger would be an obvious fit, say entertainment-industry watchers, because Disney is always looking to expand its character base: Its characters can cavort in a multitude of businesses.  In addition to making filmed entertainment and operating theme parks, Disney has a consumer-products division that distributes merchandising rights and operates a chain of retail stores that sell dolls, toys and T-shirts.  The Muppets have appeared in several motion pictures and a myriad of television shows for network and cable; Disney produces television shows and owns a pay cable service, The Disney Channel.  And Disney's theme parks always have room for characters.  "They're really buying the licensing rights to the characters," says analyst Alan Kassan of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "The main thing would be the consumer products and merchandising, but there's always the possibility they could have something like a Muppet playground at a theme park."  One individual familiar with the talks says the economies of scale make sense in this era of consolidation in the entertainment business.  Henson now has to pay syndication salesmen to distribute its shows; after joining Disney it could simply use the entertainment giant's existing network.  "You can save overhead," the individual says.  To clear up a possible misconception: This deal wouldn't affect Big Bird, who is owned by Children's Television Workshop, a nonprofit corporation.  Jim Henson helped create the characters on its television show "Sesame Street," but only one of those Muppets, Kermit the Frog, is a wholly owned Henson character.  Henson Associates apparently owns a percentage of the rights to the Sesame Street characters, but a spokesperson for CTW says the details of the copyright are "proprietary."  Mr. Henson still serves as a Sesame Street collaborator -- providing the puppeteers, and even playing the characters of Kermit and Ernie himself.  "Disney needs new characters because there's always a risk with Disney of overexposing the characters they do have," says one analyst, adding that the Roger Rabbit characters aren't enough to supply fresh characters to projects like the new Euro Disneyland under construction near Paris.  Henson Associates controls a growing library including several feature films and hours of "The Muppet Show," "Fraggle Rock" and other TV shows.  Most are syndicated and widely seen overseas.  CBS's cartoon hit "Muppet Babies" is produced with a partner.  And more is coming: a feature film, "The Witches," tentatively set for October release by Warner Brothers, an HBO series and an NBC mini-series.  A question Disney will have to grapple with, say observers, is to what extent they integrate Henson's well-known characters with their own.  One insider says the danger of confusing people is minimal, that Disney has taken outside characters before and made them their own.  "Is Winnie the Pooh -- or Peter Pan," the person says, "really a Disney character?"  Tandy Brands Inc. said that after examining its alternatives, its board has decided the company shouldn't be sold.  In May, the Fort Worth, Texas, specialty retailer and maker of men's accessories hired an investment banker to explore the possibility of selling the company and other strategies to improve holder value.  The company said its board reviewed "indications of interest" from possible suitors, as well as the potential performance of its Bombay Co. unit and Tandy Brands Accessories.  The company also said net income rose to $1.4 million, or 28 cents a share, for the fourth quarter ended June 30, from $291,000, or seven cents a share, a year ago.  The latest quarter included $433,000 in extraordinary tax benefits, while the year-earlier period included $235,000 in tax benefits.  Revenue rose 42%, to $24.8 million from $17.4 million.  Inhaled Medicine Offers  A Break From Needles  DOCTORS in the future may advise patients, "Take two deep breaths and call me in the morning."  A recent experiment hints that inhaling may be the easiest way to take some of the new genetically engineered drugs.  Such drugs are proteins that can't be taken in pill form because they would be digested in the gut and never reach the bloodstream.  Instead, they must be injected, a big inconvenience if a drug must be taken regularly for a lifetime.  The experiment at the federal National Heart, Lung and Blood Institute involved a dozen patients suffering a hereditary lung disease in which lack of a protein called alpha one-antitrypsin leads to destruction of the lung's tiny air sacs and early emphysema.  The lung destruction can be prevented by weekly, half-hourlong infusions of alpha one-antitrypsin directly into the bloodstream.  So little of the protein reaches the lung, however, it requires about $30,000 worth of antitrypsin to treat a patient for a year.  The protein is extracted from donated blood, although a genetically engineered version is under development.  The researchers made an experimental aerosol containing the protein and asked patients to inhale it every 12 hours for a week.  As hoped, a large portion of each dose penetrated deep into the lungs, the researchers report in the Annals of Internal Medicine.  This showed inhalation is feasible and safe, but longer studies are needed to see if it's effective in the lung disorder.  The researchers also found that the inhaled protein passed through the air sacs into the bloodstream, suggesting a new, easy way to get protein drugs into the blood, says Ronald G. Crystal, one of the researchers.  Among proteins that might be inhaled someday are human growth hormone for short stature in children, erythropoietin (EPO) for anemias, interferon for several diseases and clotting factors for hemophilia.  "Insulin {for diabetics} also is a possibility" if the dosage can be carefully controlled, Dr. Crystal says.  College Engineers Put  Air Conditioning on Ice  THE ICEMAN returneth, but only to cool the office.  Engineers at the University of Missouri in Kansas City are developing a more efficient way of using ice to cool office buildings.  In large air-conditioning systems, air is cooled by being blown over coils containing refrigerated water.  To cut the cost of refrigerating the water, many buildings, particularly in Texas and California, are resorting to "thermal storage" in which the system makes large amounts of ice at night when electric rates are low.  The next day, the ice is used to cool the circulating water, avoiding the use of refrigeration when electric rates are high.  But there's a problem.  To make the ice, thin sheets of water flow over arrays of vertical plates that are cooled to about 20 degrees Fahrenheit.  Unfortunately, the ice sticks to the plates; after a quarter inch or so of ice is formed, the plates have to be warmed so the slush falls off.  This alternate cooling and warming of the plates consumes 10% to 20% of the energy used in the ice-making process, says William Stewart, mechanical and aerospace engineering professor.  After three years of research funded by the Electric Power Research Institute, the Missouri engineers have developed a still-secret water additive that prevents the ice from sticking to the plates, eliminating the warming cycle.  "We're still in the laboratory trying to get some definitive efficiency numbers," Prof.  Stewart says, but a pilot project might be tried in the next several months.  Chemical Process Gives  Books Longer Shelf Life  TECHNIQUE to preserve books passes its acid test.  For years, librarians have anguished over the fact that for a century, after paper makers switched to wood pulp from rags, book paper has been highly acidic and disintegrates in about 50 years, compared with hundreds of years for rag paper.  Three million volumes in the Library of Congress are now too fragile to circulate, and 16 million volumes may become so in the future.  Library of Congress researchers found that exposing books to a gas of diethyl zinc (DEZ) in a low-pressure chamber would neutralize the acid and lengthen the paper's life.  But a pilot project at the National Aeronautics and Space Administration ended in a major fire in 1985.  Now, a chemical company, Texas Alkyls, reports it has successfully finished an 18-month-long demonstration of the DEZ treatment at a pilot plant in Deer Park, Texas.  The company is a joint venture of Akzo Chemicals Inc., a Dutch-owned company, and Hercules Inc.  The books could be treated for $6 to $10 each, compared with $70 to microfilm the average book.  Akzo says its licensing agreement with the Library of Congress calls for Texas Alkyls to build in the next 42 months two full-scale facilities, each capable of treating a million volumes a year.  Odds and Ends  ADULTS correctly squeezed out about one gram of skin ointment from a tube when told to apply two to 2 1/2 "index fingertips" of cream, report Welsh dermatologists looking for a way to prescribe ointment dosages other than saying "three centimeters." . . .  Tomatoes, potatoes and cauliflower at roadside stands have more vitamin C than the same vegetables in grocery stores, but grocery-store cabbage rates higher in the vitamin than roadside cabbage, University of Maine researchers find.  Place of purchase makes little difference vitamin-wise for broccoli, cantaloupe, green pepper and spinach.  From an article in the Japanese newspaper Sankei Shimbun by political analyst Taro Yayama:  Japanese don't feel nearly as wealthy as the rest of the world thinks we are, and for good reason.  The yen, so powerful overseas, has little purchasing power at home.  Prices here are far too high.  Last year the exchange rate fluctuated between 120 and 130 yen to the U.S. dollar.  But the Economic Planning Agency estimates that it actually took 200 yen to obtain $1 worth of goods and services in Japan.  No wonder that 70% of respondents to a recent survey by the prime minister's office said they do not consider themselves affluent.  Paris and New York are a shopper's paradise compared with Tokyo.  Prices have remained relatively constant at a high level over the past four or five years.  They didn't decline despite the yen's appreciation of close to 100% since 1985 and structural changes in the economy to stimulate domestic demand.  Under free competition, domestic prices should reflect international trends.  Where market forces do not operate, competition is limited, and the government intervenes with approved rates, price supports and regulations. . . .   The benefits of the strong yen should begin at home.  It's time the Japanese consumer got a break.  (Translation by the Asia Foundation.)  ---  Economic historian Joseph Schumpeter, responding to accusations of defeatism in the second edition of "Capitalism, Socialism, and Democracy":  Defeatism denotes a certain psychic state that has meaning only in reference to action.  Facts in themselves and inferences from them can never be defeatist or the opposite whatever that might be.  The report that a given ship is sinking is not defeatist.  Only the spirit in which this report is received can be defeatist: The crew can sit down and drink.  But it can also rush to the pumps.  If the men merely deny the report though it be carefully substantiated, then they are escapists.  Moreover, even if my statements of tendencies amounted more definitely to prediction than they were intended to do, they would still not carry defeatist suggestions.  What normal man will refuse to defend his life merely because he is quite convinced that sooner or later he will die anyhow?  This applies to both the groups from which the charge has come: sponsors of private-enterprise society and sponsors of democratic socialism.  Both of them stand to gain if they see more clearly than they usually do the nature of the social situation in which it is their fate to act.  Automobile pricing, long a mystery to many consumers, is getting murkier yet as car makers scramble to obscure some of the heftiest price increases in years.  The Big Three U.S. auto makers, eager to recover the costs of expensive sales incentives as well as new federally required safety equipment, are gearing up to extract more from consumers.  But they are also trying to soft-pedal the price increases -- by scattering them all over the window sticker, ending discounts on options and putting last year's middle-of-the-lineup name on this year's base model.  Consider the strategy General Motors Corp. is using on the soon-to-be-introduced 1990 version of its high-volume Chevrolet Corsica line.  On paper, the base price of the cheapest 1990 Corsica notchback sedan is dropping 4.9% to $9,495 from 1989.  But this doesn't tell the whole story: In 1989, Chevrolet offered discounts of as much as $1,200 on certain packages of popular options, including air conditioning, AM-FM radios and power windows.  The discounts won't be available on 1990 models.  The net effect, says one Chevy dealer, is that customers will pay hundreds of dollars more.  GM "didn't want to tell people, 'Hey, car prices are going up 6% to 7%,'" the dealer says.  There's a big risk to this, however: Car shoppers might not go along.  "This is only going to confuse the consumer," says Christopher Cedergren, an analyst with the market research firm of J.D. Power & Associates in Agoura Hills, Calif.  "With the market so competitive, I wouldn't want to confuse them."  In years past, when the Big Three U.S. auto makers needed to raise prices, they just did it.  But now, with Japanese auto makers moving aggressively to sell cars rolling off new U.S. assembly lines, Detroit is walking a tightrope between losing market share to foreign rivals and sacrificing profits because costs are rising faster than revenues.  Under these conditions, Mr. Cedergren says, "I would be a little timid about passing on price {increases} of the magnitude" proposed by the Big Three.  But GM, the No. 1 auto maker, signaled yesterday that it's willing to take the risk.  The company's divisions began notifying dealers that base prices on many 1990 models will rise 4% to 9%.  GM isn't alone.  Ford Motor Co. has released tentative 1990 prices that show it wants to raise base sticker prices 3% to 7.9% on most of its cars, and 5% to 12% on trucks and vans.  At Chrysler Corp., base prices for most 1990-model cars are expected to climb 3% to 8%.  That averages to about $750 a vehicle, Chrysler officials say.  While GM's price increases may not look as steep as its two domestic rivals, that's largely because Ford and Chrysler are making air bags standard equipment on more of their car lines.  About 40% of 1990 Ford models will come with air bags.  A company spokesman says these systems add $350 to $700 to the average price of a car.  Chrysler will have air bags in all its 1990-model U.S.-made cars.  GM, in contrast, plans to make air bags standard on only about 15% of its 1990 cars.  For years, GM was the price leader in the U.S. auto market.  Though the No. 1 auto maker's power has faded as its market share has declined in recent years, Ford and Chrysler officials say they won't set their final prices until they study GM's.  And what they will see, according to the tentative prices GM is sending to its dealers, is a complex strategy that so far has competitors scratching their heads.  In segments where it doesn't compete head-to-head with Japanese auto makers, GM is sharply boosting base prices.  The base price of a 1990 full-size Oldsmobile Eighty-eight Royale Brougham Sedan will rise $1,000 to $17,395.  Rebates on cars on this price class have been running between $1,000 and $1,500 since the spring.  In parts of the market where foreign competition is hottest -- particularly in the compact and subcompact segments -- GM is holding down or even cutting the base prices of some vehicles.  For example, the compact Buick Skylark sedan's 1990 base price appears to be dropping $650, or 6%, to $10,465.  However, the 1990 base-model Skylark sedan doesn't offer certain standard features the 1989 version did.  Nonetheless, GM's change will allow Buick dealers to advertise lower base prices for Skylarks.  However, GM is also raising for the second time in six months the prices of many options.  Air conditioning, one of the most popular, will cost $10 to $25 more in 1990 than now, a GM spokesman said.  In April, GM added as much as $20 to the cost of air conditioning.  The result: A Skylark air conditioner that cost $675 at the start of the 1989 model year could sell for more than $700 in 1990.  Other options on which GM is raising prices are power windows, power door locks, rear window defoggers and cruise control.  Consumers will shell out even more, because GM has eliminated the hefty discounts it once offered on certain factorydetermined groups of options, called "option packages."  Ford and Chrysler say they currently don't plan to raise their option prices and will continue to offer discounts for their option packages.  But that could change before final 1990 prices are set in the coming weeks.  These efforts to play down price increases come as all auto makers are struggling to boost sales and market share in the face of the softest U.S. auto market since the early 1980s.  Through July, U.S. passenger car sales, including imports, fell 6.3% from a year earlier.  The Big Three are faring even worse.  GM's domestic car sales dropped 9.4%, Chrysler's 15.3%.  With sales so weak, consumers might wonder why auto makers are maneuvering to boost prices.  But when auto makers sell fewer cars, as they're expected to do next year, they look for ways to boost revenue and profit per car.  Ford is raising the price of its Bronco II sport utility vehicle $607, or 4.3%, to $14,718, even though sales of the vehicle have fallen about 13% this year and the latest model is due to be replaced next spring by an all-new product.  Chrysler, meanwhile, is looking to earn more on its LeBaron line of coupes by loading more equipment -- including a new V-6 engine -- into a "premium" version of the car.  Chrysler tentatively plans to raise the base price of the 1990 model 11.7% to $16,415.  Or consider the case of the Pontiac Grand Prix coupe.  In 1989, Pontiac offered a base Grand Prix coupe that listed for $13,899.  But that car is gone for 1990.  Instead, the cheapest Grand Prix coupe is the Grand Prix LE, a model with more features that lists for $665 more, or $14,564.  GM also is taking an aggressive approach on some important new products, particularly its new plastic-bodied minivans.  The cheapest version of the Chevrolet Lumina APV lists for $13,995.  Pontiac's basic version of the radically styled, V-6 equipped van, the Trans Sport, will start at $14,995.  But the better equipped Trans Sport SE model will list for $18,125.  Oldsmobile's Silhouette, which is virtually identical to the Pontiac, will start at $17,195.  By comparison, much of Chrysler's minivan line is less expensive.  Chrysler's cheapest Dodge Caravan minivan, equipped with a four-cylinder engine, goes for $11,995.  But a customer could equip Chrysler's 1990 Voyager SE with a V-6 engine for a starting price of $13,375, or $620 less than the Chevrolet Lumina APV, which has a standard V-6 engine.  Chrysler's top-of-the-line Grand Voyager LE lists for $18,325.  That's $200 more than the top Pontiac Trans Sport, but the Chrysler will have a bigger, more powerful engine.  ---  @ Rising Prices on Some 1990 Models  @ 1990 Model 1989 Model Percent  @ Price Price Change  @ Chevrolet Lumina sedan $11,883 $11,883* ----  @ Ford Taurus sedan 12,594 11,778 +6.9%  @ Plymouth Acclaim sedan 10,385 9,920 +4.7  @ Lumina APV minivan 13,995 ---* ----  @ Ford Aerostar minivan 12,469 11,645 +7.1  @ Plymouth Voyager minivan 11,995 11,312 +6.0  *Lumina sedan went on sale as a 1990 model this past spring.  Lumina APV minivan will go on sale this fall.  Interco Inc., burdened by heavy debt and losses in the wake of its recapitalization last year, said its chairman and chief executive officer plans to resign in favor of an executive with more experience in "highly leveraged situations."  The retailer said Harvey Saligman will turn over the post of chief executive to Richard B. Loynd Nov. 1.  Mr. Loynd, 61 years old, has been president and chief operating officer since March.  The company said Mr. Saligman will retire as chairman May 31, but will remain on the board after that.  It didn't say who would be the new chairman.  A spokesman said both executives were traveling.  But Mr. Saligman said in a statement that he believes Interco "is entering a new phase that requires very specialized expertise to lead the company in a highly leveraged environment . . . ."   The spokesman said Mr. Loynd led a leveraged buy-out of Converse Inc. and later took it public before Interco bought the athletic shoe concern in 1986.  He was chairman and chief executive of Converse at the time and continued with Interco as a vice president.  Interco, which fought off a hostile takeover bid and recapitalized last year, is considered among the more troubled of recapitalized concerns.  In its first quarter ended May 31, it had a loss from continuing operations of $41.5 million on sales of $468.7 million.  Contel Corp. elected John L. Segall, formerly senior vice president of corporate strategy and development at American Telephone & Telegraph Co., to the new position of vice chairman.  In his new role, which becomes effective Sept. 1, Mr. Segall will be responsible for identifying new strategies and business opportunities for the Atlanta-based telecommunications concern.  He will report directly to the board and will serve as a member of Contel's executive committee.  His appointment increases board membership to 16.  A Bell System veteran of more than three decades, Mr. Segall was an architect of AT&T's post-divestiture strategy and was instrumental in establishing the company's international business links with Ing.  C. Olivetti & Co.  Contel's decision may indicate that the company will concentrate more effort on diversifying and expanding overseas.  "It is no coincidence that we have chosen someone with a deep understanding of our heritage in the telephone business for the position of vice chairman," said Donald Weber, Contel's president and chief executive officer.  "But, his real strength is that he has the experience to help us reach beyond our traditional markets and to use our reputation for customer service and technical excellence as building blocks for establishing new ventures both domestically and internationally."  Sara Lee Corp. reported that net income for the fiscal fourth quarter ended July 1 increased 18% from a year earlier on sales that rose 5.5%.  The food and personal-products company cited strong performances in all its personal-products operations, particularly its Hanes underwear, hosiery, sweatshirts and T-shirts.  For the fourth quarter, Sara Lee, based in Chicago, said it earned a record $102.7 million, or 86 cents a share, compared with the year-earlier period's $87.1 million, or 75 cents a share.  Per-share figures reflect an increase in common shares outstanding to 114.8 million from 111.5 million.  Fourth-quarter sales were $3.06 billion, up from $2.9 billion; the latest quarter's sales were a record for any period, despite that the 1989 quarter was a 13-week period, while the year-ago quarter included 14 weeks' sales.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Sara Lee shares slipped 62.5 cents, to close at $57.875.  Eljer Industries Inc. said its board unanimously rejected a $32.50-a-share, or $229.5 million, offer to be acquired by Nortek Inc.  Eljer, a Plano, Texas, maker of building products, said the company intends to remain independent and pursue a strategic plan updated since its spinoff from Household International Inc. in April.  Eljer couldn't be reached for elaboration.  However, in reporting its second-quarter results, Eljer said it is optimistic that it can earn $1.95 a share in 1989.  It said it has had pro forma net income of $4.4 million, or 63 cents a share, on sales of $207 million for the six months ended July 2.  The company said it is optimistic that lower interest rates will spur housing starts and increase demand for its products.  Nortek, a Providence, R.I., maker of building, aerospace and electrical products, declined comment on Eljer's move.  Nortek currently owns about 7.9% of Eljer's stock.  Eljer shares closed yesterday at $31.50, up 12.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Rep. Charles Wilson is a macho, strutting Texan who admits to little sentiment.  But these days, to hear him, he's worried about trees and birds and fauna with more than two legs.  The lanky Democrat is lined up against old friends in the lumber industry over the stark practice of clear-cutting forest lands in East Texas.  "I just don't think that clear-cutting is the way God meant it to be," he says.  Mr. Wilson isn't alone.  From global warming to nuclear waste, the African elephant to the Florida sea turtle, the House Appropriations Committee on which he sits has added at least $1.6 billion to President Bush's fiscal 1990 budget this summer in the name of the environment.  The Senate will trim back a bit, but its timber and energy barons are already on notice.  Logging interests suffered a rare defeat when senators cut forest-road funds last month in favor of wildlife and parks.  Where the House added $6 million for an institute to study global change, the Senate added $30 million to finance Energy Department research in the same field.  Outside events -- like the Exxon Valdez oil spill -- play a part.  But as seen with Mr. Wilson, the change under way is more than a single cause or political strategy imposed from atop.  Like the appropriations process itself, amendments are driven by often-localized interests, and lawmakers vie to bring home parks or to clean up wastes much as they once competed for conventional public works.  "Front page and front porch," says Democratic pollster Harrison Hickman, push the issues forward.  "You have a process that drives it from the bottom up," says Edward Reilly, a strategist close to House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.).  "The niche that's available for Democrats is to begin fighting for communities."  Republicans are mindful of the same movement.  "There must be more government intervention," says GOP pollster Lance Tarrance.  But after campaigning as a latter-day Teddy Roosevelt, Mr. Bush needs not only a big stick but deep pockets.  Congress is poised to add a minimum of $280 million to his request for cleaning up nuclear-weapon plants, and the president is being outspent by as much as $225 million in traditional park and wildlife accounts.  "Our authority exceeds our resources," says Environmental Protection Agency Director William Reilly, whose total budget was increased $539 million by the House, including $20 million for Boston Harbor, where candidate Bush railed against pollution last year.  For House and Senate appropriators, changing priorities means adapting old methods to new ends.  Traditional lines of jurisdiction blur as foreign-aid, space and military accounts are tapped for environmental projects.  Funds are committed in a race not just to allocate resources but to gain power over federal policy in the future.  The House-backed National Institute on Global Environmental Change was fashioned with an eye for votes from appropriators who have a stake in positioning the Energy Department in front on issues like global warming.  The University of California at Davis -- in the home district of the institute's chief sponsor, Rep. Vic Fazio (D., Calif.) -- would manage the project.  Regional partners include Harvard, Indiana and Tulane universities, with ties not only to Rep. John Myers (R., Ind.) and Rep. Lindy Boggs (D., La.) on the House energy subcommittee but also to Sen. Bennett Johnston (D., La.), who heads the corresponding Senate panel on energy appropriations.  The pressure for parks and land pushes up spending in the annual Interior Department bill -- dubbed "Little Pork" -- even as funding for water projects -- "Big Pork" -- has fallen.  House appropriations for construction and land accounts in the Fish and Wildlife Service and the National Park Service add up to a pool of more than $350 million in discretionary funds -- virtually all earmarked by members like Mr. Wilson, who set aside $2.9 million for visitor facilities at the Big Thicket preserve in his district.  Land also helps to forge alliances between environmentalists, who are more often on the left, and hunters and other sportsmen, with ties to the conservative gun lobby.  House Energy and Commerce Committee Chairman John Dingell (D., Mich.) and Massachusetts Rep. Silvio Conte, the ranking Republican on the House Appropriations Committee, are such a case.  Mr. Dingell is more visible as a friend of the auto industry and National Rifle Association.  But he also serves on a migratory-bird commission with Mr. Conte, who co-sponsored with him this year a spending amendment jealously protective of stamp revenue used to support preserves for ducks.  The same mix of interests was seen during Senate debate last month on roadconstruction funds for the Forest Service.  The turning point was a narrow 52-47 roll call in which Southern Democrats behind Sen. Wyche Fowler (D., Ga.) provided the margin to reduce such spending, the reverse of the outcome on a similar vote in 1986.  Environmentalists took advantage of regional divisions in the timber industry but also reached out to sportsmen by promising to reallocate at least $9 million to accounts funding improvements for waterfowl habitat and to restore wetlands.  The environmental pressures accent the changing values in the Western U.S.  A little-noticed provision in a Senate-passed spending bill directs the government to pay $15 million to take over more than 56,000 acres used by an irrigation project in Utah, but to which the government already has formal title.  The payment is to compensate an influential set of Utah landowners and water users for contractual rights given them decades ago by the Bureau of Reclamation, but to some the price appears dictated foremost by a political settlement blessed by the state's senior Republican, Sen. Jake Garn.  Mr. Garn, who attached the amendment as a member of the Senate Appropriations Committee, says he acted without favoritism to resolve a longstanding dispute over the fate of the property.  Critics, including some fellow Republicans, argue that the senator is overly indulging the older, entrenched landowners and has grown isolated from a West where the grass-roots sentiment favors sportsmen and environmentalists fearful of limited environmental funds being squandered.  Bureau of Reclamation estimates of the compensation due the owners have run at less than half the legislated price.  And even as Sen. Garn presses ahead, the General Accounting Office is reviewing the case at the request of Sen. Bill Bradley (D., N.J.), chairman of an authorizing subcommittee overseeing the Bureau of Reclamation.  Joseph Novak, an attorney for the sellers, the Strawberry Water Users Association, acknowledges that their own paid appraisal put the net value of the property at only $11.5 million.  But he said more was needed to help meet large federal taxes due on the transaction and still leave money to make improvements in the irrigation project.  "I don't care what the GAO says," scoffs Sen. Garn.  "Sometimes the government pays for nothing, for intangibles."  ---  @ Major House Increases To Bush Environmental Budget  @ (In millions of dollars)  @ Environmental Protection Agency +$539  @ Nuclear weapons plant waste cleanup + 335  @ Military bases cleanup + 383  @ National Park Service + 168  @ Fish and Wildlife Service + 71  @ Other major wildlife habitat + 103  Olympia & York Developments Ltd. dropped its bid valued at 700 million Canadian dollars ($593 million) for BCE Inc.'s unprofitable real estate unit after an insufficient number of the unit's securities were tendered.  Olympia & York, a big real estate concern owned by Toronto's Reichmann family, said certain conditions of its bid for BCE Development Corp. weren't satisfied, including those pertaining to the minimum number of securities deposited under the offer, which expired yesterday.  Olympia & York wouldn't specify which conditions weren't met, but an executive with ScotiaMcLeod Inc., lead manager for the offer, said it appears that shareholders didn't tender enough BCE Development common stock.  Olympia & York offered C$2.80 for each BCE Development common share, C$100 for each C$100 of 10.75% convertible debentures, C$96 for each C$100 of 8% convertible debentures, and various rates for two classes of BCE Development common share purchase warrants and one class of preference shares.  BCE, a Montreal-based holding company with interests in telecommunications, energy and real estate, had agreed to tender its 67% holding of BCE Development common shares to the bid.  Olympia & York's bid was conditional on receiving at least 90% of BCE Development's common, excluding the 2.8% stake it already owned, and receiving at least 66.66% of the 8% convertible debentures and various warrants.  Olympia & York valued its offer, including fees and expenses, at more than C$700 million.  A spokesman for BCE Inc. said he expects the company will once again review the possibility of selling all or part of its real estate assets.  BCE Development didn't return telephone calls.  BCE Development's plans in May to sell its $1.4 billion of U.S. real estate assets, which then represented about 65% of its total assets, were pre-empted by Olympia & York's takeover bid.  Analysts said Olympia & York's decision to end its bid could be more bad news for BCE Development, which reported a six-month loss of C$30.2 million compared with net income of C$1.85 million a year earlier.  In its six-month report to shareholders, BCE Development said it would have to review the carrying values of its properties in the event that Olympia & York's offer didn't proceed.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange yesterday, BCE Development closed at C$2.53, down 20 cents.  Atlantic Richfield Co. said it will introduce a low-emission regular gasoline to the Southern California market Sept. 1 that will "significantly reduce air pollution" from older cars that don't have catalytic converters.  Arco, based here, said the new blend of gas will replace its leaded regular gasoline.  The new gas blend has no lead but does have methyl tertiary butyl ether, a high-octane component.  The company said it would reduce olefins, aromatics, benzene and sulfur in the gas blend.  The company said the price of the gas to dealers will be the same as its leaded regular gasoline prices.  The gas could be used by the 1.2 million older cars in the Southern California area, which comprise only 15% of the area's cars and trucks but belch out more than 30% of its vehicular air pollution.  A spokesman for competing Chevron Corp. said that Arco "is definitely first out of the box" with an alternative gas for cars without catalytic converters.  He added that the "formulation should reduce" certain gas emissions that contribute to smog.  In an Aug. 8 editorial-page article by James Bovard, the per-capita cost of the census was misstated.  It has increased from $1.21 in 1970 to a projected $10.40 in 1990.  (See: "Honesty May Not Be Your Best Census Policy" -- WSJ Aug. 8, 1989)  Maybe you had to be there.  Tired of pedestrian insults heard on the street, members of the Jane Austen Society of North America recently trooped to the New York Botanical Gardens to sling some more refined dirt.  To be sure, the cultivated yet caustic remarks at the gathering weren't original.  Instead, the insulters preferred to bow to past masters of the put-down, flinging barbs that, while witty, were definite hand-me-downs.  The members took their theme from the Box Hill picnic scene in Jane Austen's "Emma."  They took turns reading from the chapter, in which Emma asks picnic participants to say either one brilliant thing, two moderately amusing things, or three dull things.  Emma then delivered a barb to the elderly, notoriously wordy Miss Bates:  "Pardon me -- but you will be limited as to number -- only three at once."  In the novel, Emma is taken to task for the insult, but society members appear to like her all the more for it.  Among the ripostes they repeated was Samuel Johnson's daunting reply to an aspiring author: "Sir.  Your manuscript is both good and original.  But the part that is good is not original, and the part that is original is not good."  Gladstone to Disraeli: "You, sir, shall either die by hanging or from some loathsome disease."  To which Disraeli replied: "The former, sir, only if I embrace your politics; the latter if I embrace your mistress."  "Janites," the name Rudyard Kipling gave Jane Austen fanatics, say their favorite author is an oasis amid the upsets of late 20th-century life.  "We are all seekers of civilized life," says Jeanne Kiefer, picnic coordinator.  "She is the Garden of Eden, and there is no devil," says Sedell Rand, a longtime Jane fan.  The gatherers pointed out that Jane herself wasn't malicious in her writing.  "While the insults we read may be abrasive and harsh, this was never her way," says Marian Attarian Bryer.  Still, they seemed to enjoy flinging a few good ones.  In fact, they allowed themselves three comments each -- which makes one wonder in which category Emma would have placed the witticisms.  For the past 20 years, Alvin Saidiner has been a tireless crusader against rising medical costs.  "Nobody had ever heard of cost containment when I got into it" in 1967, he boasts.  But the 55-year-old pharmacist is himself paying the price.  His company, PCC/Drug Data Systems Inc., is despised by hospitals and healthcare trade groups, and no wonder.  Mr. Saidiner reviews the cost of drugs on hospital bills and recommends on average that his clients -- mostly insurance firms -- refuse payment on about 40% of the tab.  For three years Mr. Saidiner has been embroiled in a lawsuit filed by the California Association of Hospitals and Health Systems and 123 of its member hospitals, which claim they've unfairly been denied payments.  Because Mr. Saidiner's firm is known as one of the most aggressive in the field, other medical-cost auditors are closely following the case.  A win by the hospitals could lead auditors to tone down their own cost-containment efforts.  "Everyone in the workers' compensation field is very aware of the suit and interested in the outcome," says Doreen Corwin, vice president of Beech Street Inc., an Irvine, Calif., hospital audit service.  Bill Kent, vice president of Retrospect Medical Auditing Inc. in Rancho Cucamonga, Calif., says he is "watching with trepidation."  He says an enraged hospital administrator once threatened that "when we finish with PCC, we're coming after you."  Even if Mr. Saidiner wins the suit, the litigation has raised questions about his methods and frightened off clients.  While employers and insurers are looking for ways to cut medical costs, few want to go to court.  In fact, one of the four insurance firms named in the suit recently settled, and the other three say they are discussing the same.  If they settle as well, it would leave Mr. Saidiner's mom-and-pop enterprise to battle the hospitals by itself.  The suit, filed in federal court in Los Angeles, accuses PCC and the other defendants of conspiring "to fix and pay arbitrarily established and unreasonably low prices."  The group complains that in the past six years, PCC has cost California hospitals more than $58 million in denied charges.  The hospitals are seeking unspecified actual and punitive damages, and a permanent injunction enjoining the defendants from delaying or reducing payments. (Most of the disputed bills concern injured workers.  When claims are denied in California workers' compensation cases, the hospitals are stuck because state law protects the employee from the bill.)  In a counter suit, Mr. Saidiner claims the hospitals' real purpose is simply to drive him out of business.  "It's sham litigation," he charges.  PCC is seeking treble damages totaling $42 million, three times the $14 million that Mr. Saidiner estimates to be the value of his business before it was ruined by the suit.  Three years ago, PCC had 1,400 clients nationwide and annual revenue of close to $5 million, say Mr. Saidiner and his wife, Rosalie.  This year, they'll be lucky to pull in $300,000.  After laying off 25 people since the lawsuit was filed in March 1986, PCC's total staff has shrunk to nine, including the Saidiners and their 28-year-old daughter.  "Our phones don't ring anymore," Mrs. Saidiner says.  In February, the company lost its biggest client, the California State Compensation Insurance Fund, the state's largest workers' compensation insurer and a defendant in the hospital industry suit.  A spokesman for the quasi-governmental agency says its PCC contract was terminated for "purely business reasons."  PCC services are no longer needed, he says, mainly because the fund has developed networks of hospitals that have agreed to discounted rates for all services.  While other cost-containment firms typically review entire hospital bills, PCC audits only the drug and supply charges.  This approach is irksome to hospitals, whose markups on these products are "often in the realm of 800% to 1,000%," says Gregory Johnson, an associate in the San Francisco office of Mercer Meidinger Hansen Inc., a major benefits consulting firm.  Take for example a bill that PCC reviewed for Chevron Corp. Presbyterian Intercommunity Hospital in Whittier, Calif., charged a patient $270.50 for intravenous solutions.  PCC calculated the hospital's actual cost at just $9 and recommended payment of $69.50.  The hospital also billed $23.50 for eight iron capsules that PCC says cost $1.04; PCC recommended payment of $4.80.  The hospital is disputing the recommendations.  "I'm the only one out there saying hospitals charge too much," Mr. Saidiner avers.  "You don't have a {Ralph} Nader going after the hospital business."  But "cherry-picking" the bill erroneously assumes that hospitals price their services like a store, says Michael D. Stephens, president and chief executive of Hoag Memorial Hospital Presbyterian in Newport Beach, Calif.  Hoag Memorial decided to join the suit against PCC because "the frequency of {PCC} denials had increased," he says.  Besides paying part of the hospital's overhead for equipment, nursing and administration, each patient must share the burden of providing free treatment to needy people, Mr. Stephens says.  Thus when a hospital charges $6 for an aspirin, it is apportioning total costs, hospital officials say.  Hospitals say their expenses are outpacing their revenue, despite an 11% increase in charges last year.  The latest suit is the association's third attack on PCC.  In 1976, the group filed a suit charging PCC and two insurers with price-fixing and other antitrust violations.  The suit was dropped when the two insurers agreed to stop using PCC. Hospitals also backed a failed legislative proposal on billing audits in 1985 that Mr. Saidiner says would have put him out of business.  He had less luck when Sherman Oaks Hospital in the San Fernando Valley last year challenged PCC's recommendation against paying about $40,000 of the hospital's $219,000 bill for treating a 39-year-old electrician's serious burns.  An administrative law judge in Ventura, Calif., ruled against PCC's client, an insurer.  In his written opinion, Laurence D. Grossman attacked PCC's advice as "unreasonable, unsupported and motivated by financial self-interest."  He also complained that pinning down PCC's cost formula "was like trying to nail Jell-O to the wall."  Mr. Saidiner counters that PCC's clients have prevailed in 40 of the 50 cases in which he has testified over the years.  Defending his methodology, he says he applies a complex formula with "up to 19 cost factors" that adjust for location, administrative costs and charity care, among other things.  He allows about a 15% profit for the hospital on medications and supplies, he says.  After years battling the industry, Mr. Saidiner seems weary.  He's even filed his own workers' compensation claim with his insurer, citing stress.  "It's very depressing when you work and work and work, and, ultimately even your most satisfied customers don't appreciate what you do," he says glumly.  Sony USA Inc., looking to expand in the semiconductor and optical-products markets, said it agreed to acquire Materials Research Corp. for about $60 million.  The U.S. unit of Japan's Sony Corp. said it would make a tender offer of $14 a share for all of Materials Research's shares outstanding.  It said it expected to begin the offer soon, but had no firm date.  Shares of Materials Research climbed on the announcement, closing at $13.625 each, up $3.375, in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Materials Research, of Orangeburg, N.Y., makes sputtering and etching equipment, high-purity metals and ceramics.  Sputtering is a semiconductor-coating process.  A Sony USA spokesman said these technologies are important for semiconductors and optical products.  Sony USA said the acquisition, which is subject to certain conditions, is aimed at expanding its position in the semiconductor and optical-products markets.  Sony makes consumer and industrial audio and video electronics, computer peripherals and semiconductors.  The Sony spokesman said the two companies have worked together for many years on some of these technologies and that the proposal for the acquisition came from Materials Research.  Materials Research, with offices and facilities in the U.S. and several other countries, had $116.7 million in sales for the fiscal year ended Oct. 29, and employs about 700 people world-wide.  To the Masai tribe living on the fringe of this wildlife haven, Kenya's economics of development are upside down.  The animals get water wells and police protection from poachers.  The foreign tourists who come to photograph the animals get fancy lodges.  But the Masai, who were forced to move when their grazing land became a national park, get nothing to aid their difficult transition from a pastoral to an agricultural lifestyle.  What they do get is angry, particularly when roaming elephants and buffalo trample their corn and cabbage crops.  "We feel the government cares more about the wildlife than it does about us," says Daniel Lengesia, a Pentecostal pastor in the Masai area of Namelok, which borders the unfenced Amboseli.  "We know they make millions from the park, and we, who must live with the animals, don't get any of it."  With tourism now Kenya's top foreign-exchange earner, and with wildlife the main tourist draw, the age-old conflict between man and environment has been turned on its head.  Elephants are more important than peasants, at least to the state treasury.  Which raises a vexing development dilemma: Can a poor country like Kenya, with per-capita annual income of about $360 and an explosive population growth rate of 4% a year, afford to develop wildlife and human life at the same time?  Wildlife officials say they can't afford not to.  "If we don't develop tourism, the government won't have the money it needs to run basic services," says Richard Leakey, director of the Kenya Wildlife Service.  "We have to make the link between elephants and health clinics.  People must be made to perceive the development of wildlife in economic terms."  That's asking a lot for Africa.  Though the continent is blessed with breathtaking scenery and wildlife that stocks the world's zoos, conservation and tourism have been low priorities in the post-independence era.  Development of long-neglected human resources took precedence; money poured into schools, clinics, clean water, housing, roads, and agriculture, as well as airports, government buildings and soccer stadiums.  Wildlife, on the other hand, was mainly seen as an impediment to this development, killing cattle, ravaging crops and ruining water systems.  But Kenya's development priorities have been scrambled in the past year as commodity prices slumped and tourism overtook coffee and tea as the main money spinner.  Last year, 700,000 visitors -- mainly Germans, British and Americans -- pumped $390 million into the country, which helped the government keep current on its steep foreign-debt payments.  "Twenty-five years down the road from independence, we have to start making new priorities," says Mr. Leakey, a paleontologist who, along with his parents, Louis and Mary Leakey, advanced the study of human origins.  "We must think of the conservation of wildlife, land, water and other resources if we are going to have any future."  He is seeking $100 million for the purpose.  Kenya has a lot of catching up to do.  Rampant poaching, in part fostered by government corruption, has reduced Kenya's elephant population to 17,000 from 65,000 in 10 years.  And with less than 2% of the wildlife revenue of past years going back into the country's 16 national parks and reserves, the tourism infrastructure, particularly roads in the parks, has deteriorated badly.  Meanwhile, lax security for tourists on safari has resulted in attacks by bandits.  Indeed, the U.S. State Department recently warned Americans visiting national parks and other remote areas of Kenya to travel only in groups with a guide from a reputable safari firm or a game ranger.  A department advisory said most of the attacks, "some of which resulted in deaths of tourists, have been attributed to heavily armed wildlife poachers."  Still the government is counting on attracting 1.5 million tourists a year by 1995.  Some Kenyan officials regard the elephants, rhinos, lions and cheetahs as the country's most-valued civil servants.  By one estimate, the elephants, the main tourist attraction, bring in $50 million a year; that comes to about $3,000 per elephant, or nearly 10 times more than the per-capita human contribution to the economy.  But elephants don't vote, and therein lies the development dilemma.  "Members of Parliament often ask, 'So, are animals more important than people now?'" says a former member of Parliament.  Hugh Lamprey, the World Wildlife Fund's regional representative for East and Central Africa, says the fund would like the government to spend a greater portion of its tourism revenue on wildlife conservation.  But, he says, "The government badly needs those dollars and deutsche marks for essential things, like education, health, social services, defense and transportation."  The dilemma was clearly illustrated last month when the Kenyan government, although it needs all the foreign currency it can get, nevertheless torched $3 million worth of elephant tusks confiscated from ivory poachers over the past several years.  President Daniel arap Moi, who lit the fire, says Kenya can't take the lead in a world-wide ivory-trade ban if the government is still selling ivory itself.  The Masai of Amboseli believe they know a way to resolve the dilemma.  The community leaders have been trying to forge a link between the wildlife and village development by operating a campsite for low-budget tourists inside the park.  The more wildlife, the more campers, the more money for farm implements and seed.  Similarly, they say, the government needs to spread around its tourist revenue.  For starters, the Masai say they could use help with an irrigation system and an electric fence to keep the elephants and water buffalo out of their crops.  "If our people see some benefit from the animals, they will want to protect them," says David Maitumo, a Masai leader.  "But if they don't . . . get any money from the elephants, they will continue to chase them away."  Tanqueray is unquestionably the yuppie gin of choice.  But can the Tanqueray name sell vodka, too?  Schieffelin & Somerset is betting it can.  On Sept. 1, the liquor importer is to roll out Tanqueray Sterling Vodka with a $20 million advertising push, including $10 million to be spent in the next four months alone.  "Gin and vodka drinkers have so much in common . . . we feel there's a lot of builtin horsepower" with the Tanqueray name, says J. Penn Kavanagh, Schieffelin's president and chief executive officer.  He expects Tanqueray Sterling to become the third-best selling superpremium vodka after Absolut and Stolichnaya, nudging out current No. 3 Finlandia.  Mr. Kavanagh yesterday offered a sneak preview of the debut ad campaign, which will appear in magazines such as Time, Sports Illustrated and Esquire, and on billboards in 21 markets.  The ads, created by Smith/Greenland, rely on the familiarity -- and prestige by association -- of the Tanqueray name.  They picture only a bottle of Tanqueray Sterling, which is identical to Tanqueray's gin bottle but frosted white instead of green.  The text: "At last, perfection in a vodka.  Tanqueray Sterling."  Beverage experts question whether a name so closely associated with gin can do double duty as a vodka brand, too.  "Vodka is a unique type of image," says Tom Pirko, president of BevMark Inc., a beverage consulting firm.  "Can they jump across from gin and implant this unique image in the minds of consumers as vodka?  It's risky."  Mr. Pirko believes Schieffelin, which is known for its savvy marketing of Tanqueray gin, Johnny Walker Scotch and other brands, is better positioned than others to try to make that jump.  But he adds: "No amount of research or testing will find out.  That will only be borne out by sales in the marketplace."  Schieffelin's move is especially risky because the superpremium vodka business is already crowded and fiercely competitive, and getting more so.  Monsieur Henri Ltd., which imports Stolichnaya, earlier this year launched Moscow-made Cristall.  Whitbread North America Inc. introduced Denaka from Denmark, while Seagram Co. is repositioning Wyborowa, a Polish vodka.  And Brown-Forman has introduced Icy in nine cities, although the supposedly Icelandic vodka actually originates in Kansas.  "My concern is they might be starting to clutter the market," says Frank Walters, director of research for M. Shanken Communications, which publishes alcoholic beverage trade publications, including Impact.  Still, the superpremium vodka segment is the only part of the vodka business that is growing.  According to Mr. Walters, the superpremium category grew 24% in 1988, to 3.2 million cases, while the less expensive categories either barely grew or declined slightly.  And that kind of increase is all the encouragement Schieffelin needed.  Its Tanqueray gin, the most popular imported gin and the third-most popular gin overall, grew only 2%, to 1.35 million cases, last year.  The gin category as a whole dropped by 3%, according to Mr. Walters.  Schieffelin's Mr. Kavanagh says the company toyed with several vodka concepts before settling on a Tanqueray brand.  It considered importing an Alaskan vodka, "since Alaska was settled by Russians," he says, but abandoned that idea after finding that Alaska has no distilleries, "and we'd have to make up the heritage."  It ultimately settled on Tanqueray in part because research shows that at least 25% of Absolut and Stolichnaya drinkers also drink Tanqueray gin.  Schieffelin has even been able to fashion a "heritage" for Tanqueray Sterling.  Mr. Kavanagh says that there actually was a Tanqueray family in Britain that made gin, and members of another branch of the family were silversmiths to the queen; hence Tanqueray Sterling's frosted glass bottle is highlighted in silver.  No matter, of course, that neither branch of the family ever had anything remotely to do with vodka.  More difficult was creating the vodka itself.  Schieffelin professional vodka tasters found that Absolut is smooth but rather bland, while Stolichnaya is slightly less smooth but has more character, and set out to create a vodka that is both smooth and has character.  The finished product is distilled using granite chips.  Unfortunately for Schieffelin, however, government regulations hold that vodka can't have any distinctive taste, color or odor, which means taste isn't much of a marketing tool.  Image and packaging are everything, which helps explain why Schieffelin is spending two and a half times more on its fancy vodka bottles than on its gin bottles.  The Tanqueray image does seem to be giving the new vodka a boost, at least with liquor wholesalers.  Mr. Kavanagh says Schieffelin has produced 150,000 cases for the rollout and expects to sell "at least" 500,000 cases a year by 1992, at a price equal to Absolut's (currently about $12 a bottle).  He says the brand should break even in three years.  Mr. Walters, the researcher, believes those drinkers will be drawn away from some of the "second-tier" superpremium brands and from lesser vodkas, and even might cannibalize Tanqueray's gin sales to a small extent.  But, he adds, "I don't think they're going to take anything away from Absolut or Stoli."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   YOUNG & RUBICAM: Young & Rubicam Stockholm acquired Hall & Cederquist, a Stockholm ad agency.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The merged agency will be renamed Hall & Cederquist/Young & Rubicam.  It will have billings of more than $110 million, making it the largest agency in Sweden, a Y&R spokesman said.  NEW ACCOUNT: Random House, New York, awarded the ad accounts for many of its smaller trade publishers to Della Femina, Sherman, a New York division of Della Femina, McNamee WCRS.  The accounts together will bill an estimated $3.5 million.  Included in the assignment is advertising for Fodor's, Pantheon, Vintage and others.  McGill Manufacturing Co.'s chairman and chief executive officer said BroadBeach Associates, which has proposed a merger or other business combination, has been "advised that McGill is not interested in any such transaction."  Late Friday, BroadBeach, a Los Angeles securities firm, disclosed that it had proposed acquiring the shares of McGill it doesn't own for $62 each.  That price values the ball-bearing concern at $89.9 million; BroadBeach's most recent SEC filings indicate it holds a 7% stake.  James C. McGill, the executive, said the proposal "appears to be highly conditional" in that BroadBeach would need to secure financing.  He added that the proposed buy-out "would be subject to a number of other conditions within BroadBeach's control."  Officers, directors and members of the McGill family hold about 21% of McGill's common shares outstanding, the company said.  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, McGill closed up $2 at $59, after rising $5.75 Monday.  The Philippines reached a proposed debt settlement with its major international bank creditors, according to a banker familiar with the negotiations.  The proposed settlement, the second under the new U.S.-backed debt strategy, requires bank creditors of the Philippines either to contribute to a $1.2 billion loan for the country or to offer the country some debt relief, the banker said.  Terms of that relief would be set through an auction system, he added.  The revised U.S.-backed debt strategy has emphasized cutting back debt and interest payments over continued lending to heavily indebted developing countries.  But the proposed settlement for the Philippines looks as though its emphasis will be more on continued bank lending than on debt reduction.  The tentative Philippine bank-debt settlement, which has yet to be approved by the country's many international bank creditors, was apparently struck yesterday afternoon in talks in New York.  Philippine government officials had said recently that they would seek new bank loans of as much as $1.7 billion in these negotiations, which started last week.  Jose Fernandez, the Philippine central-bank governor who has led his country's debt negotiators, couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Fernandez checked out of his New York hotel early yesterday evening after the debt talks.  A spokesman for Manufacturers Hanover Corp. declined to comment on the talks yesterday afternoon.  Manufacturers Hanover chairs the committee of banks that negotiates with the Filipinos.  The Philippines has $28 billion of foreign debt, about half of which is owed to foreign banks.  It has recently experienced economic growth of more than 5%, and many analysts -- as well as some Philippine government officials -- have questioned whether it is appropriate for the country to pursue debt relief too vigorously.  They fear such an approach could result in only small reductions and could interfere with future inflows of foreign credit.  In the first agreement made under the new U.S.-backed debt strategy -- the Brady initiative -- Mexico recently reached a tentative debt settlement with its major bank creditors that includes three options: exchanging bank loans for new bonds with a lower, fixed 6 1/4% rate of interest; swapping loans for new bonds that offer Mexico a 35% cut in debt principal, or lending new money.  Since then, bankers have been trying to impress on debtor countries that the tentative Mexican settlement isn't necessarily a model for other countries.  Citicorp Chairman John S. Reed has toured Latin American countries with that message.  Meanwhile, U.S. Treasury Undersecretary David C. Mulford, who visited Argentina this week, said that country could be a candidate for the new U.S. debt strategy if it put its economy in order, according to news-agency reports.  General Host Corp. said it reached an agreement in principle to settle two water-pollution lawsuits pending in a federal district court in Kansas.  The settlement, which is subject to mutually satisfactory terms, would relieve General Host of any further liability for the pending claim and all future claims by the plaintiffs.  As a result, General Host, based here, said it will take an after-tax charge for discontinued operations of approximately $3.4 million, or 17 cents a share, in its second quarter ended Aug. 13.  Local landowners in Lyons, Kan., sought recovery for claimed damages since 1983, claiming saltwater pollution of their underground water supply prevented irrigation to their farmland.  The suits alleged that the pollution was caused by operations of American Salt Co., a salt-mining plant near Lyons, owned until 1988 by General Host's AMS Industries Inc. subsidiary.  The company recently paid $18.9 million, including interest, to essentially the same plaintiffs in a similar case dating back to 1977.  General Host, a retailer of food, plant and craft products, said this payment will not have an impact on current income, since an after-tax charge for its cost was made to discontinued operations last year.  InSpeech Inc., a provider of contract rehabilitative services to the health care industry, is beginning to reap the benefits of an acquisition spree.  Previously a provider of speech therapy only, the company made 17 acquisitions in 1986 and 1987 to expand that service and to diversify into physical therapy and occupational therapy as well.  "We made, some people would say, too many acquisitions too fast and had a year of indigestion" in 1988, said John H. Foster, chairman, president and chief executive officer.  More recently, though, the company has concentrated on paring redundant functions among its acquired operations, putting more management into the field and reversing what had been growing turnover among therapists.  For the fiscal fourth quarter, ended June 30, Mr. Foster said in an interview, InSpeech will report that profit more than tripled from a year ago to about $1.8 million, or 13 cents a share, on revenue of about $19.9 million.  In the year-earlier quarter, the company earned $491,000, or four cents a share, on revenue of $16.5 million.  An 18-month hiatus in acquisitions ended last month with the purchase of Allied Health Alternatives Inc., a rehabilitation practice in Minneapolis.  But, Mr. Foster said, future purchases will be mostly "filler acquisitions," meant to patch chinks in the company's geographic markets.  To reflect InSpeech's expanded services, the company plans to change its name to NovaCare Inc., effective Oct. 1.  InSpeech is preparing itself to be a nationwide partner with nursing homes as they confront a demand for more rehabilitative services.  Because the federal Medicare program now provides hospitals a financial incentive to discharge patients early, nursing homes find their beds filling with sicker patients.  "As their business is changing, they're hungry for what we do," Mr. Foster said.  He acknowledged that bringing more rehabilitative services in-house may still be under consideration at some nursing homes.  But he argued that most can operate more economically by contracting out such work.  InSpeech now contracts with 1,600 nursing homes around the country to provide them with teams of therapists, each team being assigned to a number of nursing homes.  Most large nursing-home chains now contract with InSpeech for at least some of their facilities, Mr. Foster said.  The biggest client is Beverly Enterprises Inc., of Pasadena, Calif., whose business accounts for about 10% of InSpeech's revenue.  InSpeech's success, Mr. Foster said, "is principally dependent on our ability to attract and retain clinicians" in a field where turnover rates are high.  The annualized turnover rate among therapists at InSpeech below the supervisory level increased to 57% at the end of 1987 from 30% at the beginning of 1986 as the company tried to integrate its acquisitions and get a grasp on its new businesses outside speech therapy.  Since the end of 1987, however, that rate has steadily declined and now stands at about 30% again.  The Chicago Board of Trade said its directors voted to form a permanent ethics committee in the wake of the sweeping government investigation of the Chicago futures markets.  Tyrone Fahner, a former Illinois attorney general, was named by the exchange as special counsel to the panel.  The directors also voted to add a fourth non-member director to the exchange's board, raising to 25 the total number of directors.  Also terms of non-member directors were expanded to four years from three.  The addition of the director is subject to a membership vote.  Forty-six traders from the Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange have been indicted so far by the government on charges that they defrauded hundreds of customers.  Neither exchange has been implicated in the continuing investigation.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  First Fidelity Bancorp. -- $150 million of noncallable 9 5/8% subordinated notes, due Aug. 15, 1999, priced at 99.90 to yield 9.64%.  The issue was priced at 143 basis points over the yield on the Treasury 10-year note.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Goldman Sachs & Co.  Gulf Canada Resources Ltd. -- $125 million of noncallable 9% notes, due Aug. 15, 1999, priced at 98 1/2 to yield 9.233%.  The issue was priced at 103 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  @ MUNICIPALS  Southern Minnesota Municipal Power Agency -- $90 million of power supply system revenue bonds, Series 1989 A and B, tentatively priced by a Morgan Stanley & Co. group to yield from 6% in 1990 for both Series A and B to 7.15% in 2013 for Series A.  The $57 million Series A includes current interest bonds due 1990-2000, 2003-2005 and 2013.  There are also capital appreciation bonds due 2001 and 2002.  The $33 million Series B includes current interest bonds due 1990, 1991, 1997-2000 and 2003-2005.  For the series, yields range from 6% in 1990 to 7.10% in 2005.  The bonds are rated single-A-1/single-A-plus, according to the lead underwriter.  Philadelphia Municipal Authority -- $71.4 million of equipment revenue bonds, Series 1989, due 1992-1996, priced at par by a Grigsby Brandford Powell Inc. group to yield from 6.35% in 1992 to 6.55% in 1996.  The bonds are insured and triple-A-rated.  @ MISCELLANEOUS  State of Israel -- $730 million of government trust certificates, priced via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. Part 3A consists of $197 million of 8.55% certificates due Nov. 15, 1993, priced at 99.991 to yield 8.562%.  The 3A certificates have an expected average life of three years and were priced to yield 31 basis points above the three-year Treasury note.  Part 3B consists of $222 million of 8.55% certificates priced at 99.902 to yield 8.578%.  The 3B certificates have an expected average life of 5.52 years and were priced at 36.5 basis points above the five-year Treasury note.  Pricing details were incomplete for a third part consisting of $311 million of zero-coupon securities with maturities from Nov. 15, 1989, through Nov. 15, 2011.  The issue is rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  The certificates are 90%-backed by the U.S. government.  U.S. government securities owned by Israel back the remaining 10%.  The certificates are being offered under the foreign military sales credit program, a U.S. government program that allows governments to repay military loans.  @ EUROBONDS  Qantas Airways Ltd. (Australia) -- $80 million of 9 1/4% Eurobonds due Sept. 21, 1999, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 9.29% less full fees via Daiwa Europe Ltd. Fees 2.  Toa Corp. (Japan) -- $200 million of Eurobonds due Sept. 8, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/4% coupon at par via Nikko Securities Co. Europe.  Guaranteed by Fuji Bank Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant exercisable from Sept. 21, 1989, through Aug. 25, 1993, to buy shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing price when terms are fixed next Monday.  Fees 2 1/4.  Canada Eldor Inc. (Canada) -- 50 million Canadian dollars of 11 3/4% bonds due March 30, 1993, to become fungible with a C$200 million issue outstanding, via Wood Gundy Inc. Issue price undisclosed.  FGF (Bermuda) Ltd. (Bermuda) -- $75 million of Eurobonds in two tranches via Kidder Peabody.  Tranch A is $60 million of 9.6% Eurobonds due Nov. 10, 1999, priced at 102 to yield 9.6%.  Call after five years at par on any interest payment date.  Fees 2.  Tranche B is $15 million of floating-rate notes due November 1999 priced at par, paying six-month London interbank offered rate plus 0.20.  Call at par after one year.  Fees 0.30.  Guaranteed by Financial Security Assurance.  Carps III (special purpose vehicle) -- #60 million of collateralised floating-rate notes due August 1999, paying three-month Libor plus 0.20 and priced at par, via Samuel Montagu Ltd. Secured by a charge on bonds to be issued with the benefit of a Financial Guaranty Insurance Co. surety bond.  Average life 6.2 years.  Fees 0.25.  Ashton-Tate Corp. announced companywide layoffs and cost-cutting to stem widening losses expected in the third quarter because of flat sales and bloated inventories at the distributor level.  The company's operating loss in the Sept. 30 quarter will exceed the $19.8 million loss posted last quarter, on $59.5 million of revenue, the company said.  Comparable year-ago figures aren't available because the company switched to a calendar year from a Jan. 31 fiscal year.  The database software company said it will let go 15% to 20% of its 1,731 workers by next week, along with belt-tightening in advertising, machines, temporary workers and consultants.  "We've looked at every area," said Edward M. Esber Jr., chairman, president and chief executive officer.  "The goal is to make sure that the company is cash-flow positive in the fourth quarter.  To me, that means profitable."  In over-the-counter trading yesterday, Ashton-Tate fell 50 cents to $13.  "Inventories are now more in line, but the reduction program is continuing," Mr. Esber added.  Problems began in March when high expectations for the market reception of its dBase products weren't met, leading to overbuilt distributor inventories.  In addition, he explained that several major distributors went public, prompting them to clamp down on bloated stocks.  "I don't want to say it was their problem; it was our problem," Mr. Esber said.  While Ashton-Tate enjoys anywhere from 40% to 65% market share in its field, he said demand for database products has been flat for the past three quarters.  "As we get closer to a new product, dBase IV 1.1, we expect demand for current products to slow down," he added.  Wall Street isn't certain Ashton-Tate can meet its goal of a turnaround by the fourth quarter, but analysts said the belt-tightening is a step in the right direction.  "The plane is heading for the ground.  The pilot is dead.  The co-pilot is reaching for the stick.  Can he pull it up?" said Bahar Gidwani, an analyst with Kidder, Peabody & Co. in New York.  Despite recent personnel shakeups and the departure of Luther Nussbaum as president, the analyst noted, Mr. Esber "has turned the company around before, back in 1985."  Yesterday's loss and layoff prediction "isn't welcome news," Mr. Gidwani said.  "It means we've got to go through one more really painful quarter.  There's a certain lack of confidence he can pull it off."  Still, "I've been encouraged by what's happened," Mr. Gidwani continued.  "They're making headway, making decisions.  They're going to cut costs and make sure they actually ship a product in the fourth quarter.  They've also simplified dBase IV 1.1 {so it's} easy to use."  Mr. Esber isn't certain that he can deliver a profitable fourth quarter.  Asked how confident he is, he replied: "If you can predict this industry three months out, you're better than anybody."  Another analyst, David Readerman of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., said the layoffs were both expected and necessary.  But he gave mixed reviews to the company's product moves announced yesterday.  "They're correcting the bugs and improving performance of the previous version," dBase IV 1.0, he said.  But, he said, what Ashton-Tate is leaving out of the new product, DBase IV 1.1, is the ability to connect with SQL (Structured Query Language) Server, a product jointly developed with Microsoft and Sybase to enable personal computers to tap into mainframe databases.  Said Mr. Readerman: "That's like not building your half of a bridge."  Mr. Esber said in a prepared statement that Ashton made the change because of customer demand for the simplified version.  Staar Surgical Co.'s founder and president has apparently won a battle to oust all his directors and remain at the helm of the maker and marketer of products for small-incision surgery.  Thomas R. Waggoner had earlier this week fired everyone on the company's board but himself, to which the board countered by firing Mr. Waggoner.  But yesterday in California Superior Court in Los Angeles, Mr. Waggoner won a temporary restraining order against the four directors.  The judge ruled that Mr. Waggoner, who had been locked out of Staar, can't be denied access to its buildings.  He also ruled that the directors are barred from stating that Mr. Waggoner has been fired from his firm.  They also can't do business in the name of Staar any longer.  A dispute arose when directors disagreed over Staar's signing of a licensing and sales agreement with Chiron Opthalmics Inc. of Irvine, Calif.  Mr. Waggoner was trying to take the dispute with his directors in stride yesterday morning before the court hearing.  He set up office in front of Staar's building, had a 75-foot telephone extension cord brought out, and was trying to get some work done.  "It was important for him to continue with the routine operations of the business," a spokesman for Mr. Waggoner said.  Attorneys for the directors failed to return telephone calls to comment on the ruling.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Bank of New York Co., offering covering $456,500,000 of debt securities to be offered from time to time.  Ethan Allen Inc., offering of $156 million of senior notes, via Kidder, Peabody & Co. and Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Federal Express Corp., shelf offering of up to $600 million of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  Of the $600 million in securities to be offered, the company plans to offer $200 million of sinking fund debentures, via Kidder Peabody according to a prospectus supplement.  General Host Corp., offering of $100 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Alex.  Browne & Sons.  McDonald's Corp., shelf offering of up to $300 million of debt securities on terms to be determined at the time of sale.  When combined with securities remaining unsold from a previous offering, the filing gives the company as much as $420 million of securities available for sale.  The West German Cartel Office cleared Veba AG's purchase of a 46% interest in Feldmuehle Nobel AG.  The cartel office also gave Veba approval to boost its holding to more than 50% at any time.  The ruling yesterday by the agency, whose approval is needed when a purchase involves a stake in excess of 25%, removed the last hurdle in Veba's acquisition of the Feldmuehle shares.  Veba is a West German energy and chemical concern.  Feldmuehle, which is a paper, chemical and engineering conglomerate, is West Germany's largest paper producer.  A Veba spokesman said yesterday that a possible merger is under study.  Industry observers expect Veba to launch a bid in late 1989 or early 1990 for at least a majority stake in Feldmuehle.  On the Frankfurt Stock Exchange yesterday, Feldmuehle closed at 408 marks ($209), up seven marks, while Veba slipped 1.5 marks to 337 marks.  De Beers Consolidated Mines Ltd. said net income rose 50% in the year's first six months to 1.23 billion rand ($450 million), or 324 cents a share, from 819 million rand, or 216 cents a share, a year earlier.  The world's largest diamond producer has declared an interim dividend of 62.5 cents a share, up 39% from 45 cents a share.  De Beers, based in Johannesburg, said net income was up 25% in dollar terms.  Income on the diamond account increased 39% to 1.33 billion rand from 956 million rand.  Income from investments outside the diamond industry also gained 39% to 338 million rand from 243 million rand.  Other interest income amounted to 349 million rand, up from 108 million rand.  Prospecting, research and general charges increased to 134 million rand, a 46% rise from 92 million rand and interest payable rose 69% to 49 million rand from 29 million rand.  Time-share loans on resort condominiums are the latest vehicle for a novel securities offering.  Miami-based General Development Corp. recently made the first public offering of time-share mortgage securities in a $111.6 million transaction underwritten through PaineWebber Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. General Development is the largest developer in the time-share resort business, which had sales of $2 billion last year.  Time-share agreements give a buyer the use of a condominium for a set period each year, typically a week.  For this, General Development's buyers pay an average of about $10,000.  Because time-share resorts haven't been around for long, and because there have been occasional abuses in the industry, selling time-share mortgage securities publicly wasn't easy, particularly at a relatively slim yield premium above U.S. Treasury securities.  But Financial Security Assurance provided a guarantee on the issue that paved the way for triple-A ratings from Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp.  There were nearly 17,000 loans, mostly on resort condominiums in California, Utah and Florida, packaged into the securities.  Their average balance outstanding is $6,600.  The issue was priced to yield about 9%, one percentage point above the three-year Treasury note rate.  The offering has a final maturity of 10 years and an estimated average life of nearly three years.  Varity Corp.'s proposed $655 million purchase of Fruehauf Corp. showed signs of coming unglued with Fruehauf's successor company saying a condition of the purchase may not have been met.  K-H Corp., the successor company, said "a condition precedent to the merger" of K-H and Varity "may not be satisfied."  Detroit-based K-H said the condition relates to Fruehauf's proceeds from the earlier sale of its trailer and maritime operations to Terex Corp.  Varity, a Toronto-based farm-equipment and auto-parts manufacturer, said the purchase price received by K-H from Terex appears to be $25 million to $35 million less than originally expected.  In a letter last month to K-H Vice Chairman T. Neal Combs, Varity Chairman Victor Rice said Varity would regard any reduction in the purchase price paid by Terex, without Varity's prior written consent, as "a material and willful breach of the Agreement as well as a failure of a condition to Varity's obligations to close under the Agreement."  In a second letter Mr. Rice reiterated his warning, but said Varity will continue to examine K-H's books and records to determine how large the difference actually is and how it came about.  A Varity spokesman declined to say whether the company plans to back out of the transaction.  Wilbur Ross of Rothschild Inc., who represented Fruehauf bondholders in the negotiations with Varity, said that under the terms of the Varity-Fruehauf agreement, the combination of Varity's current stock price and the closing adjustment on the Terex transaction combine to give Varity the opportunity to walk away from the Fruehauf purchase.  But Mr. Ross said he isn't sure that is what Varity wants to do.  "They sound a little frustrated, but they're willing to go off, do the homework, and see what can be resolved," he said.  Even if the purchase does fall through, Mr. Ross said he believes K-H could survive as an independent company.  "We believe {K-H} is a very valuable company, and a perfectly viable one," Mr. Ross said.  K-H officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Varity agreed to buy Fruehauf's remaining assets, principally its Kelsey-Hayes automotive operations, in May.  The transaction is expected to close in mid-September, Mr. Ross said.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Varity closed at $2.75 a share, down 12.5 cents.  Hoechst AG said its group pretax profit rose 8.5% in the first half of 1989 to 2.11 billion marks ($1.08 billion) from 1.94 billion marks the year earlier, but profit fell 2.2% in the second quarter from a year earlier.  Second-quarter earnings at the West German chemical concern slipped to 1.10 billion marks from 1.12 billion marks.  Hoechst said parent company pretax profit climbed 16% in the first half to 1.08 billion marks from 932 million marks a year earlier.  Group sales rose 18% in the second quarter to 11.94 billion marks from 10.15 billion marks.  The company said first-half sales rose 15% from the year earlier to 22.94 billion marks from 19.96 billion marks.  The results were somewhat below market expectations.  Analysts had expected Hoechst's group earnings to increase at least 12% in the first half.  Stocks finished higher, but uncertainty about the near-term outlook for interest rates kept trading volume moderate.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average finished 9.86 points higher at 2687.78.  The bellwether Dow average now rests 34.64 points below its all-time high of 2722.42 attained in August 1987.  A moderate increase in computer-driven program trading helped volume rise to 148,770,000 shares from 142,010,000 Monday.  New York Stock Exchange advancers edged out decliners, 809 to 689.  Investors will comb through today's July data on industrial production, capacity utilization and housing starts for clues about the economy's current strength.  Even without today's data in hand, many investors have concluded that a risk of recession is fading.  That assumption has triggered a mild sell-off in some interestsensitive stocks, such as bank and savings and loan issues, and a rise in commodity-related stocks, such as those of mining companies.  "We seem to be having a correction in pieces rather than the broad market as a whole," said James Gallagher, partner in the Big Board specialist firm Fowler & Rosenau.  The bond market's reaction to today's economic data will probably set the trend for stocks, traders said.  "Bonds have been pulling stocks around like a puppy on a tether," said Arthur Cashin Jr., veteran floor trader at the Big Board.  General Motors climbed 1 1/8 to 45 1/2 in Big Board composite trading of 1.7 million shares as U.S. car sales for early August remained strong and exceeded analysts' expectations.  The other Big Three auto makers also rallied; Ford Motor gained 7/8 to 51 and Chrysler added 7/8 to 25.  Charles Brady, an analyst at Oppenheimer & Co., told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report he believes the auto companies, especially Ford, will have to begin investigating the possibility of increasing fourth-quarter production levels if the current sales pace continues.  However, other analysts cited consumer anticipation of price increases on 1990 models -- due to arrive at showrooms next month -- as a major factor in the latest results.  Metals stocks also helped pace the market's advance.  Phelps Dodge rose 1 3/4 to 71, Asarco gained 5/8 to 32 7/8 and Cyprus Minerals tacked on 1/2 to 27 1/4; in the precious-metals sector, Homestake Mining advanced 1/2 to 13 7/8, Hecla Mining added 1/2 to 14 and Battle Mountain Gold rose 1/4 to 13 3/4.  Other cyclical issues besides GM that boosted the Dow industrials included United Technologies, which went up 1 1/8 to 54 1/2; General Electric, which gained 1/2 to 57 1/8, and Westinghouse Electric, which rose 1 1/8 to 68 5/8.  Among blue-chip consumer stocks, Philip Morris retreated 1 5/8 to 157 5/8 and Procter & Gamble fell 1 1/2 to 125 1/2, while Coca-Cola Co. gained 3/4 to 66 1/8.  Meanwhile, two sectors that have recently improved because of heavy takeover-related buying -- airlines and savings and loans -- gave back some of their gains.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, fell 4 1/4 to 254 1/4.  The pilots union at United implied that the company couldn't be sold or merged without its participation -- a potential obstacle to any bidders.  Sources said UAL held intensive weekend talks with the union about a new contract and possible employee ownership.  AMR, the owner of American Airlines, lost 5/8 to 74 1/8.  Elsewhere in the sector, Delta Air Lines eased 1/2 to 74 1/4, USAir Group slid 5/8 to 49 1/8 and Alaska Air Group declined 1 1/8 to 28.  Savings-and-loan stocks reversed course after rallying in response to provisions in the thrift industry bailout bill that lifted certain restrictions on acquisitions of healthy thrifts.  Golden West Financial fell 1 to 51 3/4, H.F. Ahmanson went down 3/8 to 22 1/4, HomeFed dropped 1/2 to 44 1/4 and Great Western Financial eased 1/4 to 20 3/8.  Sea Containers jumped 4 1/8 to 67 1/8.  Sweden's Stena AB and Britain's Tiphook PLC sweetened their joint takeover offer for the company by $13 a share, to $63.  Di Giorgio, which rejected a $32-a-share takeover proposal from investor Arthur Goldberg, advanced 1 1/8 to 35 1/8.  Its board decided to explore alternatives, including the sale of all or part of the company.  Whirlpool dropped 1 3/4 to 30 1/4.  First Boston issued a sell recommendation on the stock and lowered its earnings estimates.  Zapata fell 7/8 to 2 5/8.  Citing plans for a "comprehensive restructuring," the company said it won't make interest payments due later this year on two debt issues.  Integrated Resources, which revised its restructuring plan and estimated that it would post a $600 million loss for the second quarter, went down 3/4 to 2.  Under the new proposal, the company will either sell or spin off its financial services businesses.  Union Corp. rose 1 1/8 to 14 3/8.  Shearson Lehman Hutton began its coverage of the company with ratings that indicated the stock should outperform the market by 10% to 20%.  The American Stock Exchange Index rose 0.82 to 379.82.  Volume totaled 14,340,000 shares.  Materials Research jumped 3 3/8 to 13 5/8.  Sony agreed to acquire the company for $14 a share.  The state of Alaska sued Exxon Corp. and six other large oil companies alleging that their response to last spring's giant oil spill didn't prevent contamination of hundreds of miles of wilderness shoreline along Prince William Sound.  The suit doesn't list a specific dollar claim because damage assessment isn't yet complete.  However, individuals familiar with Alaska's case estimated that compensatory damages alone could exceed $1 billion if the state prevails.  The suit also demands punitive damages, which these individuals estimate could run to billions more.  Any such awards would be on top of the $1.25 billion in cleanup costs that Exxon has already indicated it will pay.  About $400 million of that is covered by insurance.  Exxon owns the tanker Exxon Valdez that ran aground and has acknowledged responsibility for the spill.  It already faces more than 150 suits by individuals and businesses.  The suit by Alaska is regarded as the cornerstone litigation arising from the spill.  Though it had been expected this summer, the state's filing yesterday in a state court in Anchorage brought some surprises.  For one thing, besides Exxon, it names as defendants a virtual Who's Who of Big Oil.  Included are subsidiaries of Amerada Hess Corp., Atlantic Richfield Co., British Petroleum Co., Mobil Corp., Phillips Petroleum Co. and Unocal Corp. Together, these companies own Alyeska Pipeline Service Co., which was supposed to respond quickly to contain any oil spills in the waters near Valdez.  Alyeska was also charged in the 41-page filing.  In addition, Alaska asked the court to step in and order Exxon to continue its cleanup effort through to completion; "to remove all spilled oil and to restore" the environment.  If the court issues that order, it could be far more demanding than any cleanup commitment extracted by the state so far from Exxon.  Recently, state officials have been engaged in a running semantic debate with Exxon over the progress of the cleanup and whether the company will return next spring for more work.  Exxon has said it expects to complete its cleanup by mid-September but will return in the spring to comply with any reasonable request for further action.  Alaska, however, has had to rely on the U.S. Coast Guard and public opinion to keep pressure on Exxon.  Exxon said in a statement yesterday: "Without reading the complaint, we're not able to comment on the specific charges.  However, we will defend ourselves vigorously."  Yesterday, the company indicated just how aggressive it will be when it filed its first formal legal answers in the massive private civil litigation previously launched against it by fishermen, native groups and others.  For instance, according to attorneys who have read the answers, Exxon is seeking a court order that would reduce any eventual damage awards by the amount it has paid injured parties, such as fishermen, to clean up the spill.  The company argued that punitive damages were barred by "comprehensive" state and federal environmental statutes.  It also hinted that it might bring suit against other entities for "comparative negligence" in responding to the spill; the company has previously complained that government regulators may have hindered cleanup efforts.  Until now, the owners of Alyeska other than Exxon have managed to escape the public spotlight in connection with the Valdez catastrophe.  Alaska is attempting to spread the blame because "these companies exerted such a degree of control over the budget and management of Alyeska that they are indeed responsible for Alyeska's actions," Robert LeResche, head of Alaska's spill inquiry, argued yesterday in an interview.  In a separate interview, Alaska's Attorney General Douglas Bailey contended that attempts by the oil companies to establish Alyeska as an independent entity is "absolute fiction."  Alyeska is owned and funded by the seven oil defendants.  A unit of British Petroleum has slightly more than 50%, and units of Arco and Exxon a little more than 20% each.  The others have smaller stakes.  A committee drawn from the seven owning firms oversees Alyeska.  Yesterday, a spokesman for BP said the company won't be prepared to comment until it sees the complaint and "we have a better idea of what it's all about."  Arco, Phillips, Unocal and Mobil also all declined comment.  Amerada Hess didn't respond to a request for comment.  It's unclear how any damages a court might award would be divvied up among the oil companies.  An especially wild card is the request for punitive damages, which could be sizable.  Though no one can predict whether a court will order them, if one does, they "are typically assessed at a level to get people's attention," said one high-ranking Alaskan.  "And that number would have to be pretty damned high to get the collective attention of these oil companies."  In the interview, Mr. Bailey, the Alaskan attorney general, predicted the state's litigation could be hanging over the head of Exxon's and the other concerns for five to 10 years.  "It could take years" just to assess environmental damages, he said.  He explained that Alaska asked the court to step in on the cleanup issue because "under federal laws, the goal is restoration.  And we'll do what we can do to lean on Exxon to accomplish that goal."  Mr. Bailey dismissed any notion that Exxon's cleanup effort has been helpful to the state, providing high-paying jobs and pumping up local Alaskan economies.  Those, he said, are short-term events.  By contrast, the spill's long-lasting effects on the economy won't be apparent until the cleanup work is complete and the impact on fisheries and other businesses can be assessed, he said.  In the suit, Alaska argues that Exxon is responsible for the grounding of its tanker Exxon Valdez because "it failed to properly staff it."  The complaint charges all the companies through Alyeska with "misrepresenting" their ability to contain and clean up oil spillage.  So, the suit alleges, Exxon and the others are responsible for massive devastation including damage to more than 1,000 square miles of land and water resources, the death of thousands of animals, deterioration of air quality and curtailment of commercial fishing in the area.  In addition, businesses and property have been destroyed, damaging the state's economy, the suit alleges.  Alaska filed its suit at this time to head off any attempt by Exxon to temporarily block it through an ancient maritime law.  Exxon has the right under an Admiralty Law statute established in 1851 to file a petition to limit its liability to the loss of ship and cargo.  If Exxon had beaten Alaska into court with such a petition, the state might have had to wait as much as a year to file its suit, legal experts say.  Exxon's right to file a petition under the maritime statute evaporates within several weeks and individuals familiar with Exxon's strategy say its attorneys haven't yet decided whether to invoke that law.  Whittle Communications Limited Partnership has selected North American Philips Corp. to provide more than $150 million in video hardware and technological assistance for the national launch of its commercially sponsored daily TV news program for schools, sources said.  Two sources said the announcement of the huge Channel One contract award could come as early as today.  Awarding the technology contract would enable Whittle to reaffirm its commitment to the proposed spring 1990 launch of Channel One even as some advertising executives privately speculate that Whittle is having trouble lining up sponsors and schools.  Whittle executives have insisted their rollout plans are on schedule.  Spokesmen for Whittle and North American Philips declined to comment.  Philips, a division of the Dutch electronics giant Philips Industries N.V., was one of three companies that Whittle previously said were under consideration to supply, install and service the video hardware that it plans to give participating Channel One schools.  Philips's consumer electronics subsidiary is based in Knoxville, Tenn., where the media concern has its headquarters.  The key to solving the hostage problem that has been haunting the U.S. ever since 1984 lies with a group of 50 to 70 largely anonymous, crude toughs, few if any of whom are over the age of 30.  They are the same men who were behind the bomb attacks on the American Embassy in Beirut and the Marine headquarters south of the Lebanese capital in 1983.  They pass themselves off as devout Moslems, having "got religion" -- in the form of Shiite fundamentalism -- in their teens or early 20s.  Yet the interests and thinking of these men, who control the fate of the hostages in Lebanon, are not necessarily consonant with those of their Iranian patrons or even of the Shiite clerics who speak on behalf of Hezbollah.  They have been known to reject religious rulings issued by Hezbollah's religious mentor, Sheik Mohammed Hussein Fadlallah, and they have the power to foil any understanding that may be negotiated between Washington and Tehran.  The workings of this group remain largely a mystery, not least because these men are almost totally insulated from the public branches of Hezbollah and adhere to the strictest rules of compartmentalization within their own ranks.  All belong to the Special Security Apparatus of Hezbollah.  It was formed under Iranian guidance in the wake of Israel's 1982 invasion of Lebanon, when Iran sent 1,500 Revolutionary Guards to Lebanon's Bekaa Valley and supervised the merger of the various Shiite fundamentalist groups in Lebanon into Hezbollah.  The Special Security Apparatus, modeled after similar organs of both Amal and the Palestine Liberation Organization, was never formally established by the Hezbollah leadership.  It was Colonel Awa'i, the dynamic Iranian commander in Lebanon, who insisted on the need for a special counterintelligence arm to protect the new organization.  Sheiks like Fadlallah and lesser clerics had neither the experience nor the inclination to engage in this type of work; what interested them was building their flocks into a new type of militia.  So the task fell to younger men who lacked religious credentials but had the experience that disposed them to engage in "special operations."  These young Shiites had been recruited into Fatah, the main component of the PLO before its withdrawal from Beirut in September 1982 and its expulsion, by the Syrians, from the Bekaa Valley and Tripoli a year later.  Bereft of their source of livelihood after the PLO's withdrawal, they began flocking to prayer houses, where they first heard the sermons of Sheik Fadlallah, who preached and wrote extensively about the role of force in Islam.  By then Sheik Fadlallah had become the spiritual guide, though not the actual leader, of the newly created Hezbollah.  For the most part they were young men in their teens and early 20s, devoid of political sophistication but fervent in their hate of Israel and the U.S.  They hailed from impoverished villages in south Lebanon and had resettled in the slums of south Beirut after their families had fled the constant violence there.  Starting out as errand boys in Fatah, a few rose in the ranks of its most ruthless arm, the infamous Force 17.  The man who introduced Lebanese Shiites into Fatah was Mahmoud a-Natour, better known by the nom de guerre, Abu Tayeb.  His reason for doing so was tactical: Shiites, he believed, would be less prone to defect to his rivals within Fatah.  From that standpoint he regarded them as mercenaries who could be employed to do much of the organization's dirty work.  It should be recalled that Abu Tayeb was in charge of the personal security of many Palestinian leaders and institutions, but he quickly developed ambitions of building his own power base by expanding the intelligence and military capabilities of Force 17.  And Mr. Arafat, the master of "divide and rule," was perfectly happy to let him get close to Fatah's intelligence czars, Abu Iyad and the late Abu Jihad.  Under Abu Tayeb, Fatah experts taught the young Shiites all there was to know about tactics, firearms and explosives.  The irony is that in the past year the Special Security Apparatus has taken under its wing Mr. Arafat's most menacing Palestinian rival: the Islamic Jihad, which emerged in the occupied territories during the course of the intifada.  Thus the worm has turned: Shiites who were trained by Fatah are now guiding Palestinian fundamentalists who pose the greatest threat to Fatah within the Palestinian camp.  It has not escaped the attention of the American intelligence community that the latest messages concerning the hostage Joseph Cicippio were accompanied by expressions of support from the Islamic Jihad in Palestine.  The most prominent figure in Hezbollah's Special Security Apparatus is Immad Mughniyeh, who recruited his younger brother Fuad and other members of his clan (one of whom is still serving a prison term in Kuwait for terrorist activities despite all Mughniyeh's efforts to gain his release by conducting further terrorist actions).  The family, which comes from the village of Tir Daba in southern Lebanon, has produced several locally known religious leaders, but Immad Mughniyeh himself was not a devout man until he fell under the spell of Sheik Fadlallah.  Only 22 or so at the time that the Special Security Apparatus began to take shape, he became the brains behind its operations.  Always dressed in a "jalabiyeh" (traditional robe) and with a Kalashnikov rifle slung over his shoulder, he became known as The Haj.  Understandably, he has shied away from publicity; his picture (or what was purported to be a photograph of him) has been published only once -- in an obscure Paris-based Arabic-language weekly.  Mughniyeh passed through France in 1985, but the French let him slip out again after the CIA suggested they take the opportunity to arrest him.  Without question it is Immad Mughniyeh who has been responsible for most of the kidnappings of foreign hostages in Lebanon.  He perfected the art of kidnapping and devised the system of holding the hostages in the maze of alleyways that makes up the southern suburbs of Beirut.  He always operates with very small squads and takes great pains to obtain intelligence on his targets.  Western experts now believe that in some cases American hostages were installed in hiding places within 10 minutes of being snatched.  To move them from one hide-out to another, they are wrapped in adhesive tape, like mummies, and tied to the chassis of a pickup truck.  Two other people known to be associated with these operations are Sheik Hussein Ghabris and Hussein Khalil.  Sheik Ghabris took charge of Mughniyeh's network when The Haj felt that his presence in Beirut was no longer safe and withdrew with his family to Tehran (though he is occasionally still to be seen in South Beirut).  Khalil, as Hezbollah's chief of security, has often acted as the go-between for whoever wished to establish contact with the Special Security Apparatus.  Since the outbreak of the civil war in 1975, kidnapping has been practically a conventional weapon of the warring sects.  Everyone has indulged in it -- the Christians being no exception.  Mughniyeh's innovation was in taking American and then other foreign hostages and using them as an insurance policy to protect Hezbollah.  For more than two years the U.S. has repeatedly urged Israel not to bomb Hezbollah bases for fear that the hostages were being held there.  Such immunity to the sting of the Israeli air force is a luxury enjoyed by no other faction that mounts terrorist operations against Israeli soldiers and civilians.  Thus secure in their strongholds, Mughniyeh and his cohorts pioneered a new method of terrorism -- the suicide bombers first tested out against the Americans in Beirut and then quickly turned against the Israelis in the south.  The Special Security Apparatus has had some rather heated disputes on this issue with Hezbollah's religious leadership.  On the face of it, these theological polemics revolved around hair-splitting on the purposes for which it is permissible to send a pious Moslem to his death.  Mughniyeh had few qualms about sending people off on suicide missions in explosive-packed cars, but some of the sheiks held that it was against the tenets of Islam to squander human lives for political gain.  They forced Mughniyeh to keep the names of his suicide bombers secret, and only recently has Hezbollah allowed these drivers to prepare a videotaped "last will and testament" to be released after the operation is completed.  Such differences do not extend to the realm of hostage-taking, however.  The sheiks ruled that all foreigners in Lebanon, regardless of their reason for being there, were enemies of Islam and therefore fair game.  Of the many quarters that have tried to exert pressure on the Special Security Apparatus, the Iranians are in the best position to get their way.  President Hashemi Rafsanjani recently was able to show the U.S. that his word carries considerable weight in south Beirut.  But the people holding the hostages have been cultivated for years by the rival faction of the Iranian leadership led by Interior Minister Ali Akbar Mokhtashemi, who attended the birth of the security apparatus and financed it while serving as Ayatollah Khomeini's ambassador to Damascus.  Since the Israeli abduction of Sheik Abdul Karim Obeid, Mr. Mokhtashemi has been urging his Lebanese allies to hang tough and to mount new attacks against American targets wherever possible.  The tone and message of his public statements have been very different from those of Mr. Rafsanjani and his clique.  Since Mughniyeh enjoys the patronage of the radical faction in Tehran (though that could well be changing), one of the main concerns today is that the fate of the hostages will become a weapon in the struggle for control of the new government in Iran.  So far it is believed that Mr. Rafsanjani has managed to win the allegiance of the top echelon of the Lebanese Hezbollah, including Sheik Fadlallah.  But to the people actually holding the hostages, Mr. Rafsanjani's signals to Washington may well smack of betrayal.  Indeed, why should they give up the captives who provide them with both safety and status?  They know that once the hostages are released, they will either have to leave Lebanon or be stalked by an array of "bounty hunters" eager to ingratiate themselves with the West.  For people like Mustafa Khorshid and Abed Yunis -- two of the hostage-holders -- a deal for release inevitably means exile.  Thus the early indications are that the toughest nut to crack in the effort to engineer the release of the hostages will be these Fatah-trained "born-again Shiites" who care far more about their own future than the potential of Mr. Rafsanjani's political maneuvers.  ---  Mr. Ya'ari, Arab affairs correspondent of Israel Television, is author of "Israel's Lebanon War" (Simon & Schuster, 1984).  ALASKA SUED EXXON and six other major oil companies, claiming their response to last spring's giant oil spill allowed hundreds of miles of Alaskan shoreline to be contaminated.  The suit, which is considered the cornerstone litigation arising from the accident, could result in damage awards running into billions of dollars, sources estimate.  ---  Integrated Resources proposed a new debt restructuring that would slash the potential payout to creditors and give common shareholders almost nothing.  The last-ditch plan essentially would involve selling off much of the troubled company.  ---  Wang Laboratories is expected to announce today a long-delayed loan restructuring agreement with its banks.  Still, the computer company remains in a crisis condition as it searches for a new president.  ---  Eastern Airlines said it plans to boost its schedule to 600 flights a day by Sept. 7 but will need more help from its sister carrier Continental to pull it off.  Eastern also is reducing fares in a special fall promotion.  ---  U.S. car and light truck sales rose 8.2% in early August, helped by heavy discounts and consumer concerns about higher prices on 1990 models.  Each of the Big Three auto makers posted overall sales gains, though GM's domestic car sales slumped.  Auto makers are trying to obscure some of the heftiest price increases in years on their 1990 model cars.  ---  United Air's pilots union said it intends to participate in any transaction involving the airline.  The union also hinted it would prefer to team up with management, displaying a chilly attitude toward suitor Marvin Davis.  ---  Dayton Hudson's profit doubled in the second quarter and J.C. Penney's jumped 21%, aided by brisk apparel sales.  Both retailers are optimistic about the rest of the year.  ---  The Philippines reached a proposed debt accord that would require major bank creditors to contribute to a $1.2 billion loan or offer the country some debt relief, a banker said. ---  Pinnacle West Capital reached a compromise accord with Arizona regulators that allows it to get badly needed capital from its utility unit.  ---  Ashton-Tate plans to cut its work force 15% to 20% and take other cost-cutting steps, saying it expects losses to widen in the third quarter.  ---  Sea Containers received a sweetened bid from Stena Holding and Tiphook of $63 a share, or $963 million.  Its stock surged $4.125, to $67.125.  ---  Varity's proposed takeover of Fruehauf for $655 million is showing signs of coming apart.  ---  A Boeing unit overcharged the Air Force by nearly $5.9 million on various computer projects between 1983 and 1987, according to the GAO.  ---  Stocks and bonds rebounded from Monday's declines, while the dollar finished mixed.  The Dow Jones industrials closed up 9.86 points, at 2687.78.  Petroleum prices gained slightly.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 148,770,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2687.78, up 9.86; transportation 1404.69, off 9.25; utilities 217.74, up 1.51.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3287.63, up 25.47.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.27, up 0.04; spot index 129.97, up 0.33.  Dollar: 142.20 yen, up 0.25; 1.9430 marks, off 0.0055.  Petroleum prices rose slightly, but they may be on the brink of resuming their recent slide.  That's the view of a growing number of oil analysts, who foresee a renewed weakening in oil markets unless the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries trims output.  OPEC production had been expected to come down some in the third quarter from the second-quarter level of more than 21 million barrels a day.  But output for July remained at around 21.3 million barrels a day despite a second-half production ceiling of 19.5 million barrels a day.  This month, OPEC's output appears to be surging even higher.  By most accounts, it is averaging between 21.5 million and 22 million barrels a day while demand for OPEC oil is generally estimated at around 20.5 million.  "The erosion in oil prices is not likely to abate unless OPEC acts decisively to curtail production by containing leakage," said Michael Rothman, vice president and senior energy analyst at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, New York.  In lackluster trading yesterday, crude oil prices were mostly higher.  On European spot markets, North Sea crudes were generally around $17 a barrel, up 10 cents to 25 cents a barrel.  In U.S. futures trading, the price of the September contract for West Texas Intermediate crude settled at $18.68 a barrel, up 10 cents.  Oil prices rallied last week and could rally again this week in the wake of the latest report by the American Petroleum Institute on U.S. oil statistics.  The report, released yesterday after New York Mercantile Exchange trading had closed, showed big drawdowns last week in inventories of both crude oil and gasoline.  Still, there are signs that petroleum demand is turning sluggish, and crude prices are $1 to $2 a barrel lower than they were only a month ago.  Many analysts now expect prices to fall further, although they differ over how much.  A month ago, Vahan Zanoyan, the senior director of the Washington-based Petroleum Finance Co., accurately forecast the price slide that developed through early August.  Now, he looks for sufficient downward pressure over the next three weeks to drop prices as much as an additional $1 a barrel.  He said the futures price of WTI could fall to $17.50, or possibly even $17.  Antonio M. Szabo, a vice president of Bonner & Moore Market Consultants, Houston, is more optimistic on crude prices.  Still, he said, in the "very short term," they will weaken further.  "We are going to test the below-$18 range for WTI once again," he said.  Several analysts suggested that the price declines should be enough to spur the oil ministers of OPEC toward new production discipline when they meet in Geneva starting Sept. 23.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices rose for the fifth consecutive session on concern over production disruptions.  The September contract ended with a gain of 1.5 cents a pound at $1.215.  In just five trading sessions since Aug. 1, the price of the September contract has risen a total of 11.4 cents.  William O'Neill, vice president of research for Elders Futures Inc., New York, cited the 40-day strike at the Highland Valley mines in British Columbia, Canada, as one of the main reasons for the price advance.  "Talks have bogged down, and the principals may have to work out their problems themselves," he said.  "The mediator has other commitments, and a vacation {for the mediator is} coming up.  Negotiations have been suspended at least until next week."  The strike began July 9.  A settlement had been expected for two weeks.  Highland Valley is Canada's largest producer, at about 180,000 tons a year.  According to Mr. O'Neill, the main stumbling blocks are the questions of wages and the practice of contracting out work by the refinery, which the union opposes.  The Peruvian national miners' strike that began Monday has caused 25% to 50% of that nation's miners to leave their jobs, Mr. O'Neill said.  "The danger is that the strike will spread as time goes on," he added.  Peru is the world's sixth-largest copper producer.  Richard Hirsch, a trader at Sharps Pixley, Inc., New York metals brokers, said the Peruvian strike is having a strong impact -- even though it was expected -- because it actually occurred.  "Previous strikes had difficulty getting going," he noted.  Mr. Hirsch said a threat by workers at a Mexican copper producer to go on strike on Aug. 27, along with the continued paralysis at the Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea, and the Highland Valley situation are contributing to copper's climbing price.  Mr. O'Neill of Elders observed that, technically, the market was very strong, with the September contract having twice broken above the $1.20 level.  "This indicates that a test may be shaping up of $1.25 and even possibly of the life-of-contract high of $1.315 set back on March 3," he said.  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Futures prices rose across the board in response to the weather outlook and concern over the possible deterioration of U.S. crops.  After the close of trading Monday, the government issued its weekly crop progress report, which shows that the nation's harvest was hurt in the past week by a lack of moisture, said Gerald Zusel, an analyst with Balfour Maclaine Futures Inc., Chicago.  He said the rally in soybeans reflected the concern over the prospect for reduced yields.  He said: "There's very little subsoil moisture in many areas in the Midwest," which need rains to sustain the plants through their final weeks of development.  He added that without added rains, the market is going to "tend to want to rally over the next week or so."  Soybean-futures prices for August delivery rose 20 cents to $6.225 a bushel.  Separately, the National Weather Service late Monday issued its closely watched 30-day forecast, which called for below-normal precipitation in the heart of the Corn Belt.  Corn futures also benefited from rumors that Mexico plans to make a bid for 400,000 metric tons this week.  SUGAR: Futures prices extended Monday's decline, although on a smaller scale.  The October contract eased by 0.19 cent a pound to 13.44 cents.  The failure of India to buy 250,000 tons of physical sugar on the world market continued to affect the market, according to one analyst.  London prices were weak, and this trend was reflected in New York, he said.  Egypt was reported to have bought 70,000 tons or more of refined sugar and is expected to purchase an additional 20,000 to 30,000 tons tomorrow, the analyst said.  "However, this buying doesn't compensate for the lack of demand from a major nation, such as India," he said.  Nevertheless, according to another analyst, the Egyptian buying did cushion yesterday's price decline.  That indicates there continues to be strong underlying demand for sugar on price dips.  Adage Inc., Billerica, Mass., said General Business Investment Corp. is "no longer interested" in merging with Adage on the terms set forth in a letter of intent and that the letter has been terminated.  General Business said it terminated the letter because its review of Adage's operations had shown the company's "asserted value -- a basic premise of the letter of intent -- to be materially deficient and continues to diminish."  James D. Norrod, Adage president, said the company, which makes computer graphic workstations, would seek another strategic business combination.  It said, however, that General Business is "likely to press its efforts to take control of Adage."  Closely held General Business is a holding company based in West Chester, Pa.  Separately, Adage reported a first-quarter profit of $109,000, or one cent a share, on revenue of about $3 million.  In the year-earlier period, the company had a loss of $430,000, after a gain from discontinued operations of $2.2 million, on revenue of about $5.7 million.  Di Giorgio Corp., San Francisco, said its board unanimously rejected an unsolicited $32-a-share tender offer by DIG Acquisition Corp. as inadequate.  But directors left open the door for a suitor with a better offer for the San Francisco-based marketer and distributor of food products and building materials.  DIG, a unit of Rose Partners Limited Partnership and its sole general partner, Arthur M. Goldberg, began its offer Aug. 3.  However, the investor began his pursuit in February and was spurned in a $30-a-share offer in June.  A spokesman for Mr. Goldberg said the New Jersey investor had no comment on Di Giorgio's latest decision.  Di Giorgio's board said it has authorized Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. to explore all of its alternatives, including the sale of all or part of the company.  Di Giorgio, which has 5.1 million shares outstanding, closed yesterday at $35.125 a share, up $1.125, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Suter PLC said it holds a 5.9% stake in Sudbury Inc. and may in the future seek to acquire the company.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Suter said it will review its investment in Sudbury on a continuing basis and may in the future, depending on various circumstances, make a proposal to acquire Sudbury "through a tender offer, merger, consolidation, or otherwise."  It also might make a proposal to acquire all or some of Sudbury's assets or businesses or to combine some or all of the companies' assets, the filing said.  According to the filing, Suter holds, through its Longform Ltd. subsidiary, 752,000 Sudbury common shares, including 482,000 shares bought from June 19 to Aug. 11 for $5.25 to $5.7725 each.  Suter, based in Lincolnshire, England, is a holding company for a group of industrial and distribution businesses and property interests.  Officials of Cleveland-based Sudbury couldn't be reached for comment.  Joel Rocha Garza, a Mexican investor, said he and a holding company he controls, Clarendon Group Ltd., raised their stake in Smith Laboratories Inc. to 7.64% of the common shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Mr. Garza said he and Clarendon hold 983,600 shares, including 169,500 bought from June 20 to Aug. 11 for $2.0625 to $2.50 each.  Mr. Garza said in a previous filing that he is considering voting against the proposed merger between Smith and International Power Machines Corp. Mesquite, Texas.  Smith is based in San Diego.  A spokesman for the maker and supplier of surgical products said the company hadn't seen the filing and had no comment.  New York Times Co. said it completed the sale of its cable-television system for $420 million and will realize an after-tax gain of about $193 million, or $2.46 a share.  The system, NYT Cable TV, was sold to a limited partnership whose owners include Garden State Cablevision Inc., a minority investment group organized by J. Bruce Llewellyn; Comcast Corp., Bala Cynwyd, Pa., and Lenfest Communications Inc., 49%-owned by Tele-Communications Inc., Denver.  NYT Cable TV serves 59 largely upscale communities in southern New Jersey.  Under a Federal Communications Commission program to promote opportunities for minorities in ownership of communications companies, the FCC will issue a tax certificate that will enable the New York-based publisher to defer tax on the transaction's gain.  A spokeswoman said the company would use part of the proceeds to pay down about $350 million of debt including $100 million borrowed in July, a portion of which was used to acquire McCall's magazine.  The company has interests in newspapers, magazines, television, radio and forest products.  Rochester Gas & Electric Corp. said it filed a request for a $40 million annual increase in electric revenues and a $7 million increase in gas revenues with the New York Public Service Commission.  The company requested that the 7.4% electric revenues increase and the 2.7% gas increase take effect July 1990.  It said the boost is needed to offset inflation and higher operating and maintenance expenses.  The dollar was mixed as the market busied itself with locking in profits ahead of a series of U.S. economic indicators.  In light of the volatile trading that often surrounds the release of major economic data, participants were eager to reduce their vulnerability to reports on U.S. industrial activity in July, scheduled for release today, and on the merchandise trade deficit, scheduled for release tomorrow, foreign-exchange traders said.  "It was trading as you'd expect running into numbers," said Dennis Pettit, vice president at PaineWebber International in New York.  "People don't seem to be committed to holding substantial positions."  Dealers said, however, that sentiment for the U.S. currency remains bullish, and should the figures suggest a continued reprieve from a series of credit easings by the U.S. Federal Reserve, the dollar will resume its recent rally.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9430 marks, down from 1.9485 marks, and at 142.20 yen up from 141.95 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5750, down from $1.5772.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 141.70 yen, down from Tuesday's Tokyo close of 142.20 yen.  On Tuesday, the dollar held to a narrow range in quiet Asian trading, marked solely by ineffectual rumors of an intervention by the Bank of Japan to support the yen in morning trading.  European dealings also proved quiet as a religious holiday closed many major trading centers.  But the pound sank far enough to provoke intervention late in the European day by the Bank of England to support that currency.  The intervention helped boost sterling, but it still finished with the steepest losses among major currencies.  Traders attributed the fall largely to the flight of "hot" money, which was parked in sterling to reap high interest rates while the dollar languished recently.  The dollar's steep gains since Thursday and the potential for more volatility in the wake of this week's economic data prompted the move from the pound, traders said.  They said declines in the British bond market also encouraged pound sales.  Dollar trading was choppy during relatively thin New York dealings.  The activity was biased toward profit-taking after the dollar's steep climb left participants holding fresh long positions.  In the New York afternoon, the dollar hit the intraday high of 1.9500 marks and then swung to its low of 1.9358 marks, aided by rumors of a surreptitious Fed intervention.  The rumors were met with skepticism by many traders, who said the desire to lock in profits would easily account for the dollar's movements.  The readings on July industrial activity are expected to show production increasing a marginal 0.2%, while the operating rate is seen unchanged at 83.5%.  The June trade figures should show the deficit shrank to $9.4 billion from $10.24 billion in May.  Economists said they will be closely watching the trade data for signs that the stronger dollar has hurt the competitiveness of U.S. exports.  Despite the concentration on the U.S. trade picture, the market was largely undisturbed by comments from U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills, who said the U.S. current account deficit in international payments "may build a little, over the next year to 18 months."  She added that the revived dollar factored in her projection for scant improvement in the U.S. trade balance.  Traders said the long-term projection didn't relate closely to the immediate focus of the market on current dollar levels.  There was also no lasting response to a statement by President Bush, supporting his budget director, Richard Darman, who suggested Sunday that the Fed may have erred on the side of restrictiveness in credit policy and deserves the blame if the U.S. economy tips into recession.  The Fed cherishes its independence from political pressure, traders said, and public exhortations have had minimal success in the past.  On New York's Commodity Exchange, gold for current delivery rose $3.60, to $370.70 an ounce, in moderate trading.  Estimated volume was 3.3 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was quoted at $368.60 an ounce.  BUSH SAID Iran could win release of Western hostages if it wanted to.  In the clearest signal yet that he believes Tehran holds the key to freeing the 16 Western hostages being held in Lebanon, the president said at a pre-vacation news conference that there was a "good likelihood" they would be freed if the Iranian government wanted them to be.  But he added that he was unable to say whether the captives are close to being released.  The president also said he hasn't ordered military retaliation for the death of hostage Lt. Col. William Higgins.  The U.S. said it would participate in a World Court case brought by Iran over the shooting down of an Iranian airliner by a U.S. warship last year.  ---  POLAND'S JARUZELSKI CALLED an emergency meeting of all political parties.  As the country's political crisis deepened, Solidarity said it was ready to form a government with Communist participation.  Solidarity leader Walesa softened his previous terms for entering a coalition government by saying the opposition would accept a deal allowing Communists to keep the defense and interior ministries.  The crisis flared Monday when Prime Minister Kiszczak said he is ready to resign and abandon efforts to form a Communist government.  As Kiszczak's proposal to form a coalition led by the Peasant Party faltered, Walesa said he would serve as prime minister "if society wants it."  ---  Syrian troops pounded the Christian enclave north of Beirut as Lebanese militias and parties backed by Syria and Iran held a war council in Damascus to prepare for an all-out assault to oust Christian leader Aoun.  U.N. Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar called a rare emergency session of the Security Council to try to arrange a cease-fire.  ---  F.W. de Klerk was sworn in as acting president of South Africa and pledged to speed the limited apartheid reforms begun by his predecessor, P.W. Botha, who resigned Monday.  Washington said it hoped for an "active dialogue" with the new leadership.  Anti-apartheid activists were skeptical about the prospect for major change.  ---  Soviet legislators traveled to Estonia to hear out angry workers as strikes spread in the Baltic republic.  Pravda published a toughly worded article blasting "nationalist hysteria" in the region and blaming a law passed by Estonia's Parliament for igniting labor unrest among ethnic Russians and other non-Estonians in the republic.  ---  A Trident 2 missile exploded seconds after it was launched from the nuclear submarine USS Tennessee off the coast of Florida.  It was the second failure in three sea trials of the missile, which has been billed as the Navy's deadliest and most accurate weapon.  The cause of the failure isn't yet known.  ---  A lawyer decisively won the Democratic nomination in an ethnically tense battle to succeed the late Rep. Claude Pepper.  Unofficial returns showed Gerald Richman with 61% of the vote and Rosario Kennedy with 39%.  Richman will face Republican Florida Sen. Ileana Ros-Lehtinen on Aug. 29.  ---  Ethiopian authorities recovered the bodies of Texas Rep. Mickey Leland and 15 others killed in an Aug. 7 plane crash during an inspection tour of relief efforts near the Sudan border.  Bush paid tribute to Leland and Mississippi Rep. Larkin Smith, who died in a plane crash Sunday in Mississippi, calling them "outstanding public servants."  ---  A Chinese airliner crashed near Shanghai airport after an aborted takeoff on a flight to the southern city of Nanchang.  The official Xinhua news agency initially reported that 33 people died in the crash of the Antonov-24 airliner, but the report was later revised to say that 18 people were killed and that rescue efforts were continuing.  ---  Rioters in Northern Ireland hurled gasoline bombs and rocks in clashes with police in Londonderry on the 20th anniversary of the deployment of British troops in the city.  Police arrested and deported Irish-American activist Martin Galvin, an official of the Irish Northern Aid Committee, for violating a ban on entering British territory.  ---  Two Soviet cosmonauts are scheduled to blast off Sept. 6 on a mission to reactivate the Mir space station, which was mothballed in April because of budget constraints.  Highlights of the six-month mission are to include the testing of a "space motorcycle" and shower and the installation of docking facilities for the Soviet space shuttle.  ---  A South Korean student was arrested as she crossed the border from North Korea after a six-week visit to promote reunification of the divided peninsula.  Im Su Kyong, whose visit attracted wide attention in both countries, and a clergyman who accompanied her were arrested by South Korean troops for visiting an enemy country.  The Treasury plans to raise $525 million in new cash with the sale Monday of about $14.4 billion in short-term bills to redeem $13.89 billion in maturing bills.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills maturing on Nov. 24 and Feb. 22, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  The average interest rate rose to 8.69% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.347% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $545 million were submitted.  Accepted bids were at 8.69%.  Citicorp also said the average rate rose to 8.427% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 8.058% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $505 million were submitted.  Accepted bids were at 8.427%.  The bank holding company will auction another $50 million Tuesday for each maturity.  MSR Exploration Ltd.'s chairman, president and chief executive officer, J.V. Montalban, disclosed that management is holding talks with an investor group over the sale of a 25% block of shares currently owned by directors, officers and certain employees.  The oil and gas exploration and production concern declined to say what price it is seeking.  But Mr. Montalban said the talks, with a group that includes oil and gas investor Otto J. Buis of Fort Worth, Texas, are proceeding well.  "We're in the ballpark," he said.  "We feel it's a doable deal."  Mr. Montalban said the sale is linked to his decision to step down as head of the company.  He added that the acquiring group may subsequently opt to make a bid for the shares that will remain in public hands.  With 8,005,667 common shares outstanding, MSR's market valuation is about $12 million, based on its closing price of $1.50, unchanged, in American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  A Williams Cos. pipeline unit said it agreed to pay Amoco Corp. above-market prices for natural gas from the giant Hugoton field in Kansas to prevent Amoco from walking away from a 39-year-old contract.  Under regulations from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, Amoco received permission to raise the price it gets for the gas to $3.24 for each thousand cubic feet from the average it had been receiving of $1.29.  Current spot prices from the Hugoton are roughly $1.60 a thousand cubic feet.  If Williams didn't accept the new terms, Amoco could terminate the contract.  A Williams spokesman said the company has been trying to round up "realistically priced gas" from other suppliers and will buy only as much Amoco gas as it needs to maintain service to its customers.  Williams said a number of factors, including hard-to-predict winter demand, will determine how much gas it will buy from Amoco.  Finding other supplies quickly could be difficult because the Amoco gas accounted for about 55% of the pipeline's dedicated reserves.  "We don't know for sure how much of the present deliverability out of this field we can replace from other sources," the Williams spokesman said.  Gas producers have been growing reluctant to enter into long-term supply commitments on the belief gas prices could rise sharply in coming years.  Williams operates other pipelines and is expanding into the telecommunications business.  Amoco, based in Chicago, is a major oil company.  Tele-Communications Inc. cited recent acquisitions and related debt as its loss for the second quarter widened from a year earlier.  The cable television and theater operator reported a loss of $63.6 million, compared with the year-earlier loss of $21.9 million.  Revenue rose 32% to $726.4 million from $551 million.  Operating costs and expenses as a percentage of revenue have remained fairly constant, the company said, but several acquisitions led to increased indebtedness and increased depreciation and amortization.  Those transactions included the completion of the purchase of a 42.5% indirect interest in SCI Holdings, which TCI bought in a joint venture.  A spokesman said that the net impact of that acquisition, both through a pickup of losses plus financing costs, generated roughly $30 million of TCI's losses in the second quarter.  The second transaction was the combination of United Cable Television Corp. and United Artists Communications Inc., which merged May 25 and became United Artists Entertainment.  TCI owns 56% of United Artists Entertainment, which owns more than 2,000 movie theater screens, mostly in the U.S.  Phoenix Technologies Ltd. said its president and chief executive officer, Lance E. Hansche, stepped down to become executive vice president.  The company said Theodore R. Joseph, a director of Phoenix and formerly president of Softbridge Microsystems Corp., was named interim president and chief executive officer while the company searches for a permanent successor.  A Phoenix spokesman said the executive change was made because "the company is at a stage where it needs to supplement the existing management team with outside resources."  Mr. Hansche was named chief executive officer in May.  Last month, the company's stock nosedived after it reported a loss of $998,000 for the third quarter ended June 30, compared with profit of $2.1 million, or 24 cents a share, a year earlier.  The Phoenix spokesman asserted that the company's decision to replace Mr. Hansche as president and chief executive wasn't related to its third-quarter loss.  Phoenix sells equipment to personal computer makers to enable their machines to be compatible with those made by International Business Machines Corp.  The company attributed its third-quarter loss to restructuring expenses and lower-than-expected sales in a product line aimed at workstations.  In his new position, Mr. Hansche will be in charge of computer and business development groups, Phoenix said.  Medstone International Inc. said Richard L. Penfil resigned as president and a director, and P. Joshua Burke resigned as vice president, regulatory affairs.  "I am proud of our accomplishments and now look forward to the pursuit of personal interests that were set aside during the years required to build Medstone," Dr. Penfil, 51 years old, said in a statement issued by the company.  Dr. Penfil has served as president since October 1985.  Dr. Penfil and Mr. Burke, 38, couldn't be reached for further comment.  Freeman Rose, Medstone's chairman and chief executive officer, said of the resignations that, "We have reformed our medical regulatory department and have no need to fill these positions in the immediate future.  Our management strength has increased substantially in the past year, and we expect only minimal impact on the progress of our medical and regulatory activities."  The resignations came as Medstone disclosed that it had informed the Food and Drug Administration of the company's "non-compliance" in submitting required reports and meeting certain technical standards for the X-ray imaging system used in its shockwave lithotripter, a device for treating kidney stones.  Mr. Rose said the resignations were unrelated to the non-compliance.  Medstone said it believes "the hazard presented by the non-compliance is not significant" and that the company "has developed a plan of corrective action."  The company is conducting clinical trials to win FDA approval for its system to treat gallstones as well.  Medstone said yesterday the FDA has notified it that its submission of clinical data on the gallstone treatment is complete and that the agency can now begin considering Medstone's application for approval of the system.  Movietime Channel Inc. said it signed an agreement with Time Inc.'s Home Box Office Inc. under which HBO will assume day-to-day management responsibility for the Movietime cable channel.  Movietime also said that two cable system operators, Tele-Communications Inc. and Comcast Corp., have agreed in principle to become equity partners in Movietime.  Terms weren't disclosed, but TCI and Comcast will bring to 10 the number of cable system operators and cable programmers who own the bulk of Movietime.  HBO, which will now manage Movietime's sales, marketing and programming, is already an equity partner in Movietime.  So is American Television & Communications Corp., a cable operator that is 80% owned by Time.  A channel featuring movie previews, celebrity interviews and entertainment news, Movietime has been managed by one of its founders, Larry Namer, said a spokesman.  Mr. Namer, who was president and chief executive officer, will remain a director and shareholder.  A spokesman said that "it was a collective decision of the board that at this stage in the channel's growth, HBO should assume management control."  Launched in 1987, Movietime is currently offered by 498 cable systems serving more than 14 million subscribers, the company said.  When Chase Manhattan Corp. started selling stocks here in the world's richest financial market, it put on a bash at Tokyo's ritziest hotel.  Halfway through the evening, the food ran out.  That awkward episode could serve as a metaphor for the U.S. bank's troubled experience as a foreign stockbrokerage firm in Japan.  Recently, only two years after the canape crisis spoiled its opening reception, Chase Manhattan's profit-starved securities unit all but gave up its high-stakes effort at dealing in shares for its own account and let go its last expatriate stockbroker.  Trying a safer approach, the bank now just wants to sell stocks to big investors in Japan.  At a rival firm across town, the mood is far different.  Deryck C. Maughan, chairman of Salomon Brothers Inc.'s Tokyo operation, can barely conceal his pride as he peruses a chart showing chronic losses at other foreign securities houses.  "There's a separation going on," Mr. Maughan declares.  Pointing to his own firm's soaring profit figures, he avers: "We're in a different business than they are."  Half a decade after foreign brokerage firms began expanding in earnest in Japan, winners and losers are emerging.  While most are struggling to survive in this costly, ferociously competitive market, the burgeoning and often brazen Tokyo units of a few well-steered Wall Street houses have become key players -- and crucial to their parent companies' global success.  Salomon best exemplifies the aggressive winners.  Desks are crammed into offices to accommodate the constant flow of new employees.  Urgently needed computers spill over into nearby office towers in Tokyo's expensive Akasaka district.  The payoff is evident: In the six months ended March 31, pretax income was up 31% to $53 million, by far the best performance of any foreign securities house in Tokyo.  That isn't bad for a remote unit of an inconsistent group that earned $280 million world-wide in 1988.  Salomon isn't the only Tokyo success story.  While Morgan Stanley Japan Ltd. eked out only a thin $5.8 million pretax profit in the fiscal half-year to March 31, business is booming.  In Tokyo, where rates are fixed, commission income now routinely outpaces that in New York, where deregulated commissions are shrinking.  At rival Goldman Sachs & Co., one official in New York estimates, nearly one in five trades executed world-wide now is somehow Japan-related.  "The opportunities here are huge," observes John S. Wadsworth Jr., who presides over Morgan Stanley Group Inc.'s fast-growing Tokyo office just a block from the Imperial Palace.  Last Dec. 7, Morgan Stanley showed what a talented foreign firm can do when it stunned Tokyo with the first instance of computer-driven program trading.  Single-handedly, Morgan Stanley lifted the stock market to a record, leaving jaws agape at many bigger Japanese firms. (The risks in relatively uncharted waters can be huge, too; last year, a slippery speculator left Morgan Stanley holding the bag on a $7 million deal.)  On the whole, the foreign losers vastly outnumber the winners.  For while the opportunities are huge, so are the obstacles.  Though Japan's markets are vast and cash-swollen (the Tokyo Stock Exchange's total capitalization is nearly three times that of the New York exchange) foreign firms account for only about 7% of turnover.  And the competition is daunting, with financial titan Nomura Securities Co. alone on some days controlling a quarter of all retail business.  Worse, the overhead costs in Tokyo are the world's highest; expatriates' apartments rent for more than $10,000 a month and a secretary's salary easily can top $50,000.  Some of the 49 licensed foreign stockbrokerage firms in Tokyo already have all but closed down because of mounting losses.  Most notable were the sweeping cutbacks last year at the securities units of banking powerhouses like Chase, Citicorp and Security Pacific Corp.  U.S. banks are relatively inexperienced in the securities business, having entered it after Britain three years ago allowed them to buy London-based brokerage firms.  The inexperience showed after the October 1987 stock-market crash.  In Japan, with costs sky-high and business skimpy, losses started piling up.  Instead of cutting costs and hanging on for better days, the banks decided to cut their losses.  At Citicorp, a unit-by-unit insistance on profitability sank Scrimgeour Vickers International Inc., which once had been among the premier foreign firms in Tokyo.  In 1987, Vickers spent months hiring Japanese staff for a 15-person team to sell stocks to Japanese corporations, then let most of them go only a few months after the crash.  That decision, which Citicorp officials defend as necessary cost-cutting at a loss-making unit, crippled the firm's standing in the securities business in a land where long-term patience is prized over short-term profits.  "It was crazy," says one former Vickers employee.  "They thought nothing of hiring somebody with 10 years of experience and the promise of lifetime employment at a Japanese firm, and then firing them.  It ruined the name in the market."  Today, the bank-owned firm's best salesmen and analysts are scattered among other upstart foreign firms.  Yet even those jobs may not be safe.  Fueled by news that the combined net losses of the 36 biggest foreign firms topped 2.3 billion yen ($161.8 million at today's exchange rates) in the half year ended March 31, rumors are swirling that one or more of the 22 foreign members of the Tokyo Stock Exchange plan to give up their seats.  That would be embarrassing just now.  The exchange is thinking about letting in more foreign members just four years after it finally agreed under international pressure to open up to foreign members.  The candidates: Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd. and James Capel & Co. of Britain, Bankers Trust Co. of the U.S. and a unit of French bank Credit Lyonnais.  Not all the probable new entrants are excited about the prospect of winning seats, though.  The annual cost of maintaining a seat is about a billion yen, or $7 million, current members say, and foreign firms worry privately about being able to generate enough business to pay the bill.  To make money in Japan, foreign firms need either breadth or a specialty.  But few smaller firms have the kind of international operations and trading expertise that give the cornerstone U.S. firms an edge in the markets.  Credit Lyonnais, for example, doesn't sell U.S. Treasury securities -- the major target of Japanese money -- while the stockbroker arms of West Germany's Dresdner Bank and Deutsche Bank hope to survive mainly as conduits for German money into Japan.  To big Japanese investors, a wide range of services and trading technology is invaluable.  "We want to use foreign firms to buy Japanese stocks as well as {U.S.} Treasurys, futures and options," says a fund manager at one of Japan's giant life insurers.  Few Japanese firms offer such a wide range of services, so investors look to the foreigners.  Yet the fund manager recalls trying to buy U.S. Treasurys and also arrange a hedge against currency risk, only to be told that the foreign firm he was talking to couldn't handle the order without calling in another broker.  "Why deal with that?" the fund manager asks.  Experiences such as this drive customers into the arms of the big houses, one reason that the top five foreign firms in Japan all are Wall Street giants: Salomon, Morgan Stanley, Goldman, Merrill Lynch & Co. and CS First Boston Inc. Even the big Japanese firms need their U.S. counterparts: Many rely on the U.S. firms to execute large-lot orders for U.S. securities during the Tokyo day, when it is night in New York.  That is because the risk-averse Japanese firms dislike carrying big positions on their books.  "You can get hammered to beat hell, but at least our people are comfortable with the possibility they can get hammered," says Henry James, a managing director at Goldman in Tokyo.  "The Japanese aren't."  For foreign securities firms, as with any business here, patience is a key to success.  Most of those succeeding have stuck it out through deficits.  Merrill Lynch was the first foreign firm to set up shop in Japan in 1961, and it says longevity pays big dividends.  It is the foreign securities firm that is most widely recognized by Japanese investors.  With retail offices in five Japanese cities, Merrill Lynch is the only foreign firm that earns significant profits from its retail and private-client business.  "It wasn't always easy, but it's worked out very well for us," says Randy Harris, the firm's president in Japan.  A dicier route to success is specialization.  Baring Securities Ltd. of Britain and Jardine Fleming Securities Ltd. of Hong Kong both have big teams of experts trading warrants, popular investments that give purchasers the right to buy shares in a company at a set price.  In recent years, Japanese companies almost routinely have offered warrants as an enhancement to bond issues in Europe.  Capitalizing on the warrant niche, Baring and Jardine daily quote prices on dozens more warrant issues than the giant Japanese securities houses, which are preoccupied with their large-scale retail businesses.  Such small foreign firms often get lucrative orders from Japanese investment trusts that can't easily get the products they want from the big houses.  The warrant market could eventually dry up, though.  "The market changes rapidly, and you have to adjust," explains Richard Greer, Baring's general manager in Tokyo.  Some specialized foreign firms also have made narrow inroads by hooking up with Tokyo's big securities houses in business areas where the Japanese firms are weak.  Most prominent are U.S. investment banking boutiques, such as Wasserstein, Perella & Co. and Blackstone Group, which are taking advantage of rising interest in mergers and acquisitions, and high-technology stock-analysis firms, such as Barra Inc. and Rosenberg Institutional Equity Management Inc.  Beyond specialization or breadth, successful outsiders find that it takes determination and cultural sensitivity to break into Japan's fortified securities business.  The paradigm even competitors point to is Salomon.  What sets Salomon's Tokyo unit apart is its considerable autonomy and growing Japaneseness.  A decision two years ago to increase capitalization of Salomon Brothers Asia Ltd. by $300 million made the operation Japan's fifth most-capitalized securities house, doing business like a magnet in size-conscious Japan.  Thus, while the firm's once-powerful New York and London offices in recent years have been wracked by staff defections, management turmoil and even losses, Tokyo has grown steadily, from 65 employees three years ago to more than 550 today.  The Tokyo operation's capitalization at the end of June was $443 million.  "Some people say the best thing for this office is that there's no Concorde that flies from New York to Tokyo," says Jeffrey D. Hanna, a managing director who early this year endured the 14-hour commercial flight from New York when he moved to Tokyo as Salomon's head of research.  The distance isn't the only reason the U.S. influence at Salomon here is weak.  The office's top manager, Mr. Maughan, is British, a former U.K. Treasury official who left Her Majesty's service a decade ago for a sabbatical in the private sector and never looked back.  Mr. Maughan is a hands-on manager.  One trader recalls Mr. Maughan walking up to a bond trader's desk recently, picking up a record of the day's trades and calculating instantly how much profit the trader had made.  "That never would happen in New York," says the trader.  "Most of our top people there wouldn't know how to do it."  Running the firm on a day-to-day basis is a constellation of Japanese managers.  Over the past decade, Salomon succeeded in hiring away three of Japan's top securities professionals from rival Japanese firms.  It has been careful to smooth things over afterward: When Salomon hired its top trader, Shigeru Myojin, from Yamaichi Securities Co. a decade ago, Salomon Inc.'s chief executive, John Gutfreund, flew to Tokyo to apologize to Yamaichi for stealing such a promising employee.  Using local talent in key positions offers foreign firms the benefit of strong connections with the big investors in Tokyo.  Not only do the Japanese have extensive professional connections, but they had school or college connections with the people at the life-insurance or trust companies that manage most of Japan's investment money.  They also infuse foreign firms with a Japanese spirit that makes it easier to hire and retain good Japanese staffers.  Still, because it takes something of a renegade in Tokyo to leave a big Japanese house, foreign firms end up battling over a handful of top Japanese.  Some smaller foreign firms depend on only one Japanese manager -- a risky position in the piranha-infested Tokyo market.  Morgan Stanley lost a top Japanese equities manager, Toyoharu Tsutsui, to rival First Boston, but Mr. Tsutsui wasn't Morgan Stanley's whole franchise.  James Walsh, First Boston's top managing director in Tokyo, says: "If we took a comparable guy from any of another 30 foreign firms, it would put them out of business."  Even the successful foreign firms in Tokyo have to stay on their toes.  Regulators in Tokyo are talking about deregulating commission rates and allowing banks into the securities industry.  Both moves would erode margins at foreign firms.  Firms, including Salomon, that don't have big fee-based businesses, could be hurt.  Yet Salomon, for one, is confident it can prosper in Tokyo's rich market.  "I don't know what the others are doing," says Mr. Maughan, the chairman.  Then, trying to adopt an American accent, he adds: "But we ain't messing around."  ---  @ A Few U.S. Firms That Have Succeeded in Tokyo  @ Revenue of Japanese operations (in millions of dollars)*  @ 1986 1987 1988 1989  @ Salomon Bros. $100.9 $167.9 $157.3 $158.0  @ Morgan Stanley 54.3 99.5 125.6 93.1  @ Merrill Lynch 76.9 98.8 92.4 54.3  @ Goldman Sachs 36.0 67.0 84.7 67.8  @ First Boston 20.5 39.5 55.7 48.7  @ Pretax income (in millions of dollars)*  @ Salomon Bros. $34.8 $47.5 $31.3 $53.6  @ Morgan Stanley 8.6 10.8 .4 5.4  @ Merrill Lynch 11.8 25.5 8.0 1.0  @ Goldman Sachs 1.1 9.3 3.7 12.8  @ First Boston 5.2 4.7 5.6 7.3  @ *Converted from yen at recent rates  Note: Fiscal years ended Sept. 30, except 1989 figure, which measures six months to March 31  Source: Nihon Keizai Shimbun  The bond market recovered from two back-to-back sell-offs yesterday as bargain hunters went on a buying spree.  The Treasury's new benchmark 30-year bond, which lost a total of 2 7/8 points on Friday and Monday, or about $28.75 for each $1,000 face amount, gained 7/8 point yesterday.  The bond's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, eased to 8.15% from 8.24% Monday.  Other bonds trailed the gains in Treasurys.  Corporate bonds were about 1/2 point higher, while municipal bonds were unchanged to 1/4 point higher.  Mortgage-backed securities rose about 1/4 point.  In the Treasury market, traders said much of the buying was triggered by perceptions that bond prices have become relatively inexpensive since the government's huge auction last week.  Other investors were rushing to take positions ahead of the heavy slate of economic reports due out today.  "We had an active day," said Richard M. Kelly, president of Aubrey G. Lanston & Co. "Investors and speculators can't resist the urge to buy after a sharp correction."  Today, the government will release data on July housing starts, industrial production and capacity utilization.  Tomorrow, the Bureau of Economic Analysis will release the June merchandise trade report.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, that new house construction was at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.41 million units in July.  That would be 0.7% above the June annual rate of 1.4 million units, which was up 7.0% from May.  The economists who were surveyed forecast, on average, that production at U.S. factories rose 0.2% in July.  F. Ward McCarthy, a managing director at Stone & McCarthy Research Associates Inc., a research firm based in Princeton, N.J., believes this week's economic data will add support to bond prices.  The economist added, "The numbers this week are going to show the economy is still on a deceleration trend, with inflation continuing to unwind."  In the mortgage market, the first public offering of time-share mortgage securities hit the Street.  General Development Corp., a major developer of time-share vacation condominiums, recently made the first public offering of securitized time-share loans in a $111.6 million transaction underwritten by PaineWebber Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  There are about 17,000 loans, which have an average outstanding balance of $6,600, packaged into the securities.  The issue was priced to yield about 9%, one percentage point above the rate on the three-year Treasury note at the time of pricing.  The offering has a final maturity of 10 years and an estimated average life of nearly three years.  Treasury, Agency Securities  The new benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at 99 18/32, compared with 98 22/32 late Monday.  The new 10-year notes were quoted late at a price of 98 28/32 to yield 8.15%, compared with a price of 98 10/32 Monday when the yield was 8.23%.  Short-term interest rates were mixed.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was unchanged from Monday's auction at 8.01%, although the bond-equivalent yield slid slightly to 8.27%.  The discount rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.85%, up slightly from Monday's average auction rate of 7.83%, while the bond-equivalent yield rose slightly to 8.27% from 8.26%.  Meanwhile, the Federal Home Loan Banks sold $2.88 billion of bonds.  The offering consisted of $725 million of one-year bonds priced to yield 8.55%; $1.19 billion of two-year bonds priced to yield 8.60%; $595 million of five-year bonds priced to yield 8.60%; and $375 million of 10-year bonds priced to yield 8.60%.  Corporate, Other Issues  The bonds of Integrated Resources Inc., which have languished at lows for two months, fell further yesterday.  The company's 10 3/4% senior notes due 1992 closed 8 5/8 points lower at 37 3/8, while the 10 3/4% senior notes due 1990 fell seven points to 40.  Other Integrated issues closed two to more than five points lower.  The bonds tumbled on news that Integrated wouldn't be making the August interest payment on its 12 1/4% senior subordinated notes due Aug. 15, 1998, and that the company might sell some of its businesses.  Integrated said if it succeeds in selling its assets, proceeds would be used to pay senior debtholders.  Integrated's bonds first plunged from highs in the 90s to the low 20s in June when the real-estate concern revealed its financial problems.  Some of its issues, particularly the subordinated paper, currently trade at rock-bottom prices of about 13.  Among new issues yesterday, Israel offered $730 million of government trust certificates.  The certificates are backed mostly by the U.S government and are offered under the Foreign Military Sales Credit Program, a U.S. program that allows foreign governments to repay military loans.  The proceeds will be used to refinance loans that the U.S. Department of Defense extended to Israel for acquisition of U.S.-made arms.  Foreign Bonds  Merrill Lynch International & Co.'s government securities subsidiary said it would no longer make a market in British government bonds, known as gilts.  The report was one factor that pushed gilt prices moderately lower, but the declines were also attributed to weakness in the value of the pound.  Britain's benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 fell 9/32 to 115 23/32, to yield 9.62%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 fell 2/32 to par to yield 11.69%.  In a statement, the firm cited the competitiveness of the gilts market, which has contracted this year in part because of the government's policy of using its budget surplus to repurchase gilts.  Merrill Lynch said it will remain active in other areas of the British market, including Eurobonds and floating-rate notes.  In West Germany, prices of government bonds ended 0.15 to 0.20 point lower.  Bonn's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 ended 0.20 lower at 100.30 to yield 6.70%, while the 6 3/4% note due 1994 held steady at 100.10 to yield 6.73%.  Among active Eurobonds, the World Bank's 6 3/4% issue due 1999 fell 0.20 point to 99.05 to yield 6.88%.  Japanese government bond prices rebounded on speculation that a supply shortage in the secondary market could help drive prices higher.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at a price of 97.04 to yield 5.085%.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were unchanged to 1/4 point higher late yesterday, but dealings were subdued by high dealer inventories, sluggish investor demand for secondary market paper and a supply overhang.  The updraft in rates on Monday has forced underwriters to postpone some of the major bond offerings that had been tentatively scheduled for pricing this week, but the potential for future heavy issuance is keeping a lid on prices, traders said.  Underwriters say it's now unlikely that the two largest municipal issues that were pricing candidates will hit the market this week.  That adds $650 million of revenue bonds from the Southern California Public Power Authority and $640 million of gas and electric revenue refunding bonds from San Antonio, Texas, to the supply overhang.  It's also doubtful that $150 million to $250 million of revenue bonds from the Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority of New York in the wings will be priced this week, according to lead underwriter Goldman, Sachs & Co.  All three of the sales had been eagerly awaited by market participants as a gauge of investor interest.  New issuance was modest yesterday.  Underwriters led by San Francisco-based Grigsby Brandford Powell Inc. introduced a $71.4 million equipment revenue bond issue from the Philadelphia Municipal Authority.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities rose 8/32 to 9/32.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery finished at 97 3/32, up 9/32.  The yield was 9.54% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the 10-year Treasury note widened 0.03 percentage point to 1.39.  In the derivative market, activity in the real estate mortgage investment conduit sector has slowed from the record pace of the past two weeks as underwriters seek to lighten their heavy inventories.  No new issues have been priced so far this week.  Dominion Resources Inc., Richmond, Va., said its largest subsidiary, Virginia Electric & Power Co., agreed to build a $960 million power plant with Old Dominion Electric Cooperative, also based in Richmond.  The project to build a coal-fired generating facility in Clover, Va., needs approval from the state.  Virginia Power and Old Dominion would each own one-half of the two-unit, 786-megawatt facility.  Old Dominion is a not-for-profit utility serving about 300,000 customers.  Separately, Virginia Power said it is seeking bids for a facility providing 1,100 megawatts, to go on line between 1995 and 1997.  Furnishings 2000 Inc. said that the maturity date on $5 million of its debt was extended to Sept. 15 from Aug. 14 because an unidentified "affiliate" agreed to buy the lender's note and security interest by that date.  The company, which operates retail furniture stores in California and Washington, said it doesn't believe it will be able to pay the debt by Sept. 15, unless it is able to refinance with another lender.  Furnishings 2000 has about $38.6 million in total debt, and has been operating at a loss since its inception in 1983.  Westwood One Inc., Los Angeles, said it settled a class-action shareholder lawsuit by agreeing to pay $2.5 million and issue three million warrants.  The warrants, if exercised, entitle the class members to buy Westwood One stock at $17.25 a share over a seven-year period.  The settlement stems from three identical suits filed in federal court in Los Angeles last year alleging that the company provided "inaccurate financial information" to shareholders who bought its stock between Jan. 12 and May 31, 1988.  The Culver City, Calif., producer and distributor of radio programs, said it was less expensive to settle than to go to court.  "It was a business decision," said William J. Battison, president and chief financial officer.  Larry H. Moles, 54 years old, was named to a new post of executive vice president, chief information officer of this thrift.  Mr. Moles, who will be responsible for the company's data processing operations, previously managed data processing operations for Downey Savings & Loan Association of Newport Beach, Calif.  Unocal Canada Ltd., a unit of Unocal Corp. of Los Angeles, and Norcen Energy Resources of Montreal said they are seeking buyers for the Obed-Marsh thermal coal mine.  Wood Gundy Inc. has been retained as a financial adviser.  Unocal Canada operates and owns 93.4% of the open-cut mine located near Hinton in western Alberta.  Norcen owns the remaining 6.6%.  The mine produces about 1.6 million metric tons of coal a year, and contains 105 million metric tons of recoverable clean coal reserves.  Richard J. Stegemeier, Unocal's chairman, president and chief executive officer, said proceeds will be used for debt reduction and capital investments.  A spokesman for the oil company wouldn't estimate the mine's value.  Winchell's Donut Houses Limited Partnership, La Mirada, Calif., said it signed a definitive accord to sell Shato Holdings Ltd. its Donut Houses Operating Co. for $40 million.  Winchell's Donut Houses Operating Co. is the limited partnership that holds Winchell assets and operates its business.  Because of the proposal, Winchell's said it charged $61.6 million against second-quarter results.  It also reported a net loss of $64 million for the quarter, compared with last year's $2 million loss.  Revenue rose to $37.4 million from $36.1 million.  After the satisfaction of certain obligations and payment of expenses in connection with the sale and liquidation of the partnership, it is estimated that owners of Class A units of limited partnership interest in the partnership will receive about $3.80 for each Class A unit as a result of the sale.  There are 6,880,000 Class A units outstanding.  Denny's Inc., owner of 1,880,000 Class A units and 1,634,000 Class B units, has agreed to receive no compensation for the Class B units.  Pitney Bowes Inc. said it agreed to acquire the contract-services business of Pandick Inc., significantly expanding its own business of managing others' mailrooms.  Terms weren't released, but Pitney Bowes said it expects to complete the transaction by September.  Pitney Bowes, a Stamford, Conn., marketing and manufacturing company, would operate the concern, Pandick Technologies Inc., within its own management-services business.  New York-based Pandick, which went private in a leveraged buy-out in 1986, said it will retire debt with the proceeds of its sale of Pandick Technologies, which is expected to report revenue of $100 million for the year ending Aug. 31.  The business, which is "absolutely profitable," according to Pandick, had revenue of $800,000 when it was started in 1984.  It operates the mailroom and document-reproduction facilities of other companies.  Pandick said it would focus its efforts on its financial printing business.  Thomas F. Murasky was named senior vice president and chief financial officer of this retailer, effective Oct. 1.  He currently is vice president and chief financial officer.  Three directors of Hathaway Corp. said they have given Eugene E. Prince, chairman and chief executive officer, the right to sell their shares, giving Mr. Prince control of 34% of the company's stock.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, the directors said the agreement is designed to thwart an attempt by TBG Investment Co. to acquire a controlling block in the maker of software and electronic systems.  Under Colorado law and the company's bylaws, a merger or acquisition must be approved by holders of two-thirds of the company's shares.  TBG, an investment arm of Thyssen-Bornemisza Continuity Trust of Bermuda, owns about 6% of Hathaway, Broomfield, Colo.  Mr. Prince has final authority over the sale of stock owned by himself; Marvin Fein, a company director; A.J. Hintze, vice chairman; and Chester H. Claridge, a company director.  The directors, however, still may vote their own shares.  The leader of United Airlines pilots said his union intends to participate in any transaction involving the airline, and hinted he would prefer to team up with management instead of outside bidders.  In an open letter to United pilots, Frederick Dubinsky displayed a chilly attitude toward Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, who has offered $5.4 billion for the nation's second-largest airline company.  Without mentioning Mr. Davis by name, Mr. Dubinsky warned that outside bidders are likely to propose a leveraged buy-out that could require not only labor concessions, but also asset stripping, service cutbacks, and a curtailment of United's growth plans.  United, which last week announced it would consider all its options in response to the Davis bid, has scheduled another special board meeting for tomorrow afternoon.  Release of the letter yesterday followed the disclosure that the pilots union has held talks with United management on a new contract and possible employee ownership.  The talks could lead to a labor-management buy-out or recapitalization of United's parent, UAL Corp.  People familiar with the situation, who asked to remain unidentified, also confirmed what Mr. Dubinsky only hinted at publicly: that the pilots are prepared to cooperate with UAL management, led by Chairman Stephen Wolf, in a transaction.  Mr. Davis had no comment on either the pilot letter or the labor-management talks.  Despite the pilots' coolness, Mr. Davis has so far tried to avoid any moves that could be interpreted as hostile.  But the possibility that the pilots might side with management, handicapping outside bidders, cooled some traders' enthusiasm for UAL stock yesterday.  It fell $4.25 to $254.25 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Mr. Dubinsky cited what he described as ill effects of high levels of indebtedness at three other airlines, Pan Am Corp., Trans World Airlines, and the Eastern Airlines unit of Texas Air Corp.  He also noted the recent layoff of 1,600 employees at RJR Nabisco Inc. six months after RJR's record $25 billion LBO.  The pilots union leader, saying UAL is likely to be sold, declared, "We must be prepared to participate in, and be an integral part of, any financial deal that eventually surfaces at UAL.  What this also means in terms of choice is, concessions to an outsider, or investment in the airline by the employees.  There is no good third choice."  By framing the union's choice in terms of concessions to an outsider or employee investment in the airline, Mr. Dubinsky appeared to be tilting against outsiders such as Mr. Davis in favor of UAL management.  The pilots haven't yet arranged a meeting sought by Mr. Davis.  The reference to RJR Nabisco was a slap at another potential bidder for UAL, the LBO firm of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., which bought RJR six months ago.  "Certain participants {in the RJR buy-out} became wealthier, while RJR Nabisco employees are receiving unemployment compensation," the letter said.  Mr. Dubinsky also seemed to indicate in his letter that the pilots, who tried to buy the airline on their own in 1987, want other labor groups to join them in any transaction.  But getting labor unified behind any one transaction may prove difficult.  Brian M. Freeman, the adviser to the United machinists union, said he plans to meet early next week with Mr. Davis.  The machinists union helped scuttle the pilots' bid two years ago for the airline and has shown no signs yet that it is willing to tack on to a bid engineered by the pilots union.  The machinists also appear far less eager to join in a transaction with Mr. Wolf than do the pilots.  Louis R. Schroeder, president of the International Association of Machinists local that represents 23,000 United ground employees, said the union believes Mr. Wolf should have taken action to prevent UAL from becoming a takeover target.  Mr. Dubinsky's letter made a similar point without naming Mr. Wolf.  Mr. Schroeder said that machinist union officials recommended more than a month ago that Mr. Wolf consider an Employee Stock Ownership Plan as an anti-takeover measure, around the time UAL stock began its sharp rise, but that Mr. Wolf said the company needed to keep its options open.  Mr. Schroeder also noted that other carriers took defensive measures recently as a result of the overall takeover speculation in airline stocks.  He noted that the fact that two of the last three airlines that Mr. Wolf headed ended up being sold has hurt Mr. Wolf's credibility with the machinists.  "This guy has a track record at doing this sort of thing," Mr. Schroeder said.  "I used to trust him, but I don't any more."  Mr. Freeman said the machinists still may propose a recapitalization that would include an ownership stake for employees as well as a special dividend for shareholders.  Both the pilots and machinists are in a strong position to influence events.  The pilots are working under an expired contract; the machinists' contract expires next month.  UAL declined to comment on the union activities.  A Boeing Co. unit overcharged the Air Force by nearly $5.9 million on various computer projects between 1983 and 1987, according to the General Accounting Office.  In a letter to the Air Force released yesterday, the GAO concluded that Boeing Computer Services improperly included that amount as part of its overhead and billed the government for the full amount.  The company maintained the money was used for "enhancing internal manufacturing and production processes," according to the GAO.  But after examining Boeing documents and internal memos, GAO investigators concluded that the funds actually were used for research and product development that shouldn't have been financed completely by the Air Force.  Since certain research results were intended to help Boeing market future computer-related products, the GAO urged the Air Force to seek recovery of the full $5.9 million.  The GAO's letter and other materials were released by Rep. John Conyers (D., Mich.), chairman of a House government operations subcommittee investigating abuses in federal computer contracts.  The GAO's position in the accounting dispute involving Boeing could have a broader impact on military computer contracts.  Rep. Conyers, for example, released a separate set of GAO findings that raise similar questions about $22.5 million paid by the Pentagon over the years to the Software Productivity Consortium, a group of major contractors created to help improve software used by the military.  Rep. Conyers urged Pentagon officials to investigate those payments.  According to the GAO, 13 of the 14 firms participating in the consortium charged their entire contributions to manufacturing and engineering accounts, rather than treating them as research and development costs.  Pentagon officials at one time suggested the companies' accounting procedures were acceptable, but they now are reviewing the matter, according to the GAO. Officials had no immediate comment on the Boeing report.  A Boeing spokesman said the company "does not agree that the costs . . . were misclassified."  He added that the five projects investigated by the GAO, which he declined to identify, "were not intended for sale" outside the company.  Boeing also said the computer services unit hasn't changed its accounting practices as a result of the dispute, and that it has cooperated with the GAO.  B. Manischewitz Co. and a California takeover group agreed to a $1.5 million settlement in their dispute over a soured attempt to take the matzoh maker private.  The company also said it wasn't for sale and is no longer interested in acquisition proposals.  Closely held Manischewitz had accepted a $841-a-share offer early last month from an investment group led by Levine, Tessler, Leichtman & Co. of Los Angeles and including some members of Manischewitz' management.  But the buying group later backed off from the agreement after Manischewitz declined to discuss developments related to a previously disclosed federal investigation of alleged antitrust violations in the Kosher food industry.  After each side accused the other of refusing to complete the purchase, Levine Tessler claimed it was entitled to a $3.4 million fee due to breakup of the transaction.  Under the proposed agreement, Levine-Tessler will be paid $1.5 million.  Arthur Levine, of Levine Tessler, said, "I really have no comment other than {to say} that parties avoided litigation and came to a settlement that was satisfactory to all sides."  Manischewitz said the terms of the settlement are subject to approval in an Ohio court where two shareholder lawsuits related to the transactions had been filed.  Manischewitz will pay $375,000 to cover plaintiffs' attorneys' fees and expenses.  Grossman's Inc. said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its Moore's unit to a U.S. unit of Harrisons & Crosfield PLC of London.  Terms call for the Harrisons unit to pay $8.5 million more than the book value of the division on the closing day of the sale.  The home-improvement retailer declined to give the unit's present book value.  The agreement includes a "non-competition" pact under which Grossman's, of Braintree, Mass., said it would not compete in Moore's market for an undisclosed amount of time.  The Moore's division accounted for $291 million of Grossman's sales of $1.14 billion in 1988, the company said.  The unit consists of 59 building materials stores in the middle Atlantic states, the mid-south and Ohio.  Grossman's said the proceeds from the sale of the Moore's unit and the sale of its Northwest division, which was previously announced, are expected to total about $100 million.  Southern National Corp. and Allied Bankshares Inc. said they will recommend to their boards the termination of their stock-swap merger plan valued at $58.5 million.  In a terse statement, Southern National, based in Lumberton, N.C., said that the management of the two bank holding companies concluded that "the problems of combining the two operating systems were too great to be overcome."  Company officials couldn't be reached for comment.  Under the agreement announced in May, Allied shareholders would have received slightly more than half of a Southern National share for each Allied share held.  The announcement was made after stock markets closed.  In national over-the-counter trading, Southern National closed at $25.75, up 12.5 cents and Allied finished at $9.50, unchanged.  The Energy Department, moving to settle a lawsuit filed by the Sierra Club, agreed that it won't run an incinerator at the Rocky Flats nuclear-weapons complex without a permit.  The agreement on the incinerator, which burned a mixture of hazardous and radioactive materials until it was closed this spring, settles the central issue in the suit.  In a joint motion filed in federal court in Denver, the Sierra Club, the department and its co-defendant, Rockwell International Corp., which runs the government-owned plant, said they were working toward a settlement that would take the form of a consent decree.  In its suit, filed in February, the Sierra Club alleged that the department and Rockwell were incinerating hazardous waste without a license needed under federal law.  The incinerator is also a focus of the Justice Department's investigation into possible criminal violation of environmental laws at the plant, which is near Denver.  Adam Babich, a lawyer representing the Sierra Club, said the agreement "represents a change of position and a lot of progress in how they're dealing with this issue."  Rocky Flats makes plutonium triggers for detonating nuclear weapons.  The biggest financial bailout in history is quickly moving to the street corners and shopping centers of the nation -- in one way or another, to every financial institution calling itself a savings and loan.  The Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., which has already seized roughly 265 insolvent S&Ls in anticipation of the newly adopted legislation, will have $50 billion to spend over the next two years to close, merge or liquidate the nation's sick thrifts.  To varying degrees, thousands of thrift-industry patrons -- homeowners, depositors, commercial borrowers and the like -- will be touched by the action.  Following are questions and answers explaining the changes that consumers may see -- and the actions that some should be prepared to take.  I have a certificate of deposit in an insolvent thrift that the government is taking over.  Should I worry?  How much am I protected?  Every depositor is protected up to $100,000 per institution, even if the thrift has been seized.  Once the institution has been taken over by the FDIC, it is likely to be sold to a healthy buyer.  That buyer would be responsible for your account.  Accounts in separate thrifts owned by the same holding company are separately insured.  But accounts in different branches of the same thrift are insured only up to a total of $100,000.  My spouse and I have a joint savings account, as well as separate, individual accounts in the same institution.  How far does deposit insurance protect us?  Both the joint account and the individual accounts will be insured up to $100,000.  Beyond that, in cases where multiple joint accounts are maintained in the same institution, rules get more complex.  For instance, the amount of protection can vary according to whether accounts are held by a parent and a child or a parent and more than one child.  The FDIC says it is best to check with the institution about a particular situation.  I have an Individual Retirement Account and a separate checking and savings account.  Is the IRA separately insured?  Yes.  Congress specifically provided for separate coverage of IRAs, up to $100,000.  For example, a depositor with a savings and checking account would be insured for both of those up to a combined $100,000.  The IRA would be insured separately, providing as much as $200,000 of total protection at one institution.  When the government sells my sick S&L, will the terms of my certificate of deposit be honored?  Not necessarily.  Last year, the FDIC disposed of more than 200 failing banks and cut CD rates at about 30 institutions.  The principal, however, was always protected by insurance.  In its new role as agent to sell insolvent thrifts, the FDIC has sold only three S&Ls so far.  In those transactions, the buyers of the thrifts were bound to honor the CD terms for only two weeks.  Then, they could lower the rates, or the depositor could cash out the CD without an early-withdrawal penalty.  "There is an interest rate risk," says Roger Hood, assistant general counsel of the FDIC.  What's the new sticker we're starting to see in the front windows of savings and loans?  The old sticker proclaimed that depositors were protected by FSLIC -- the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. -- an agency that the new law dissolves.  In 30 days, all S&Ls will be required to have ordered a new sticker: an American eagle surrounded by the words "Backed by the Full Faith and Credit of the United States Government."  Even if you see the old sticker on your thrift for a while, the deposits will remain protected by the new Savings Association Insurance Fund.  If my thrift is liquidated -- not sold to a healthy S&L or bank -- how long will I have to wait to receive my money from the FDIC?  What if I have more than $100,000 in an account?  Normally, you'll have to wait only two or three days.  Some depositors, though, have more complex claims, such as pension claims or custodial claims that require the depositor to submit records first.  It's best to keep those on hand, Mr. Hood says.  Depositors with more than $100,000 in a single account will be paid $100,000 within days.  To collect the remainder of the account, they must make claims against the receiver, as other creditors will.  As the assets of the thrift are sold, those claimants are paid off, including those depositors with claims over $100,000, but not necessarily in full.  If my thrift has been seized by the government, what are my chances for renegotiating my mortgage?  What about my business loan?  Again, it all depends on the management at the institution.  If the thrift is in conservatorship, it will continue to conduct business, including refinancing home mortgages.  "But if the loan is with a commercial enterprise, I doubt that our people will be interested in renegotiating terms to lengthen the relationship under those circumstances," an FDIC spokesman says.  My money is in a healthy S&L.  Am I likely to be affected by the bailout bill?  Most depositors are likely to see the rates paid by S&Ls decline over the coming weeks and months, as the government pumps cash into the sick thrifts paying the highest rates to attract cash.  Just yesterday, the board of directors of the Resolution Trust Corp., the arm of the FDIC that will dispose of the sick thrifts, approved the first lump of funds -- slightly less than $1 billion -- to replace high cost deposits at sick Texas thrifts, who are pushing up the market interest rates.  Mellon Bank Corp., Pittsburgh, adopted a shareholder-rights plan as a takeover defense and declared a dividend of one right on each common share outstanding and Series D preferred stock.  The dividend is payable next Wednesday to stock of record as of that date.  In addition, each share of common and Series D preferred issued after next Wednesday also will have one right attached.  Under the terms of the plan, the rights will take effect only if a person or group launches a tender offer that results in ownership of 20% or more of Mellon.  At that time, each right will entitle the holder to purchase 1/100 of a share of newly issued preferred stock for $200.  Each 1/100 share will be equal to one share of common.  Mellon said the plan wasn't adopted in response to any specific effort to acquire it.  Du Pont Co. and Upjohn Co. said they have agreed to combine their biotechnology resources to develop a better-growing and more industrially useful soybean.  Du Pont, a chemicals concern based in Wilmington, Del., brings its extensive agricultural research staff to the project; Upjohn, a health care and agronomic concern based in Kalamazoo, Mich., brings practical experience in seed breeding and development through its Asgrow Seed Co. subsidiary.  The two companies plan to divide ownership of any soybean discoveries based on their applications.  "We're interested in the end uses," said Suzanne Shaw, a Du Pont spokeswoman.  "Asgrow is interested in the agronomic traits, or the ability of the plant to grow better."  A group that includes Investment Limited Partnership said it sold 1,022,600 shares of Vons Cos., reducing its stake in the El Monte, Calif., grocery company to 4.6%.  The group sold the shares between June 15 and Monday for $18.95 to $21.20 a share, according to a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  It didn't give a reason in the filing for the sale.  The group said it continues to hold 1,774,687 Vons shares.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Vons shares closed at $19.25, down 50 cents.  "We're pleased that the stock price has stayed up, and that there's a good market for it," said Michael Henn, Vons's chief financial officer.  Humana Inc., Louisville, Ky., said it signed a letter of intent to acquire certain assets of Metropolitan Life Insurance Co.'s MetLife unit, a health maintenance organization.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Under the agreement, Humana would acquire subscriber contracts for about 13,000 of MetLife's 15,000 HMW members in Kentucky.  The other 2,000 members, who work for national corporations, would remain members of MetLife, which will contract with Humana's network of health care providers in Louisville and Lexington, Ky.  Members whose contracts are acquired by Humana will have the same benefits and premiums as they have under MetLife.  The agreement won't affect individuals insured by Metropolitan Life Insurance.  Under a new set of rules announced yesterday, the Small Business Administration's program for minority contractors will resemble a selective school: tougher to get into with frequent tests before graduation.  The regulations will carry out the 1988 law overhauling the agency's so-called 8(A) program designed to help economically disadvantaged business owners win federal contracts.  In general, the legislation aims to ensure that participating companies eventually will survive in the general marketplace.  Also, by increasing criminal penalties for certain violations, it seeks to curb abuses, such as widespread corruption in defense contracts awarded to Wedtech Corp., a defunct minority contractor in New York.  Under the new rules, applicants must have a personal net worth of no more than $250,000, excluding equity in their home and business.  Previously, the standard was $750,000, including the home and business assets.  In addition, limits are set on participants' net worth during the two phases of a company's maximum nine-year term in the program.  After the first four years, the owner's net worth can't exceed $500,000, and in the ninth year it can't be above $750,000.  To carry out the law's emphasis on helping the disadvantaged companies become viable concerns in the general marketplace, SBA officials say they'll help the owners write business plans and will offer technical and managerial advice.  The agency also will review the performance of participating companies annually.  One provision in the final regulations was eased somewhat from the version originally proposed.  The original proposal would have required that companies win 75% of their contracts from outside the 8(A) program by their last year of participation.  Officials said that remains the technical requirement, but the agency realistically expects participants to have won about 55% of their business from outside the program at that point.  Businesses participating in the program complained during public hearings late last year that local officials were sometimes arbitrary in selecting companies that could participate and expressed concern that strict timetables for winning business outside the program would be hard to meet.  Alfred Jaquez, president of the Latin American Manufacturers Association, which represents Hispanic-owned U.S. businesses, said he is encouraged that the SBA tried to address many of the concerns of the minority business community.  But the series of limits on a business owner's personal net worth could pose a problem, he said.  "To qualify for financing on the higher-end contracts you need a higher net worth than $750,000.  I hope it won't end up that the 8(A) program is only for industries like Mom and Pop stores that aren't capital intensive."  Mr. Jaquez and other small business representatives also say they're worried that federal agencies may be reluctant to use the 8(A) program because of another of the law's provisions: Participants now must compete among themselves for federal manufacturing contracts of more than $5 million and other federal contracts of $3 million or more.  SBA officials acknowledge that some government agencies viewed the ability to award contracts without seeking competing bids as an incentive to use the program.  But the SBA officials said they thought they could overcome this problem.  Erline Patrick, the acting head of the SBA's Minority Small Business Office since last April, was named permanent head of the office.  In the overhaul legislation, Congress said the office must be filled by a career government employee rather than a political appointee, to shield the program from political influence and give it more stability.  Mrs. Patrick is a former staffer with the Senate Committee on Small Business who helped write the new 8(A) law.  Mrs. Patrick has worked with two small businesses, including her own family construction company in Connecticut, and also worked for 15 years as a high school principal and vice principal in Connecticut.  She was chosen after a nationwide search that included 37 candidates for the job, said SBA Administrator Susan Engeleiter.  Mrs. Patrick said that among the goals for the minority business program will be to increase the diversity of the companies that participate and to act more quickly on applications.  Applicants now wait about a year, but Mrs. Patrick says she hopes to cut that to 90 days or less.  She said she'll solicit applications from businesses in high-unemployment areas and from within industries that haven't previously participated.  Earlier this week, Mr. Jaquez and Anthony Robinson, president of the Minority Business Legal Defense Fund, a nonprofit law firm based here, said their members have complained that the 8(A) program favors companies based in metropolitan Washington and southern California.  The new regulations took effect yesterday.  They will be published in the Federal Register of Aug. 21, but copies of the 300page document won't be available from the SBA until September.  Prime Computer Inc., Natick, Mass., unveiled two computers in its new EXL 1200 line based on multiprocessor computers made by Sequent Computer Systems Inc., Beaverton, Ore.  The EXL 1200 models, which use the industry standard Unix and Pick operating systems, are the first multiprocessor systems announced by Prime since signing a computer purchase agreement with Sequent in April.  Sequent's multiprocessor computers combine as many as 30 Intel Corp. 80386 microprocessors into a single computer to increase speed.  Prices for the EXL 1200 series start at $94,500, with a small, two-processor EXL 1227 costing $153,000 and a more expandable EXL 1281 costing $193,000.  Bennett S. LeBow has been arguing for nine months that shareholders of Prime Computer would be better off if he were to win control.  But one awkward fact has been lost in the shuffle: Mr. LeBow already is at the helm of three concerns and, despite the roaring bull market, shareholders of each of these companies have run up paper losses.  Now Mr. LeBow is on the verge of losing his hostile bid for Prime, which has agreed to merge with friendly suitor J.H. Whitney & Co.  And as when troops are routed overseas, attention is likely to be focused closer to Mr. LeBow's home.  Since 1985, the financier and deal maker has been buying into troubled companies and trying to turn them around.  Mr. LeBow has succeeded in two cases, and has made millions for himself and other insiders.  But his public shareholders have gotten poorer.  MAI Basic Four, a minicomputer maker controlled by Mr. LeBow, went public in 1986 at 15 a share.  Yesterday, the stock closed at 4 7/8.  Liggett Group, a cigarette maker controlled by Mr. LeBow's Brooke Partners, sold stock to the public in 1987 at 12 a share.  Yesterday, it closed at 10 3/8.  And Western Union, the communications giant, was trading at 2 5/8 on Jan. 8, 1988, the date that Mr. LeBow was put in command as chairman.  Yesterday, its stock closed at 1 3/8.  A look at Mr. LeBow's career suggests that investors don't necessarily make money by riding in the wake of successful deal makers.  At Liggett and at MAI, for example, Mr. LeBow is credited with executing sharp turnarounds.  But by the time the companies sold shares to the public, the good times were largely behind them.  Richard Ressler, a partner in Brooke Partners designated to speak for Mr. LeBow, concedes that shareholders in MAI, Liggett and Western Union have been disappointed.  "There are lots of deals that perform well after going public and lots that don't," he says.  But he says that over the next few years, "I think we're going to have three winners.  I think they are very good companies."  Of the three, Liggett is doing the best now, but ultimately will be the most modest success, Mr. Ressler says.  "MAI and Western Union will require the most intensive management, but I think they will surprise people."  Analysts say Mr. LeBow has made improvements at all three companies.  After buying Liggett, "He reduced overhead, cut inventories and paid off debt," says Joel Tillinghast, who follows Liggett at the mutual-fund giant Fidelity Investments, a Liggett shareholder.  "But since he took it public, the stock has been a dog," Mr. Tillinghast says.  "The history isn't that Ben LeBow loses money," says an investor who has followed his career.  "Ben LeBow has always made money."  But his shareholders, as a group, haven't.  Mr. LeBow bought MAI in 1985 for $100 million, including $5 million in cash equity.  At the time, the computer industry was in a slump.  "LeBow cleaned house," says Robert Johnson, a Rotan Mosle analyst.  Mr. LeBow slashed the number of vice presidents and moved high-cost manufacturing to the Far East.  The business improved in a hurry.  At the public offering, MAI and some holders, including Mr. LeBow, sold four million shares.  Mr. LeBow and LeBow family trusts kept nine million of the company's 15 million shares.  Then, in 1987, MAI declared a special $1-a-share dividend.  Mr. LeBow's family recouped, including stock sales, an estimated $10.8 million -- twice its cash investment.  In effect, it owns two-thirds of MAI for nothing.  After the offering, MAI's earnings rose steadily.  Though its stock dipped to 11, it rose to 21 when Mr. LeBow said he would consider offers to sell out.  But when the merger talk fizzled, and the minicomputer business again slumped, MAI's shares plunged.  Mr. LeBow tried to rescue MAI by raiding another computer maker -- Prime.  He turned to Drexel Burnham Lambert, his usual -- though not exclusive -- source of financing.  But computers are a bad business for hostile raids.  Customers like going to sleep knowing that their supplier will be there in the morning.  The bitter, nine-month battle soured MAI's customers and depressed its sales.  "A year and a half of uncertainty wore on the marketplace," Mr. Ressler says.  Last week, MAI said it would take almost $40 million in unusual charges in its third quarter ended June 30, because of the raid on Prime and a 10% slashing of its work force.  Even before the charges, Rotan Mosle's Mr. Johnson estimates yearly operating profit at 15 cents a share, down from $1.62.  MAI is said to be developing several promising products.  But "with new products, you want to spend money on promotion," Mr. Johnson says.  "You walk a fine line" by cutting expenses at the same time.  Mr. LeBow bought Liggett in 1986 for $140 million, including $14 million in cash and guarantees for some of its debt.  "It was a classic case of smart investing and good timing," Kurt Feuerman, a Drexel analyst, says.  "He bought the company during a price war for generic cigarettes," Liggett's main business.  "By the time he took it public, the business was stronger" and Liggett was more profitable, Mr. Feuerman says.  Dividends since Liggett's public offering have totaled $1.48 a share.  Mr. LeBow has taken out about $30 million, twice his initial stake, while retaining 83% ownership.  In the first fiscal year after the public offering -- the 12 months ended March 31, 1988 -- earnings per share were $1.40.  But in fiscal 1989, they fell to $1.26.  Analysts project $1.10 for the current fiscal year.  Though Liggett is promoting Pyramid, a new low-price cigarette, its hallmark brands such as L&M, Lark and Chesterfield seem like icons from the era of tail fins and saddle shoes.  Liggett's market share is eroding.  It slipped to 2.9% in the year ended June 30 from 3.2% a year earlier, according to a Wheat, First Securities analyst, John C. Maxwell Jr.  Mr. Ressler says Liggett's shareholders were unlucky, because Liggett went public a week and a half before the 1987 stock market crash.  This is true.  But he concedes that other tobacco stocks have done better over the same period.  Philip Morris is up 40% since Liggett went public; American Brands is up 39%.  Mr. LeBow took control of Western Union after the crash, at about half its pre-crash high.  Since then, burdened by $640 million of debt, the stock has been halved again.  Western Union, of course, was ailing when Mr. LeBow took over.  As he planned it, growth in the company's money transfer and electronic mail services would offset a slow fade in its telex business.  But the telex business didn't fade.  "It went off the edge of a cliff," Mr. Ressler says.  If Western Union ever makes a profit -- a long way off, analysts say -- Mr. LeBow's convertible stock will greatly dilute the holdings of other shareholders.  But Mr. LeBow won't make money ahead of public shareholders.  And his Brooke Partners has invested $72 million in equity and other securities.  Mr. Ressler says, "We told everyone that Western Union would be a three- to five-year turnaround."  He says this hasn't changed.  Moments after White House aide Richard Breeden was nominated to run the Securities and Exchange Commission, the market experts of Congress informed President Bush that although the choice was interesting, they intend to continue running the agency themselves.  So the President faces a challenge.  If he doesn't fight Mr. Breeden through the confirmation process, regulation of the capital markets will increasingly fall into the hands of those wonderful folks who gave us the S&L mess.  Senate Banking Committee Chairman Donald Riegle fired the first shot Monday by doubting Mr. Breeden's "market knowledge and experience."  In fact, Mr. Breeden was a securities and banking lawyer on Wall Street and in Washington.  What Senator Riegle really has on his mind became more evident when he demanded Mr. Breeden's detailed views on "market reform, tender offers, leveraged buy-outs, insider trading and program trading."  This is the latest application of the World's Greatest Deliberative Body's new Bill Lucas Test: Anyone seeking confirmation must agree to disagree with the policies of the President who nominated him.  Senator Riegle wants Mr. Breeden to disclaim the administration's largely free-market approach to takeovers and its support for a high degree of self-regulation by exchanges.  As it happens, Senator Riegle and Mr. Breeden already have crossed swords and the exercise tells us a lot about the Senator's view of finance.  Mr. Breeden designed the Bush thrift bailout plan.  The final version lacked a key ingredient -- any recognition of the role of deposit insurance in causing the problem -- but that owes more to politics than to a failure of Mr. Breeden to understand the problem.  An administration-proposed deposit insurance tax was quickly demolished on Capitol Hill.  After Congress redesigned the plan to its own liking, it emerged as a $250 billion future obligation for taxpayers.  Senator Riegle has very carefully looked after the interests of a political friend, Charles Keating of Lincoln Savings & Loan.  Lincoln's bailout will need $2.5 billion.  Mr. Riegle was one of five Senators who demanded a meeting with thrift regulators two years and hundreds of millions in losses ago to call them off Lincoln.  Senator Riegle asked, "Where's the smoking gun?  Where are the losses?"  He has since returned $66,100 in contributions from 57 executives of Lincoln and its affiliates.  The contributions were all conveniently made at one Detroit fund-raiser only weeks before the 1987 meeting with thrift regulators.  Senate Democrats also made sure the bailout grandfathered top S&L regulator Danny Wall to avoid more embarrassing disclosures at a reconfirmation hearing.  Congress has at least as much pull with the SEC as with S&L regulators.  It's an open secret in Washington that Senator Riegle's friend John Dingell micromanages the tiniest details at the SEC from his perch on the House Energy and Commerce Committee.  Current SEC Chairman David Ruder, still fresh from the Northwestern campus, once commented with admiration about how "helpful" Mr. Dingell's staff was.  We once asked a top Reagan Justice Department official who in his department oversaw SEC enforcement.  He thought for a moment, then recalled that a congressional committee, not the government's legal officers, did that.  The SEC needs strong leadership more than ever.  Congress would like to transform the U.S. securities markets into district-by-district autarkies; most recently, 200 Members objected to Sir James Goldsmith's bid for Britain's B.A.T, which has U.S. holdings.  Representative Dingell regularly sends the agency names of investment banks he wants criminally investigated, despite the constitutional prohibition against bills of attainder.  Congress refuses to define insider trading, so as to make it easier to convict those guilty of this undefined offense.  Congress still hasn't repealed RICO despite the damage to markets by hyperzealous plaintiffs and prosecutors.  Mr. Breeden's friends vouch for him as a strong free marketeer.  As deputy counsel to Vice President Bush, he helped draft the deregulation task force report on financial services.  Outgoing SEC Commissioner Joseph Grundfest credits Mr. Breeden with being especially concerned about the danger of overregulating the U.S. capital markets at a time of tough new competition from overseas markets.  He would likely pick an enforcement chief who would remember his job is to reduce the costs of capital, not just add scalps to his wall.  What probably sticks in the craw of Congressmen is that Mr. Breeden is a Bush loyalist and a product of the White House, which will likely back him when the going gets tough.  The going could indeed get tough, judging from the early signs, because at stake is nothing less than who, in fact, will run the SEC.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Wholesale Club $ .15 ... $ .11 (3) 36.36  @ NEGATIVE  @Bayou Steel $ .16 ... $ .28 (3) 42.86  @Gitano Group $ .35 ... $ .44 (3) 20.45  Source: Zacks Investment Research  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. could collect fees of more than $50 million and gain a substantially larger stake in MAI Basic Four Inc. if MAI's bid for Prime Computer Inc. is successful.  Drexel's potential rewards for its role in the bid were detailed in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing by MAI, in response to a court challenge by Prime to the tender offer.  Prime has rejected as inadequate the $20-a-share, or $970 million, offer.  According to the SEC filing, Drexel will receive as much as $32.8 million in financing and advisory fees if the offer is completed.  In addition, Drexel would have the right to perform additional services for which it would receive further compensation -- including as much as $21.9 million for refinancing $875 million of notes issued as bridge financing for the acquisition.  Drexel, which currently has a 6.9% interest in MAI, also would be entitled to buy at half of market value some 1.8 million shares of newly issued MAI stock.  Assuming no other changes in the amount of MAI's shares outstanding, the New York securities firm would then own about 16.9% of the company's common stock, according to the filing.  MAI shares closed yesterday at $8.25, down 25 cnets, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Prime, also on the Big Board, closed at $18.625, up 25 cents.  Beyond the disclosures contained in the latest SEC filing, MAI last week was ordered by federal court Judge A. David Mazzone here to produce more information about what he termed "the ambitious, fragile and possibly illegal financial requirements through which the bidders propose to acquire Prime."  MAI expects to provide the required information next week, according to Lewis Stern, an attorney with Fried Frank Harris Shriver & Jacobson, representing the Tustin, Calif., computer company.  Separately, Bennett S. LeBow, MAI's chairman and main stockholder, reiterated in a letter MAI's willingness to consider increasing its tender offer if Prime allows it to review certain confidential financial information.  The letter, dated Jan. 4, was released yesterday by MAI.  A spokeswoman for Prime, a Natick, Mass., computer maker, declined to comment.  The National Association of Securities Dealers issued disciplinary actions against five firms and a number of individuals for violating various rules including the NASD's rules of fair practice.  The actions against firms included Heritage Financial Corp., Lutherville, Md., and John Wesley George Jr., Ruxton Md., each fined $15,000 for failing to keep proper records and overstating net capital.  Mr. George was barred from association with any NASD member.  Dean Securities Inc. and Charles Dean, both of Olympia, Wash., were each fined $10,000 and ordered to disgorge $16,300, the result of findings that they sold municipal bonds at prices that weren't fair and reasonable.  Dillon Securities Inc. and Lyle R. Haas, Spokane, Wash., were disciplined for failing to to prepare accurate net capital computations.  The firm was fined $20,000 and Mr. Haas, $10,000.  They have appealed the sanctions to the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Leumi Securities Corp. and Zvi Amit, a registered principal, New York, were each fined $15,000; without admitting or denying the allegations, they consented to findings that they failed to maintain the appropriate amount in a special account for the exclusive benefit of customers.  Stern Financial Securities Inc., Los Angeles, and two registered representatives, Glenn Edwin Stern, Monrovia, Calif., and Nick Antone, West Covina, Calif., were disciplined for engaging in improper securities transactions.  The firm and Mr. Stern were each fined $14,000; Mr. Antone, who engaged in securities transactions on the firm's behalf when he wasn't associated with it in any capacity, was ordered to disgorge $23,740.  Conrad Lysiak, general counsel and compliance officer for Dillon Securities, said that in the appeal, the firm and Lyle Haas will raise constitutional issues on certain NASD regulations.  A number of individuals were fined and suspended: Ronald Oliver Campbell, Jersey City, N.J., fined $5,500 and suspended for 30 days; George Frederick Clark Jr., Torrance, Calif., fined $22,000 and barred from NASD association; Frances A. Devins, New York, fined $15,000 and barred; Beth Jill DiGiacinto, Parsippany, N.J., and Barry Paul Sarin, Wayne, N.J., each fined $1,000 and suspended for one year.  Also Michael James Earl, Mill Valley, Calif., fined $10,000 and barred; Lawrence C. Gibson, Corona, Calif., fined $30,000, and suspended for one year; Herbert Shaw Gordon, San Rafael, Calif., fined $15,000 and barred; Charles F. Griggs Jr., Springfield, Mass., suspended for one year; John Edward Hurlburt, San Diego, Calif., fined $10,000 and barred, without admitting or denying allegations; Hal Andy Ireland, Cheney, Wash., fined $15,000, and barred; Bradley A. Kanode, Albuquerque, N.M., fined $45,000 and barred; and Thomas J. Kilgore III, Lakewood, Colo., fined $5,000 and suspended for two years.  Also, Allen Roy Miller, Huntington Beach, Calif., fined $15,000 and barred; Charles Edwin Paul Jr., Boynton Beach, Fla., fined $10,000 and suspended for 60 days, without admitting or denying allegations; Clifford E. Romain, Bronx, N.Y., fined $5,000 and suspended for two years; Gary Earl Sargent, Spokane, Wash., fined $130,000 and barred; George J. Schwabe Jr., Glenview, Ill., fined $35,000 and barred, without admitting or denying allegations; Dale Owen Springer, Windsor Locks, Conn., fined $15,000 and barred, without admitting or denying allegations; Edgar Bradley Sylvester Jr., Vancouver, Wash., fined $50,000 and barred; Daryl Allen Wakefield, Portland, Ore., fined $15,000, ordered to disgorge $1,250 and barred; Timothy A. Williams, New York, fined $25,000 and barred; and Dean I. Zochert, Augusta, Ga., fined $10,000 and barred, without admitting or denying allegations.  Anne Lane Davidson, Dallas, was fined $17,500, without admitting or denying allegations; Donald Robin Mead, Portland, Ore., was fined $15,000.  Most of the individuals cited couldn't be reached, or declined comment.  Mr. Sargent called the NASD's allegations "a trumped up deal" involving claims that he was selling unregistered stock.  He said the transaction involved $130,000 for a mining project raised from 20 to 25 investors who were offered loan repayments or stock in the mine.  He said he didn't respond to NASD reporting requirements because the self-regulatory body "chose to ignore the facts I gave them in a previous situation."  Mr. Schwabe said, "I'm no longer in that industry and I don't plan to pursue a career in it."  He added that full restitution, with interest, was made, "which is unusual."  West Germany's second-quarter gross national product was flat with first-quarter GNP, after price, seasonal and calendar adjustments, the DIW Economic Research Institute of West Berlin said.  Second-quarter GNP rose a real 3.9% from a year earlier, following a year-to-year growth rate of 4.2% in the first quarter, the institute said.  The stagnation in the second quarter doesn't indicate a slowdown in growth, because first-quarter GNP was bloated by several special factors, including an unusually mild winter and extraordinary high returns from foreign investments, the institute said.  Adjusted for these factors, GNP has been rising steadily at an annualized rate of 3% since last autumn.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Aug. 11, Aug. 4,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.92 7.71  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.50 8.30  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.56 8.35  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 8.98 8.95  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.54 8.48  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.12 7.73  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.01 7.66  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 7.99 7.64  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.04 7.82  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 8.10 7.91  a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, August 9, 1989 and Wednesday August 2, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  British retailers had a further sharp slowdown in the annual rate of sales growth in July, as high British interest rates continued to damp consumer demand, according to a Confederation of British Industry survey.  The organization, noting the July growth rate was the slowest in its survey's six-year history, said the slide in retailers' confidence should warn the British government against any further tightening in monetary policy.  It said only 43% of retailers surveyed estimated their July sales volume to be higher than that of a year earlier, and 41% said it was lower.  The balance between optimism and pessimism fell to the narrowest level since the institute started monitoring retailing trends.  Frank L. Cerutti, 41 years old, was elected president and chief executive officer of Madison National Bank of Virginia, a subsidiary.  He succeeds George H. Bramhall, who left the bank for personal reasons.  James F. Janz, senior vice president of Zilber Ltd., Milwaukee, was named a director of this bank holding company, increasing the number of board members to 11.  Retail sales volume in July fell a provisional 0.6% from June and was up 0.2% from July 1988, Britain's Central Statistical Office said.  Market forecasts for July were for a rise of 0.1% from June.  In the three months through July, retail sales volume was up 0.25% from the previous three months and up 2.25% from a year earlier.  The value of retail sales was up about 5% in July, compared with a year earlier.  The agency said that neither the recent spell of warm weather nor the transport strikes in Britain appeared to have had much effect on the figures.  It said that if anything, the transport strike "might not even be negative."  South Korea is increasingly becoming active in overseas capital markets in preparation for its own market opening in 1992.  Institutional investors in South Korea have sharply increased their underwriting and investment in the overseas market and doubled profits this year, the national Yonhap news agency said.  Securities, investment-trust and insurance firms underwrote $161 million in overseas securities in the first half of this year, up 21% from $133 million for all of last year.  Those institutional investors bought $250 million of securities abroad, a sharp boost from $55 million in the latter half of last year.  Profits from underwriting and investment soared 91% to $44 million from $23 million for all of last year.  Sweden's unemployment rate rose to 1.2% in July from 1% in June but was lower than the 1.7% a year earlier, Statistics Sweden, the national statistics agency, said.  The total of people without work was 59,000 last month, an increase from the preceding month's 44,000 but lower than the 79,000 recorded a year earlier.  The June unemployment figure was the lowest since June 1970.  The total size of Sweden's work force rose to 4.7 million in July from 4.5 million in June and from 4.6 million a year earlier.  The agency said most of the increase since July 1988 was in the trade and public service sectors.  Producer output prices, or prices of manufactured goods, rose 0.3% in July from June, and producer input prices, or prices of raw materials and fuels purchased by manufacturing industry, fell an unadjusted 1.2%, Britain's Central Statistical Office said.  Raoul J. Casciari was named a director, increasing board membership to eight.  Mr. Casciari is a former vice president of this maker of seals and dampers for computers and is currently president of Ensenar, a producer of educational products in the field of mathematics.  Japanese steelmakers turned out a total of about 9.2 million metric tons in July, up 2.8% from a year earlier, the Japan Iron and Steel Federation said.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  The federation said that strong domestic economic growth continued to keep demand for steel high and to keep mills producing higher amounts.  July's year-to-year increase was the fifth in as many months.  July's growth was slower than the 5% year-to-year rise for June, when production totaled about 8.96 billion metric tons.  As has been the case in recent months, crude steel products led the growth, rising 3.4% from a year earlier.  Production of specialty steel products, by contrast, fell 1.6% from a year earlier.  This natural gas pipeline concern appointed George Hugh chief operating officer and Mitchell Graye chief financial officer.  Both are new positions.  Mr. Hugh was senior vice president of the company's pipeline division.  Mr. Graye was treasurer and senior vice president, finance.  TransCanada said Mr. Graye will retain the treasury responsibilities in his new position.  TransCanada also said it appointed Craig Frew as president of its Calgary-based Western Gas Marketing Ltd. unit.  Mr. Frew, formerly vice president of Western Gas Marketing, succeeds C. Kennedy Orr, who becomes a group vice president of TransCanada.  Raymond S. Troubh, a 63-year-old senior adviser of Salomon Inc.'s Salomon Brothers unit, was elected a director of this gold mining firm.  The board increased to 13.  Christoper J. McGill, group manager of Digitial Equipment Corp., was named a director of this laser designer and maker.  His election increases the board to five members.  Jeffrey W. Dentz, 41 years old, was named executive vice president of store operations, a new post at this discount retailer.  Mr. Dentz was previously senior vice president for human resources and administration.  Ames said John Kearney, 35, senior vice president for store operations, resigned to pursue personal interests.  Robert C. Brummer, 44, previously senior vice president and director of human resources for the Zayre Stores division of the former Zayre Corp., succeeds Mr. Dentz as senior vice president for human resources.  Ames acquired the Zayre Stores division in October 1988.  It's tough enough to get dressed for a formal dinner.  But it's getting even tougher.  In the old days, invitations ordered guests to dress in black tie or white tie.  Now there's "California black tie."  The term popped up on invitations to the wedding of screenwriter Winter Horton and art dealer Fred Hoffman later this month.  But some guests are a bit confused.  "A lot of people are asking whether it means they should come from the beach," says Miss Horton, who coined the term.  "It's casual chic.  It's more creative."  Indeed, the invitations follow a steady deterioration in black-tie standards on the West Coast.  Ernie Wolfe, another art dealer, says he plans to wear a pair of tuxedo pants tailored to end at the knees.  He typically wears them with argyle socks, loafers and the standard dinner jacket.  There are lots of variations.  An artist by the name of Gronk has shown up at formal cocktail parties in a tux with a white, plastic dog bone at the neck.  And Richard Tuggle, director of the movie "Tightrope," wears a goose-feather tie and New Balance running shoes with his tux.  Mario Tamayo, owner of the trendy Cafe Mambo, prefers a black and gold bullfighters jacket.  "The black-tie outfit is just so monochromatic with all the men looking the same.  It was done so that women would stand out and be belles of the ball," says Mr. Tamayo with a sigh.  "Now men's outfits are becoming more personalized."  Women aren't always so impressed by a man in California black tie.  When artist Eugenia Butler invited her date to a black-tie party, the comedy writer showed up in a formal dinner jacket, a pair of red shorts, socks and sneakers.  Ms. Butler says her first reaction was "shock and horror.  I was worried about what my friends would think."  But at the party, she says, she noticed that there were several men wearing shorts with dinner jackets so she "began to relax."  Men sporting California black tie, however, clearly thrive on the attention.  Mr. Wolfe says he took a "drop-dead beautiful" woman to a formal opening at the Museum of Contemporary Art here, but most people were staring at his tuxedo shorts and argyle socks.  "A lot of ladies came up to me and said, 'Nice legs]'" he recalls.  That was the end of his date, says Mr. Wolfe.  "She got really mad and left."  MCI Communications Corp. said it was selected to provide Montgomery Ward & Co. with practically a private communications network to connect about 400 Ward locations with the company's Chicago headquarters.  Under terms of the three-year multimillion-dollar contract, MCI will provide voice traffic, 800-number, and calling-card services to stores, offices, and distribution centers of the retail department store chain.  Genzyme Corp. said it completed its previously announced acquisition of Integrated Genetics Inc., Framingham, Mass., in a stock swap valued at about $31.5 million.  Integrated Genetics holders will receive 0.29 Genzyme common share for each Integrated Genetics common share held.  Both companies make biological materials using genetic technology.  Regarding your July 28 article "Washington's Times and Post Do Battle in Scandal Involving 'Call Boys,' Fraud and Social Climbing":  First, the Policy Study Group has never sought "to promote Japanese business interests in the U.S."  Rather, the purpose of PSG always has been to conduct research and analyses on subjects of importance to the economy of Japan and to educate its members on those subjects, thereby contributing to the development of the economy and industry of Japan.  Second, PSG has never lobbied in the U.S., and never hired Craig Spence to lobby on its behalf.  Third, Mr. Spence was terminated by PSG in 1983, and PSG has had no association with him since then.  Randall L. Sarosdy  Akin, Gump, Strauss, Hauer & Feld  Washington  The Canadian Supreme Court, in a long awaited jurisdictional ruling, upheld a claim by Alberta's government-owned telephone utility that it isn't bound by the regulatory provisions of Canada's federal telecommunications law.  The judgment is expected to have a major impact on the future regulation of Canada's telecommunications industry.  But there was disagreement whether it would lead to greater federal control over the provincially regulated telephone companies.  The high court held that although the operations of Alberta Government Telephones (AGT) are federal in scope, it is entitled to immunity from current federal regulation because of its status as a provincial government agency.  The case arose from an application by CNCP Telecommunications to federal regulators for permission to provide business telecommunications services to Alberta customers, through interconnection with the AGT system.  AGT opposed the application and claimed immunity from federal regulation.  CNCP Telecommunications is 60% owned by Canadian Pacific Ltd., a Montreal-based industrial and resource concern, and 40% by Rogers Communications Inc., a Toronto-based communications company.  AGT welcomed the Supreme Court ruling.  But some legal analysts claimed AGT won on a legal technicality that shouldn't be a major obstacle for the Canadian government's efforts to establish a uniform regulatory system for Canada's telecommunications industry.  Jim McDonald, AGT's executive vice president for corporate development, said it was "a very good decision" for AGT, upholding the utility's immunity from federal telecommunications law.  He said it is now up to Canada's political leaders to work out a national telecommunications policy that "recognizes regional differences."  Regulation of Canada's telecommunicationsindustry is highly fragmented.  A federal agency regulates telecommunications in three provinces, Ontario, Quebec, and British Columbia, and provincial agencies handle regulation in the other seven provinces.  But the court ruling may prod federal authorities to enact changes.  The Supreme Court judgment was viewed as "very positive" by Kenneth Engelhart, director of regulatory affairs for the Canadian Business Telecommunications Alliance, which advocates more uniform regulation of Canada's telecommunications industry.  Mr. Engelhart said the judgment made clear that it would take only a one-line amendment to federal law to bring the provincial government-owned telephone utilities under federal regulation.  In a similar vein, George Harvey, president of CNCP Telecommunications, said, "It is clear that the federal government now has the power to implement a national telecommunications policy."  CNCP intends to request approval from federal regulators to compete against Canada's existing telephone monopolies in provision of long-distance telephone services.  Federal Communications Minister Marcel Masse also saw wider implications in the court ruling.  He said, "Now that the Supreme Court has clarified certain aspects of the jurisdictional issues surrounding the regulation of telecommunications, we have the opportunity to establish a Canadian telecommunications framework that serves the interests of all regions."  Your July 20 editorial "Getting Gingrich" proves that far-right conservatives live by the philosophy, "The ends justify the means."  You have one set of ethical standards by which you judge everyone else but yourselves.  Then you abandon those standards in order to justify the means one of you employs to achieve your goals.  We liberal Democrats always will be proud to be expected to live up to the standards by which you judge us.  Newt Gingrich and the radical right should try to prove themselves capable of meeting those higher standards, before applying them so fervently to others.  Jerry Bruno  Silverthorne, Colo.  Hanson PLC, Britain's largest industrial conglomerate, posted a robust 19% advance in fiscal third-quarter pretax profit and announced its first asset sale of Consolidated Gold Fields PLC since acquiring control of the mining group last week.  Chairman Lord Hanson said the company reported "good progress" in both its British and U.S. operations.  "This augurs well for the balance of the year and indeed, for the future," he said.  For the three months ended June 30, profit before tax rose to #295 million ($466.4 million) from #249 million a year earlier.  Singled out for their strong performances were Hanson's chemicals and cranes businesses in the U.S.  For the nine months, pretax profit rose 23% to #742 million from #605 million a year ago.  Hanson also announced that a 30% stake in Gold Fields South Africa held by Consolidated Gold was sold for #368 million to Rembrandt Group Ltd. and Asteroid Pty Ltd., a company jointly owned by Gold Fields South Africa and Driefontein Consolidated Ltd.  The transaction leaves Consolidated Gold with an 8% share in Gold Fields South Africa.  Hanson shares yesterday closed at 241 ($3.81), up half a penny, on the London Stock Exchange.  Volume amounted to nearly four million shares.  Hanson's #3.5 billion ($5.53 billion) offer for Consolidated Gold was the largest takeover bid to succeed in the United Kingdom.  The Hanson victory brought to an end a nearly yearlong struggle for control of the mining house.  Hanson, famous for trans-Atlantic acquisitions and breakups, is expected to recoup its purchase price by dismembering much of Consolidated Gold, the biggest gold-mining concern outside South Africa.  Hanson likely will sell nearly all the company's far-flung mining operations and at least the U.S. half of ARC, a building-materials business that is Consolidated Gold's biggest moneymaker.  As a result, Minorco S.A. may acquire the operations it coveted during its unsuccessful, eight-month fight for Consolidated Gold.  A person close to Hanson suggested the conglomerate might sell to Minorco both the U.S. operations of ARC and Gold Fields Mining Corp., a U.S. unit.  Minorco, controlled by a South African industrial empire, is receiving $1.6 billion from the sale of its 29.9% stake to Hanson.  "In due course, we will do some acquisitions" with the money, Sir Michael Edwardes, Minorco's chief executive, said in a phone interview yesterday.  Minorco and Hanson probably will begin negotiations within 10 days, others close to the companies said.  Several major buildings-materials concerns also might bid for the U.S. gravel and pebble business, analysts said.  Among them: Vulcan Materials Co., based in Birmingham, Ala.; and Beazer PLC and Tarmac PLC of Britain.  Last year, Beazer took over U.S.-based Koppers Co. after a fierce battle.  American Barrick Resources Corp. of Canada has expressed interest in both Gold Fields Mining and Consolidated Gold's 49.3% stake in Newmont Mining Corp., the biggest U.S. gold-mining company.  Placer Dome Inc. of Canada also has told Hanson that it would make a bid for Consolidated Gold's North American gold assets if they became available, a person close to Placer Dome said last month.  Your July 26 article "Riskier Ride" may have misled readers regarding the character of the National Association of Securities Dealers' automated quotation service, or Nasdaq, market.  First, Nasdaq is not becoming a volatile market, as the Journal's own research has found.  In tables recently published (Tracking the "Anxiety Index," Jan. 9 and July 6), the Journal reported that the volatility of Nasdaq as measured by our Composite Index was significantly lower than that for other securities markets, including the New York Stock Exchange.  The research further found that Nasdaq volatility for the first half of 1989 was down significantly from the first half of 1988.  Second, Nasdaq remains the market of the individual investor complemented by a strong institutional presence.  For the past five years the level of institutional participation in Nasdaq, as measured by block volume, has been fairly consistent, ranging from a high of 42.9% of total volume in 1988 to a low of 40.3% in 1984.  For the first six months of this year, it stood at 42.7%.  This means that, contrary to conventional wisdom, both individual- and institutional-investor participation in the Nasdaq market is proportionately the same as it has been for a number of years.  Third, the rapid adjustment of a stock's price to material news is not market volatility, but market efficiency.  Only inadequate adjustment or irregular fluctuations in response to news or swings in the price of a stock in the absence of news is volatility.  Finally, the article also suggests that greater institutional participation results in increased price volatility.  We are not aware of any statistical evidence that institutions as a group cause a stock's price to be more volatile.  In fact, our own data support a major 1971 Securities and Exchange Commission study of the price impact of institutional position changes that found "situations in which an institutional position change may have a price impact seem to be no more frequent than situations in which such a position change tends to offset price impacts with trading imbalances by other market participants" (Volume 4, page 1465, IIS).  Joseph R. Hardiman  President, National Association  of Securities Dealers Inc.  Washington  Your comments on marriage in your July 18 editorial "A Legal Fiction?" include the statement that single men are five times more likely to commit violent crimes than are married men, and carry the connotation that marriage is the major contributing factor in containing violent crime.  It seems just as likely to me that the fact you mention might be the result of a propensity for violent men not to marry, and this might be a valid method of discriminating (no pun intended) between violence-prone and peaceable men.  Further pressure to marry might obscure this indicator.  Nicholas Kelne  Wheaton, Ill.  The Journal recently summarized the national debate over clean-air legislation as a trivial fight for air that's "cleaner than clean" ("The Hot-Air Bill," editorial, Aug. 3).  Nothing could be further from the truth -- just look (or breathe) for yourself.  While the Journal tells us not to worry -- the Environmental Protection Agency tells us smog levels violate federal health standards in more than 100 cities.  The American Academy of Pediatrics tells us smog levels in most cities could scar children's lungs permanently.  Industry tells us it annually releases 2.7 billion pounds of toxic chemicals into the air.  The EPA tells us that levels of toxic air pollutants threaten adults in many areas with cancer risks as high as one in 100.  And health experts from the Harvard School of Public Health tell us that air pollution contributes to one out of every 20 premature deaths in the country.  It is because our air quality is so poor that I have such strong differences with the clean-air legislation that President Bush sent to Congress last month.  My criticisms of the administration proposal are based not on the very minor issues identified by the Journal, but on the fundamental inadequacy of the proposal to address these important public-health problems.  The legislation would repeal provisions protecting the national parks and other clean-air areas from ozone and nitrogenoxide emissions.  It would relax restrictions on the tall smokestacks that foil local regulators by exporting air pollutants to downwind jurisdictions.  And it authorizes the EPA to exempt half of the major sources of toxic emissions from regulation -- permanently.  The single biggest problem with the administration bill is its motor-vehicle provisions.  "Mobile sources" (principally cars and trucks) are the main culprits in most of our air-pollution problems.  They cause more than 70% of carbon-monoxide pollution, 50% of hydrocarbon pollution, 45% of nitrogen-oxide pollution, and 50% of the cancer deaths due to toxic emissions.  They also contribute significantly to global warming and ozone depletion.  Yet the administration bill cut a sweetheart deal with the auto makers that relaxes many of the current motor-vehicle standards.  The bill eliminates the requirement that each car meet pollution standards in favor of a program that would allow car makers to "average" the performance of vehicles.  Since car-company data show that average emissions are now already well below the standards proposed in the administration bill, auto emissions would actually be allowed to increase from today's levels.  Ironically, the administration bill is as big an economic fiasco as an environmental one.  Pollution cutting is a zero-sum game.  What we don't cut from cars, we have to cut from shoe factories and bakeries and other local pollution sources, where pollution control usually costs much more.  Even the EPA's own estimates show that mobile-source controls that the administration bill rejected -- such as requiring that catalytic converters work the full life of the vehicle (100,000 miles), or controlling gasoline evaporation and refueling emissions with "onboard canisters" -- are cheap ways to get pollution reductions.  A case in point is nitrogen-oxide pollution, which contributes to smog, acid rain and particulate pollution.  If the administration bill had adopted, say, the California standards for motor-vehicle nitrogen-oxide emissions, it would have removed an additional 1.3 million tons of nitrogen oxide from our skies at a cost of about $600 a ton ($20 a car).  Now states and cities will have to get these reductions from electric utilities and industrial boilers, where the costs can be as high as $30,000 a ton.  In certain areas, the administration deserves substantial credit.  On acid rain, the administration bill opts for a "freedom-of-choice" approach that should cost-effectively reduce sulfur-dioxide emissions.  And the administration supports a "clean fuels" program that will offer help to a handful of our most polluted cities.  But acid-rain controls in the Midwest are no answer to toxic emissions in Texas and Louisiana or smog levels in New York City and Atlanta.  We can't solve these problems without real pollution-control mandates that are simply missing in the president's bill.  What's at stake isn't air that's "whiter than white" as the Journal suggests -- it's air that pediatricians say is safe for our children to breathe.  Rep. Henry A. Waxman (D., Calif.)  Chairman, House Health and Environment Subcommittee  Washington  The U.S., at the urging of its allies, agreed to add laptops and other kinds of portable computers to the list of high-technology products that Western companies can freely sell to the Soviet bloc and China.  The Commerce Department announced last month that it was lifting export curbs on a wide class of desktop computers.  But the order carrying out that decision adds not only laptops but other, more powerful versions of International Business Machines Corp.'s PS/2 line than the original announcement covered.  The final order is to be published in the Federal Register today and will take effect today.  The original decision, announced July 18 by Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher, provoked a sharp reaction from Defense Secretary Richard Cheney, who told a news conference the following day that he didn't approve of that decision.  The Pentagon declined to comment to the latest ruling.  A Defense Department official involved in export-control issues did acknowledge, however, that the Pentagon was aware that the Commerce Department's latest ruling would go beyond what it announced on July 18.  The new order says the revisions are the result of a review of the July decision by the Coordinating Committee for Multilateral Export Controls, or Cocom, the group through which the U.S. and 16 of its allies restrict trade in highly sensitive western technology.  Some European governments wanted Cocom to go much further than what Mr. Mosbacher had announced, and the revisions appear to be a compromise satisfactory to all the Cocom governments for now.  Laptops and portable computers designed to take rough handling had been excluded at the Pentagon's insistence from the Commerce Department's preliminary order in July.  That order did apply to a whole category of desktop computers, including the widely sold IBM AT models and their clones, freeing them from the need to get export licenses.  Japan stands to benefit from the latest revisions, because Toshiba Corp. and NEC Corp. are among the leading suppliers of laptops.  Compaq Computer Corp. and Zenith Corp. also make laptops.  Other types of portable computers designed for normal office use have been added to the list of liberalized products, but the military versions will continue to be banned for shipment to Soviet bloc countries and China.  By slightly modifying its technical standards, the new order adds the IBM PS/2 Model 50 and its clones to the list of desktops to be taken off the control list.  The earlier decision drew the line at the PS/2 Model 30 and their equivalents.  Both IBM models operate on Intel Corp.'s 80286 microprocessors, but the Model 50 can handle more sophisticated software.  The U.S. decision to remove controls from these products is based on a Commerce Department determination that equivalent models are freely exported by many non-Cocom countries, including Taiwan, India, China and Brazil.  The order retains the existing curbs on shipments to a number of countries that pose foreign-policy problems for the U.S., including Libya, Cuba and Vietnam.  The final order also restricts shipment to military and police organizations and certain other types of consignees in Nicaragua, Panama and South Africa.  The order also clarifies what can't be shipped to the Soviet bloc.  For instance, it retains strict controls on certain "stand-alone" graphic workstations, even if they are comparable in power to the liberalized desktops.  The order also requires that the liberalized computers be shipped to the Soviet bloc as "complete systems," and not broken down into components that could be used for other than civilian purposes.  A few weeks ago, the State Department was expressing optimism that some of its Mideast contacts might prove helpful in winning the release of U.S. hostages in Lebanon.  Well, time marches on and that wished-for help isn't arriving very quickly.  In Iran, the new chief ayatollah, named Khamenei, polished his credentials for the job by contradicting suggestions from elsewhere in the government that Iran might say a few words to the Hezbollah kidnappers.  The ayatollah asserted, in effect, that so far as he is concerned, the U.S. remains the Great Satan.  Elsewhere, the Soviets ignored a State Department protest and testfired an ICBM with a dummy warhead across the Hawaiian archipelego near the islands of Necker and Nihoa.  And the Syrians, those other helpful folk, became engaged elsewhere, launching another brutal shelling attack against the Lebanese Christians.  No doubt State's new friends would be nicer if there weren't so many other things on their minds.  Individual investors are always told, "Buy low, sell high."  But those who take that adage too literally may be shooting themselves in the portfolio.  While many people prefer stocks costing $10 a share or less, some professional investors say that the best bargains are frequently found among stocks costing $50 a share or more -- sometimes, a whole lot more.  Just ask Richard F. Smith III, president of Review Management Co. in Port Washington, Pa., which operates Over-the-Counter Securities Fund.  The fund's holdings include AMFI Corp. (recently $16,000 a share), St. Joe Paper Co. ($15,000), A.D. Makepeace Co. ($5,500), Young's Market Co. ($3,000) and Cal-Maine Foods Inc. ($1,000).  All of these are thinly traded issues quoted in the "pink sheets" published by a unit of Commerce Clearing House Inc.  One of Mr. Smith's favorite stocks is Anderson Tully Co., which costs $95,000 a share.  "If you looked at Anderson Tully Co. on a straight fundamental basis, you wouldn't touch the stock," he says.  After all, he expects the company, which harvests hardwood timber in the Mississippi River valley, to earn a mere $1,700 a share this year.  That means the stock is selling for more than 50 times earnings, or more than triple the price/earnings ratio of the average stock.  It's the value of the company's timberland -- which he estimates at $250,000 a share -- that attracts Mr. Smith.  Someday, he hopes, that value will be realized, perhaps through asset sales, or a merger or an acquisition.  Although he thinks it's "kind of strange," Mr. Smith has concluded that bargains, usually asset plays, are fairly frequent among high-priced stocks.  "I don't know any reason why they should be," he says, "but they are."  Just having a high price doesn't automatically make a stock a good deal, of course.  Because really pricey stocks are "very, very thinly traded," Mr. Smith says, they may easily be mispriced -- for better or worse.  Even when high-priced stocks seem to possess hidden values, making money from them isn't always easy.  In 1985, Mr. Smith's fund went to court against Simpson Timber Co. in a valuation dispute.  With the stock then trading at $50,000 a share, Simpson's management, which owned most of the shares, offered the fund $75,000 a share for its stake.  The fund claimed that the shares were really worth close to $300,000 apiece.  It demanded a new appraisal and ultimately received $200,000 a share in a settlement.  Most money managers don't go for issues as high-priced as those Mr. Smith prefers.  But several say that higher-priced stocks -- those selling, say, for more than $50 or $100 -- can be good deals.  When stocks surpass $100 a share, "It seems to give them an upward lift, as perverse as that sounds," says Mark Leibovit, editor of Volume Reversal Survey, a market newsletter in Sedona, Ariz.  Dan Sullivan, who edits Chartist, a newsletter in Seal Beach, Calif., says he's observed the same thing.  "It seems that once a stock gets above $100, it really takes off," he says.  "I've seen this happen time and time again."  Such personal observations might be tainted by the phenomenon that people remember best things that seem odd, or things that appear to fall into a recognized pattern.  But a statistical comparison is also kind to high-priced stocks.  Wilshire Associates, at the request of this newspaper, recently compared the performance of the 99 highest-priced stocks in its data base (which includes about 5,800 actively traded stocks) with a similar number of medium-priced and cheap stocks.  The high-priced issues edged out the medium-priced ones by a nose.  Low-priced issues crawled in far behind.  The Wilshire study doesn't prove definitively that high-priced stocks are superior to low-priced ones.  For one thing, it covers only a single 19-month time period.  But the study does suggest that investors who automatically rule out high-priced stocks aren't doing themselves any favor.  Besides performance, an individual investor needs to consider what it costs to buy and sell the stocks.  Here, too, high-priced issues have an edge.  "If you look at commission schedules, the average broker is paid considerably more, percentagewise, for buying or selling low-priced stocks," says Ricky Herrington, chief technical analyst for Interstate/Johnson Lane, a Charlotte, N.C., brokerage house.  In addition, Mr. Herrington notes, the spread between the bid price (the price at which a broker-dealer will buy a stock from an individual) and the asked price (the price at which a broker-dealer will sell an individual a stock) is much higher, in percentage terms, for low-priced issues than for high-priced ones.  All in all, Mr. Herrington says, "Brokers are going to be less inclined" to recommend high-priced issues, simply because they're less profitable to sell.  Not that individual investors usually need much pushing to stay away from higher-priced issues.  "It's difficult for the customer to get really excited about a $50 stock," says Mort Brown, director of research for Edward D. Jones & Co., a St. Louis brokerage house.  "I don't think there is any doubt that there is great reticence on the part of individuals and retail brokers to deal with stocks above $50 a share."  One reason is simply that it's hard for individual investors of limited means to diversify their portfolios by buying several high-priced issues.  At the same time, intuition suggests that low-priced stocks have more room to grow than high-priced stocks do.  Starting from a small base, they seem to offer more promise for significant gains.  Whatever the reasons, Mr. Brown says he thinks it's unfortunate that so many investors avoid higher-priced stocks.  "You've got some tremendous companies that are $50 and above.  And individuals get less exposure to those stocks.  They get more exposure to the lower priced stocks, some of which are very good and some of which aren't."  If you watch any of the Sunday public affairs shows such as "Meet the Press," you've no doubt seen a commercial in which a soothing announcer says, "When Americans reach for sugar, they get a pretty good deal."  The spiel goes on to compare what U.S. consumers pay for sugar with what is charged in consumer-hostile Japan.  What it doesn't say is that the ad's sponsor is a major booster of sugar-import quotas that fleece the average American family of four to the tune of $100 a year.  The sponsor is Archer-Daniels-Midland, a leading producer of high-fructose corn sweeteners that are used in products such as soft drinks.  Corn sweeteners are competitive only at the quota-inflated price of sugar, and that explains why ADM has been pumping ad dollars into those Sunday morning shows that are watched by Beltway elites.  Sugar quotas expire next year, and this June the council governing the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade ruled that the quotas violate world trade rules.  The quotas restrict low-cost imports to only 8% of the sugar consumed by Americans.  The 11,400 U.S. sugar-beet and sugar-cane growers also get a sugar support price of 24 cents a pound -- twice the world price.  President Bush is likely to go along with the GATT ruling and seek an end to the quotas.  To do otherwise would lay the U.S. open to charges of hypocrisy in its criticism of foreign trade barriers.  But the sugar growers and their corporate allies such as ADM aren't giving up easily.  Sugar-grower PACs doled out well over $2 million to Congress in the last two elections, and Members know the PACs will raise Cain if they even touch the quotas.  Sugar growers are also stockpiling new statistics that purport to show that the sugar and corn-sweetener industries directly create at least 75,411 full-time jobs nationwide.  It's true that an end to quotas would mean some dislocation of workers, but not nearly as much as the quotas themselves create.  The Commerce Department recently estimated that it costs $76,000 to save just one job in the sugar industry, and even that won't preserve it forever.  The inflated price of U.S. sugar has allowed producers to mechanize their operations and sharply reduce their labor needs.  Louisiana has cut its sugar workforce from 15,000 to 4,000 in just 10 years.  High-priced sugar also destroys jobs in the soft drink and candy manufacturing industries.  Democratic Representative Jim Moody says sugar quotas are "devastating" candy makers in his Wisconsin district because foreign manufacturers can buy sugar for much less than America's inflated price.  The chocolate and confectionery industries alone employ more than 60,000 people nationwide.  Democratic Senator Bill Bradley plans to lead the fight to strip sugar quotas out of the 1990 farm bill.  President Bush should lend his wholehearted support, especially since the sugar growers will no doubt be sweetening the pot of campaign cash they give to Members of Congress.  ADM is already doing its bit to keep the quotas alive.  It has unveiled a new commercial in its normal Sunday morning time slot.  This one shows a man climbing a staircase representing the amount of time consumers in other countries must work to buy a pound of sugar.  The last few steps represent economic basketcases such as Argentina and Poland.  Funny, we thought one of the reasons those countries were in so much trouble was their indiscriminate use of subsidies.  Once a month, about two dozen business lobbyists meet here in the law offices of Steptoe & Johnson to discuss what one participant calls "deforming the tax code."  The comment is tinged with irony.  Most members of the coffee klatch are former congressional staffers who, just a few years ago, helped draft the biggest overhaul of the federal income-tax code in more than half a century, the Tax Reform Act of 1986.  Since the big bill passed, fully half of the top tax aides to members of the congressional tax-writing committees have left their Capitol Hill jobs to lobby for many of the same corporate interests that were the bill's biggest victims.  Most of the aides who have left the tax committees' own staffs since then also lobby for corporations.  Few of these former aides see anything wrong or even unusual about the transformation.  But the fact that the revolving door so often leads from the tax-writing committees to the corporate world raises -- and perhaps answers -- some increasingly asked questions about why big-moneyed interests have so much success being heard on Capitol Hill.  "It's obscene," contends Rep. Fortney Stark of California, a liberal Democrat and a senior member of the tax-writing House Ways and Means Committee.  "They {former aides} have just sold out for the big bucks to take on special-interest tax deductions on behalf of huge corporations and rich people."  Former aides "have a special kind of access," says Ellen Miller, executive director of the Center for Responsive Politics, a bipartisan, public-interest research group.  "When you work with someone in that staff-member relationship, you develop a closeness that continues off of the Hill.  It raises real questions in the public mind about who's in charge here and who's being represented."  Some ex-aides have returned to their old haunts to undo some of the tax provisions they helped put into the 1986 law.  John Jonas, a former Democratic staffer with the House Ways and Means Committee who is now with the law firm of Patton, Boggs & Blow, has lobbied on behalf of graduate schools to restore some of the favorable tax treatment the legislation removed from scholarships.  And Kenneth Kies, a former GOP Ways and Means staffer now with the law firm of Baker & Hostetler, has lobbied for an Ohio company to win an exception to the minimum-tax law that he helped devise.  More often, aides-turned-lobbyists function as staff-on-loan to former bosses, many times focusing on issues they dealt with when they were still on the congressional payroll.  Richard Merski left the office of Rep. Richard Schulze (R., Pa.) shortly before the Tax Reform Act began to make its way through the House Ways and Means Committee in the fall of 1985.  As a lobbyist for American International Group, an insurance-holding concern, he stays in touch with his old office.  "Lobbyists are important as informational sources, and Rich has been very helpful," says Robert Hartwell, the aide who took over for Mr. Merski in 1985, and whom Mr. Merski recommended for his job.  "When I have a question or questions on insurance-tax provisions, I'll call Rich Merski and the Congressional Research Service, and I'll get a balanced view to give the congressman."  Becoming a lobbyist is increasingly part of the career plans of congressional staffers.  Taking a job on Capitol Hill "became more of a means to an end while I was there," agrees Carolyn Blaydes, a former tax aide to Rep. Thomas Downey (D., N.Y.).  "People coming up {as staffers} see it as a way to move up, become a lobbyist and probably double their salary."  Adds David Rayboy, former top tax aide to Sen. William Roth (R., Del.) and now a lobbyist with Patton, Boggs & Blow: "It's almost like an internship for a doctor. . . .  It's a card you have to punch."  Most of the congressional tax aides from the 1986-bill era who haven't become lobbyists still work in government.  The issue of the "revolving door" is hot these days.  As part of the unfolding scandal at the Department of Housing and Urban Development, former lawmakers and government officials are confessing to favor-seeking.  And in Congress, bills are moving that would limit lobbying by former government aides.  It is difficult to pinpoint what effect, if any, such job-switching wreaks on the legislative process.  One possible result, some say, is a more-complicated tax code.  "I'm not saying people consciously said, 'I'm going to make this thing as complicated as I can so they'll need me out there and pay me big bucks,'" says Rep. Andrew Jacobs (D., Ind.).  "But that obviously is rich soil for further employment," he contends.  Former staffers also have a greater chance of being listened to, another major benefit to their corporate clients.  "They know you, and they return your phone calls," says Mary Beth Riordan, a lobbyist for the law firm Verner Liipfert Bernhard McPherson & Hand, and a former aide to Rep. Raymond McGrath (R., N.Y.).  "It's definitely an advantage."  Current and former staffers form a fraternity of sorts, a network of friendships, in which the common gossip is information about legislation -- a valuable commodity.  "You are part of the community," says Julie Rabinowitz, a lawyer with Groom & Nordberg, who was a tax aide to Sen. Roth and to Sen. Charles Grassley (R., Iowa).  "It's really a very tiny world," adds Sharon Cranford, a former tax staffer to Rep. Frank Guarini (D., N.J.), who is now a tax analyst here with Coopers & Lybrand, an accounting firm.  "We all have to be good because you never know where you'll be next."  Union Carbide Chemicals & Plastics Co., a Union Carbide Corp. unit, said it completed the purchase of BP Chemicals' silicone surfactant business.  Terms of the deal, originally announced in June, weren't disclosed.  Included in the purchase were production facilities in Belgium and the U.K. and research and development activities in Switzerland.  Union Carbide and BP, a unit of British Petroleum Co., London, are chemical concerns.  Silicone surfactants are used in making the urethane foam found in furniture and insulation, among other things.  Franklin Resources Inc. said it is negotiating with Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. to acquire Equitable's interest in Tandem Financial Group Inc.  New York-based Equitable owns 50% of Tandem, a New York-based insurance company specializing in single-premium deferred annuities, a Franklin Resources spokesman said.  Any acquisition would be subject to regulatory approvals and execution of a definitive agreement.  Franklin Resources, an investment management concern, hopes to conclude talks by the end of September, the spokesman said.  Hopper Soliday Corp. said it completed its purchase of Guaranty Trust Co., of Harrisburg, Pa., for an amount that wasn't disclosed.  Hopper Soliday, a financial-services holding company, said the non-depository trust company has been renamed Surety Trust Co.  Jeffrey W. Kronthal was named co-head of the mortgage trading desk at this securities firm's mortgage capital operation.  He had been head of fixed-income sales and trading at L.F. Rothschild Inc. since last year.  He previously was a managing director of trading on the mortgage desk of Salomon Brothers Inc., a unit of Salomon Inc. Thomas Hughes, who had been sole head of the desk at Merrill Lynch, will take on additional responsibilities, including trading of structured finance and pass-through products.  John E. Guth Jr. was elected chairman and Michael B. Savitske was elected president, chief executive officer and a director.  The wire and machinery products company said Gerald H. Frieling Jr., who had been chairman, chief executive and president, retired.  A spokesman said the retirement of Mr. Frieling, 59 years old, was voluntary.  Mr. Guth, 60, has been a board member since 1972.  Mr. Savitske, 47, had been chief operating officer.  Each day for years, Katherine Hudson walked past the personal-computer storeroom at Eastman Kodak Co. headquarters and saw cartons of equipment spilling into the hallway.  Now, as the director of corporate information systems, she has decided that that mess should be somebody else's problem.  She hired Businessland Inc. to take over Kodak's personal-computer operations nationwide.  She also hired International Business Machines Corp. to set up and operate a data-processing center that will take over the work -- and employees -- of four Kodak centers.  And she is looking into hiring outsiders to run Kodak's software and telecommunications operations.  Kodak is in the photographic-products business, she says, not the computer business.  She wants to deal with computer companies the same way she would deal with electric utilities or the phone company: She wants to be able to plug into a wall and have data come out.  Such thinking puts Kodak in the vanguard of a movement reshaping the computer industry.  Hardware and software companies that have simply pushed the technology as hard and as fast as they could are finding that that isn't enough any longer.  At the least, they must tailor their products better to customers' problems.  And some companies are getting intimately involved with their customers' business -- such as the arrangement among IBM, Businessland and Kodak.  "If you're going to deal with us," says Arnold Birenbaum, the general manager of Bank of America's information center, "you're going to do it on our terms and come to understand our problems.  We can't do business the way we did before."  Growth in spending on computers is slowing for many reasons -- including concern about a possible recession soon -- but some customers cite a more fundamental cause.  Increasingly, they are bewildered by the rapid pace of technological change, and they hesitate to spend millions of dollars on equipment that might be obsolete next year.  At the same time, they worry that they aren't making the best use of computers they already have.  While figuring out what to do, many have slowed their spending on equipment -- as the computer industry's generally weak first-half results indicate -- and increased their spending on services.  Input Inc., a market-research firm in Mountain View, Calif., says the systems-integration business is growing 25% a year and will exceed $14.7 billion in five years, up from a robust $4.8 billion in 1988.  Systems management -- a cousin of systems integration, in which a customer contracts with an outsider to run its computer operations -- will grow 20% annually and go to $11.9 billion in 1993 from about $4 billion in 1988, Input predicts.  By contrast, even the fast-growing personal-computer industry is generally expected to grow by little more than 15% this year and more slowly thereafter.  "Many companies are finding it impossible to keep up with the demands of providing training and solving the endless problems that come up when they try to operate their own computer system," says Naomi Karten, a computer consultant in Randolph, Mass.  "Companies are getting hopelessly bogged down running their own systems, and they are increasingly willing to pay the price to be relieved of these headaches, which show no signs of diminishing."  So is the federal government, the first big customer to contract out most of its computer operations.  "We aren't married to a single product line, and we can take advantage of new technology more quickly" by farming out computer operations, says Robert J. Woods, director of information management for the Transportation Department, which hires Unisys Corp. to run its Washington computer center.  Many software developers and computer manufacturers already act as if they have switched smoothly to a services approach.  It's a rare company whose marketing people don't say, in their most sincere voices, "Our competitors sell boxes, but we sell solutions."  But these companies are still just feeling their way.  For example, they have recently made impressive progress in image-processing, a hot area because it will let companies process huge volumes of documents far more efficiently than they currently can.  Many computer makers have assumed that their customers would snap up such an innovation as quickly as possible.  But none has put the pieces together in a way that many customers find compelling -- to the chagrin of computer companies such as Wang Laboratories, which has bet its future on image-processing.  "We're on a plateau in use of technology, and it's going to take us a long time to move off it," says Larry Bacon, a senior vice president at Travelers Corp., an insurer sophisticated in data-processing technology.  And Mr. Birenbaum of Bank of America believes that the ability to add complex but minor improvements does little for the average computer-using company.  The computer industry, he says, shouldn't act as if it means much if "one company is six months ahead of another on some feature that only 1% of our users would need anyway."  The customers' change of heart reflects a general change in corporate America over the past few years.  Restructuring has forced companies to narrow their focus and to cut costs -- and then cut them further.  Hibernia Corp., the parent of Louisiana's largest bank, recently signed a Kodak-like agreement with IBM because it found that the mainframes that run its business require constant, expert and costly attention.  In addition, computer technology is changing so fast that keeping up with it is a full-time job.  A Hibernia spokesman -- who described the agreement as a utility contract, "almost as if we were buying power or phone service" -- says the cost savings will be "substantial."  Kodak's Ms. Hudson -- who is sending pink socks to the IBMers who worked with her to show that their offer, well, knocked her socks off -- says more than 1,000 people could be moved off her payroll if related operations are, in fact, handed over to outsiders.  She figures that Kodak would have had difficulty keeping them anyway.  Competition for skilled people is stepping up, and, she says, "if you're a really good technical person, do you think you'll have your best career at a photography company or a computer company?"  Perhaps reflecting that, many of the 275 employees going over to IBM put "Welcome to IBM Country" signs on their desks.  Similarly, Bill Shannon, director of planning and information resources at Pitney Bowes's business-systems operation, says that having outsiders handle software training and support lets him provide expertise to users that he couldn't afford on his own.  He says that a few years ago, when Pitney Bowes was upgrading from one version of Lotus 1-2-3 to another, controllers and analysts in the different divisions would often find that they couldn't combine their spreadsheets because they had used different versions.  "That got pretty screwy for a while," Mr. Shannon says.  He has turned the mess over to Corporate Software Inc., a Westwood, Mass., company with an upgrade-coordinating program that ironed out the problem. (IBM, in turn, has decided to get out of the postal business and has turned over to Pitney Bowes some mailroom operations.)  As the shift to services continues, major computer makers may face new competition.  Customers wary of handing over their computer operations to computer makers are turning instead to the growing number of independent firms specializing in weaving together hybrid systems from competing manufacturers.  Andersen Consulting, a unit of the Arthur Andersen & Co. accounting firm, sees its computer-services revenue growing to more than $1.4 billion in its Aug. 31 fiscal year, from about $1.05 billion last year.  Electronic Data Systems, a computer-services pioneer acquired by General Motors Corp. in 1984, posted 30% revenue growth in its non-GM business last year.  And the giant Bell telephone companies, which have been forbidden by court order from building computer equipment, are pushing into services in a big way.  Michael Keen, Tandem Computer's director of internal PC support, has seen some immediate benefits in an increasingly service-oriented approach by his suppliers.  Tandem, with 6,000 personal computers on its own employees' desktops, has taken advantage of training and field-support services that cost less -- and cause fewer headaches -- than a traditional company-sponsored program.  Tandem, he says, is demanding that suppliers "provide us with more comprehensive services.  It's a dog-eat-dog world out there right now, and they are responding."  John Oltman, director of Andersen's systems-integration unit, concludes that the drive to systems integration and management "is fundamentally transforming the computer industry into a more service-oriented industry rather than one driven purely by products or technology."  Halliburton Co. said its Brown & Root Inc. unit completed the acquisition from Santa Fe International Corp. of C F Braun Inc. of Alhambra, Calif.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Halliburton is a diversified oil field services concern and C F Braun is a process engineering concern.  After spending 15 years and investing billions of dollars, America's alternative-energy industry is selling out to Japanese and European concerns -- just as some experts believe alternative technologies may start to pay off.  The sell-off gathered pace this month when Atlantic Richfield Co. ended a 12-year, $200 million effort to become the world's largest maker of photovoltaic, or solar, panels by agreeing to sell Arco Solar to West Germany's Siemens AG.  Other foreign companies snapping up alternative-energy technologies and companies in the U.S. include Hitachi Ltd., Toshiba Corp., Tokyo Electric Co., Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd. and Sumitomo Corp. Foreign banks and investors have also taken positions in American companies unable to obtain financing in the U.S.  In some cases, U.S. concerns have withdrawn from the alternative-energy market.  "It's a national disgrace," says Republican Rep. Claudine Schneider, ranking minority member on the House natural-resources subcommittee.  "There is a vast global market potential for renewable {energy} technology.  The U.S. should be in the lead.  Instead, we're dragging our feet."  Prompting the American retreat has been a growing belief that oil prices are unlikely to soar again to the point where alternative fuels become economically viable.  Skyrocketing oil prices during the 1973 Arab oil embargo spurred Washington to develop solar, wind, geothermal, fuel-cell and other alternative technologies.  But in recent years, fossil-fuel prices have been too low for these alternative-energy sources to compete.  Arco, for example, believes the future of solar-electric power is questionable, given that predictions of $50-a-barrel oil in the late 1980s haven't materialized, a spokesman says.  Nonetheless, accidents such as Chernobyl and the Exxon Valdez tanker spill, plus fear of ozone depletion and the greenhouse effect, have heightened global concern for the environment -- especially in Europe, where the ecological movement has gained increasing political clout.  While it's not certain that such concern will translate into a booming alternative-energy business in the 1990s, foreign interest in commercializing alternative-energy technology is running high.  "The rest of the world is willing to act on its {environmental} concerns, while we wait for a 99.9% confidence level," says Charles Gay, president of Arco Solar.  Hitachi, for example, isn't worried about today's energy prices.  U.S. solar officials say Hitachi doesn't expect its fledgling solar water-heater business to turn a profit for 20 years.  West Germany, meanwhile, has a 50-year government program aimed at harnessing the sun that beats down on the Sahara Desert.  But in South Windsor, Conn., International Fuel Cells Corp. -- whose chairman, William Podolny, is considered by many to be the godfather of fuel-cell technology -- doesn't have that luxury of time. (A fuel cell takes natural gas -- or gas from garbage, wood chips and other so-called biomass material -- and efficiently turns it into electricity through a chemical reaction.)  When the Reagan administration cut off International Fuel Cell's research funding in the 1985, United Technologies Corp. -- which owns 89.5% of International Fuel Cells -- wouldn't take up the slack.  Neither would any U.S. utility.  In 1986, Mr. Podolny turned to Japan's Toshiba, which took a 10.5% equity position, and to Tokyo Electric, which agreed to play host to demonstration projects for the U.S. company's technology.  Today, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's climate-change division director, John Hoffman, is promoting an industry task force to build momentum for alternative-energy development.  But the Department of Energy says there's no federal money for that.  At a recent conference in Washington, DOE's deputy assistant secretary for renewable energy, Robert San Martin, acknowledged that Washington needs to be concerned about "very, very difficult {foreign} competition."  But his qualifier -- that DOE "only has so many resources" -- brought derisive laughter from the audience.  U.S. banks also are increasingly reluctant to get involved.  When California Energy Co.'s chairman, Charles Condy, went looking for financing for a big geothermal project in 1987, "We couldn't get to first base with any U.S. banks," he says.  "They didn't want to take the risk."  But one day while Mr. Condy was in London, an envelope was left at his hotel.  Inside was an offer from Credit Suisse for some $350 million in project financing -- attractive to Mr. Condy because the Swiss bank was willing to make the loan without taking an equity stake.  Still, while California Energy is now financially secure, a San Mateo, Calif., competitor, Geothermal Resources International Inc., said in June that four units that own its Coldwater Creek project had to file for Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection from creditors.  "Renewable-energy technology is on the brink of exploding, but a lot of U.S. companies probably won't be around when that happens," says Susan Williams of Investor Responsibility Research Center, a Washington, D.C., economic analysis service.  Of more than 100 companies profiled in the center's 1986 study of the U.S. alternative-energy industry, 35 have disappeared from a 1989 update.  Biggest casualty: the wind-power industry, whose companies had the most trouble coping with the loss, in 1985, of federal tax credits for alternative-energy projects.  Some big U.S. companies have simply dropped out.  General Electric Co. has departed both the fuel-cell business and the geothermal-equipment business.  Westinghouse Electric Corp., which developed the world's first solar panels for the U.S. space program, also quit solar power several years ago.  Japan, meanwhile, is attacking on all fronts.  "I must have a Japanese company a month coming through, offering to buy my company," says John Corsi, president of Solarex Corp., a maker of solar panels in Rockville, Md.  Mr. Corsi adds: "The U.S. is still ahead in photovoltaics, but the rest of the world is gaining.  The potential is there for real trouble if we don't get more support from Washington."  Solarex's sales grew 35% in 1988 to about $30 million, with overseas sales accounting for two-thirds of the total, a spokesman says.  Meanwhile, Mitsubishi and Toshiba have provided financing and supplied equipment to the U.S. geothermal market, while Kamata Ltd. and Mitsui & Co. recently acquired 80% of Double Energy Co., a California maker of residential cogeneration units. (Cogeneration produces electricity and steam heat from a single fuel source such as garbage or natural gas.  Coupled with a fuel cell, it could someday eliminate the need for utility-supplied electricity, its proponents claim.)  And Nippon Electric Glass Co. and Sanyo Electric Co., have developed what Scott Sklar, the U.S. solar industry's Washington lobbyist, thinks will be among the hottest solar products of the 1990s.  Nippon's "smart glass" is an office-building window with an embedded microchip and a photovoltaic-film coating that can automatically darken the glass while at the same time lighting an office.  Sanyo's "solar shingles" are like ordinary roofing shingles except they also convert sunlight into electricity, supplying roughly half a home's electrical needs, Sanyo claims.  Japanese and European governments and banks are priming the pump world-wide for alternative energy.  Japan has told Mexico it will drill a geothermal field for free if Mexico commits to buying the equipment to put the field into production.  Japan also has set up schools in Mali, Kenya and Djibouti to teach the use of solar power to pump water for irrigation.  Denmark is promoting wind power in India, Egypt and Jordan.  Sweden and even Syria are pushing biomass projects that turn organic materials into energy.  And Germany's Deutsche Bank AG and Britain's Barclays Bank PLC are among the many international banks providing financing for alternative-energy projects.  U.S. alternative-energy advocates mark the start of the U.S. industry's decline to that day in 1981 when President Reagan took down the solar water-heating panels that President Carter had installed atop the White House.  "By the year 2000," says Mr. Sklar, the U.S. solar-industry lobbyist, "I'll still have a job, but all my members will be Japanese and European."  Memory Lame  It is a subtle change,  A secret I must unlock:  How quickly a mental note  Becomes a mental block.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Candid Comment  It used to be that death and taxes alone were inevitable.  Now there's shipping and handling.  -- Bert Murray.  --  True Lit  These days, the wages of sin depend on what kind of deal you make with the publisher.  -- Ivern Ball.  President P.W. Botha relinquished power last night in the same defiant manner that he has wielded it over the past 11 years.  And in so doing he has knocked the ruling National Party on the defensive just three weeks before a tough parliamentary election.  Mr. Botha, who suffered a stroke in January and was expected to resign shortly after the Sept. 6 election, abruptly quit after being abandoned by his cabinet in a bizarre and unseemly power struggle with F.W. de Klerk, his 53-year-old heir apparent and the National Party leader.  In a televised announcement, Mr. Botha, 73, a leading figure in the party for the past half century, scolded and belittled his former colleagues, who, he said, suggested he should use his health as a reason for leaving office.  "I am not prepared to leave on a lie," Mr. Botha said.  "It is evident to me that after all my years of endeavors for the National Party and the government of this country and the security of South Africa that I am now being ignored by ministers serving in my cabinet."  The leadership struggle erupted over the weekend when Mr. de Klerk and foreign minister Pik Botha said they had arranged a meeting with Zambian President Kenneth Kaunda for Aug. 28.  President Botha said that he hadn't been properly informed of the meeting and that he opposed it.  In his speech, he said that Mr. Kaunda provides aid and protection to the Zambia-based African National Congress, the main guerrilla group fighting to overthrow the South African government, and that Mr. Kaunda is a leading advocate of international economic sanctions against South Africa.  He said Mr. Kaunda would use the meeting to promote negotiations between the National Party and the ANC, banned in South Africa since 1960.  "I am of the opinion that it is inopportune to meet with Kenneth Kaunda at this time," Mr. Botha said.  Mr. Botha's remarks are sure to become campaign fodder for the National Party's two opponents, especially the right-wing Conservative Party, which opposes any contact with the ANC and any concessions to the country's black majority.  The liberal Democratic Party will certainly jump on Mr. de Klerk's feud with Mr. Botha as evidence that the National Party is no longer fit to rule after controlling the government for 41 years.  Mr. de Klerk is due to be sworn in today as acting president, and then he will have his hands full trying to make sure he holds on to the position.  Even before the power struggle erupted, political analysts were speculating that growing support for the two opposition parties had an outside chance of depriving the National Party of a parliamentary majority.  In the case of a hung Parliament, Mr. de Klerk would be forced to form a coalition with the left or the right.  He tried to take the sting out of Mr. Botha's bitter resignation announcement by saying that it was a "sad day" and expressing "appreciation" for the president's service to South Africa.  Still, he is hoping that his leadership qualities have been enhanced by standing up to Mr. Botha, whose style had become increasingly imperious and unpredictable since the stroke.  In a televised interview, Mr. de Klerk said that Mr. Botha's "memory is sometimes at fault," and added that his resignation "is in the best interest of South Africa."  Mr. de Klerk also argued that he wasn't changing the National Party's position on the ANC, reiterating that the ANC can't join negotiations over the country's future until it abandons violence and pledges to work toward peace.  Pik Botha, the foreign minister, said the meeting with Mr. Kaunda would take place as planned, and he described it as another important step in the National Party's push to end South Africa's isolation.  In the past several months, Mr. de Klerk has met with several European leaders, including British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher and West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl.  He has also met with Mozambican President Joaquim Chissano, and is hoping that the talks with Mr. Kaunda will lead to a summit with other southern African nations.  The Nasdaq over-the-counter market, like the blue-chip issues on the New York Stock Exchange, fell in languid trading.  The Nasdaq Composite Index dropped 2.49, or 0.5%, to 459.99 on 100.4 million shares.  The volume was well below Nasdaq's 132.5 million-share daily average for the year through July 31.  By comparison, the Dow Jones Industrial Average slipped 0.2%, and the Big Board composite index was down 0.5%.  In what Big Board traders called light volume, only about 142 million shares changed hands on the New York Stock Exchange.  A. Cuyler Kline, managing director of OTC trading at Robinson-Humphrey Co. in Atlanta, said OTC issues traded in tandem with bigger issues on the New York Exchange.  He characterized both markets' declines as a "normal retracement after a pretty good advance."  Mr. Kline agreed with other analysts who blamed much of the pullback on investor disappointment that the Federal Reserve appears unwilling now to set in motion policies that will lead to lower interest rates.  But Mr. Kline also saw some encouraging signs.  "The {market's} tone is definitely up," he said, noting that the decline occurred on light volume.  "After the early selling, I saw some investors nibbling at stocks."  Nevertheless, Nasdaq's biggest issues were big losers.  The non-financial issues, as measured in the Nasdaq 100 Index, tumbled 2.99 to 429.62.  The Nasdaq Financial Index declined 2.74 to 459.72.  Among the broader Nasdaq industry indexes, only the bank group -- consisting of hundreds of small commercial banks but excluding most thrifts and the large regional banks -- was up.  It rose 0.25 to 488.66.  El Paso Electric eased 1/4 to 8 1/8.  The utility said it had a second-quarter loss from continuing operations of $5.6 million and a loss from discontinued operations of $24.4 million, making a net loss of $30 million.  In the year-earlier quarter, El Paso Electric had net income of $18.5 million, or 44 cents a share.  McGill Manufacturing jumped 5 3/4 to 57 after BroadBeach Associates, a securities firm based in Los Angeles, proposed acquiring the bearings and electrical specialty products maker for $62 a share.  BroadBeach already owns 101,295 McGill shares, or 7% of the company.  Semiconductor stocks were mixed.  Intel fell 5/8 to 30 1/8, and Applied Materials dropped 7/8 to 24.  But Cirrus Logic was unchanged at 14 1/2, Integrated Device Technology rose 1/8 to 9 5/8, and Dallas Semiconductor rose 1/4 to 8 3/8.  The semiconductor industry association said Friday that the industry's book-to-bill ratio of shipments to orders dropped last month from June's levels.  Some analysts had been expecting the slide, however.  They said it reflects seasonal doldrums, sagging chip prices and flat demand.  Code Alarm gained 3/8 to 17 1/2.  A spokeswoman for the maker of electronic security and alarm systems told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report that a buy recommendation from Furman Selz Mager Dietz & Birney apparently was responsible for the stock's recent advance.  North-West Telecommunications jumped 2 1/2 to 26 1/2.  The company said it rejected an offer, from a firm it wouldn't identify, to negotiate a stock-swap merger that it said was for more than the current market price of its stock.  North-West said the offer later was withdrawn.  Its management said it hasn't made a decision to give up control of the company, although it hired Morgan Stanley as a financial adviser to explore "strategic alternatives."  Japanese businesses revised upward their plans for equipment and plant investments for the year ending next March, according to a survey by the Nihon Keizai Shimbun, a business journal.  Companies said they would increase capital spending by 13% from the previous fiscal year.  This represents a 4.9% rise from estimates made in February.  The results were based on a poll of 1,043 companies.  This insurer of the explosives industry said two consultants were named to its board to replace two explosives-company executives as part of an attempt to replace company customers with more impartial directors.  Nobel said Howard M. Zelikow, a financial consultant, and Joanne S. Morrissey, president of an insurance and investment banking firm, were named directors.  They succeed R. Edward McGhee, president of Kentucky Powder Co., and Carl A. Clauss, manager, human resources and planning, Explosives Technology International Inc.  Stephen D. Weinroth, recently elected chairman of Integrated Resources Inc., took a leave of absence from Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. to devote full time to his new duties.  Additionally, Mr. Weinroth was elected co-chief executive officer of Integrated over the weekend, a position he shares with Arthur Goldberg.  In a decision that split Integrated's board earlier this month, Mr. Weinroth was elected chairman of the troubled financial services concern, succeeding Selig Zises, a company founder.  Drexel is Integrated's investment banker and is trying to keep the company afloat by restructuring its debt after it defaulted on debt payments.  Mr. Weinroth is a managing director in the corporate finance department at Drexel.  "We and Steve agree that for now he can best serve Integrated if he is relieved of his many senior responsibilities at Drexel and fully devotes his energies to his new post," said Frederick Joseph, Drexel's chief executive officer.  Steven A. Denning, general partner with General Atlantic Partners, and J. William Scruggs, director, business development for International Business Machines Corp. and president of Satellite Transponder Leasing Corp., were named to the board of this software company.  Board membership increases to seven.  TOSCO Corp., Santa Monica, Calif., declared a quarterly dividend of 15 cents a share, payable Sept. 30 to shareholders of record Sept. 20.  The payment is the first regular dividend to Tosco common shareholders.  The company also declared a regular quarterly dividend of 59 cents a share on its Series E Convertible Preferred stock, payable Sept. 30 to stock of record Sept. 20.  ELECTROSOURCE Inc. said it registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission to offer about 1.6 million common shares through a rights offering to its shareholders.  Terms call for shareholders of Electrosource's 4.8 million common shares to receive rights allowing them to buy one common share for $2 for each three shares they currently own.  Proceeds will be used to finance the Austin, Texas, company's research and development, for working capital and to defray licensing costs.  Electrosource is developing the use of co-extruded lead wire and electrodes for lead-acid batteries.  Electrosource said it expects to issue the rights in mid-September, after its registration with the SEC becomes effective.  The rights will expire 45 days after they are issued.  The Coast Guard has halted use by Exxon Corp. of its controversial kerosene dispersant on Prince William Sound beaches after field tests indicated that the chemical is no more effective than traditional cleanup methods while posing environmental risks.  The decision is a setback to the company's beleaguered efforts to speed cleanup of the mess left by the March 24 wreck of the supertanker Exxon Valdez, which spilled 11 million gallons of crude oil after plowing into Bligh Reef near Valdez.  The move is also likely to be viewed as yet another blow to oil-industry efforts to promote the use of chemical dispersants as an effective method of controlling and cleaning up oil spills.  Exxon had gone into field trials with the chemical, known as Corexit 9580, convinced that it would help whisk away tarlike oil with few negative environmental side effects.  "But Exxon was unable to demonstrate that the chemical was superior to other more conventional techniques," said Steve Provant, the state of Alaska's on-scene spill cleanup coordinator.  In addition, the tests also showed that "in our opinion, there was some risk associated with Corexit's use."  Exxon, in a prepared statement, called the decision "very disappointing" and "one that will not help the environment."  Said an Exxon spokesman: "Exxon feels that the scientific data fully support use of Corexit as a shoreline treatment procedure . . .  It again appears that bureaucratic forces overcame scientific and practical considerations."  The Coast Guard's decision came yesterday following a recommendation of a special task force that had been appointed to monitor the dispersant tests, which involved spraying of 299 gallons of the chemical on three sections of beaches on Smith Island in western Prince William Sound.  The task force, made up of scientists and policy makers from the state and the federal Environmental Protection Agency and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, concluded that there appeared to be "little to be gained" from the dispersant's use.  The state's Mr. Provant said the company told state oil-spill officials that it believes that, even without Corexit, it can still meet its own deadline for "treating" all of the sound's heavily oiled beaches by Sept. 15.  Mr. Provant, however, said the Exxon cleanup, while showing some progress, continues to be plagued by large amounts of subsurface oil that seeps from beaches and re-oils areas previously cleaned.  "On some beaches, we think this is a problem that's going to persist for a number of years," according to Mr. Provant; thus the state has asked Exxon to address the problem by assigning several crews to undertake experimental subsurface oil cleanup efforts past its planned Sept. 15 departure date.  On one trial beach, for example, Exxon was able to restore the badly soiled subsurface of a salmon stream by literally digging out three feet of oiled rocks and replacing them with clean rocks dredged from an unpolluted portion of the sound.  Few think that such a solution is practical for the more than 300 miles of Prince William Sound beaches that were drenched by crude oil.  Exxon hasn't yet responded to the request but has said previously that it won't expose cleanup crews to the sound's notoriously bad winter weather, which begins to deteriorate by the middle of September.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Exxon stock rose 62.5 cents to close at $44.25 a share.  AMERICAN ECOLOGY Corp., Agoura Hills, Calif., said it completed the sale of $28.5 million of new preferred stock, convertible debentures and warrants to Browning-Ferris Industries Inc., Houston.  Both are waste-management companies.  The sale included $3 million for 200,000 preferred shares at $15 each, convertible into common shares on a 1-to-1 basis; $22.5 million of 8.5%, 10-year secured debentures, convertible into 1.5 million common shares; and $3 million for warrants to buy 1.5 million additional common shares for $15 each.  Conversion rights and warrants expire in three years.  Assuming the conversion and exercise of the securities for an additional $22.5 million, Browning-Ferris will own more than 50% of American Ecology's common shares outstanding.  American Ecology has repaid Browning-Ferris's $8 million interim loan from the transaction's proceeds.  Perhaps it was inevitable.  First came pop-up ads.  Then came musical ads.  Now, computer disk ads are about to start in consumer magazines.  When the Sept. 4 issue of Forbes appears next week, 210,000 copies of the magazine will include floppy disks bound into ads for Nexis News Plus.  When used in a personal computer, the 5 1/4 inch disks offer a demonstration of Nexis, an electronic news retrieval service created by Mead Data Central.  Says the print ad's headline: "You Are Now Within 5 1/4 Inches Of Knowing It All."  Mead Data seized on the disk-in-an-ad idea because Nexis News Plus caters to executives who aren't particularly computer-literate -- and the disk shows that "it's a very easy product to use," a company spokesman says.  Executives who don't often use personal computers are "intimidated," he adds.  "If you don't use them a lot they're a little frightening.  This is real dramatic, it's fast, and it puts it right in someone's hands."  The Nexis disk is the first to appear in a consumer magazine, but it is just the latest twist in marketing everything from insurance to help-wanted ads via computer disks.  People who own personal computers -- and there are about 43 million PCs in the U.S. by some estimates -- "are an extremely attractive audience demographically," says J.G. Sandom, chief executive officer of New York-based Einstein & Sandom Inc., one of a handful of ad agencies specializing in ads on disks.  "They're more sophisticated than a boob-tube type audience, they're very affluent, and they have a lot more diposable income to spend."  The diskette ads cost far more than typical print ads, and the diskettes are easily damaged -- potentially alienating the very people advertisers are trying to impress.  But that hasn't swayed a number of companies from experimenting with them.  The diskette ads almost always use splashy graphics, plenty of color, and interactive sequences that can make them seem more like video games than hard-core sales pitches.  Most of the disks are mailed to people who already have computers.  But while the disks started out as basically junk mail for computer jocks -- serving primarily to show off some new type of software -- they have become, in this computer age, almost mass marketing for regular folks.  General Motors' Buick division, for example, began advertising free diskettes in computer magazines three years ago, and now gives away 175,000 of them a year.  The disks, in full color, show off Buick cars and technology, offer a Buick trivia quiz and throw in a spreadsheet to calculate payments on a new Buick car.  "It's reaching a target market of home computer users which is very upscale and attractive for us.  They're educated, have higher incomes, and they're the right age," says Nancy Newell, manager of Buick's electronic product information department.  Ford Motor also has used disks to advertise its products.  Einstein & Sandom, meanwhile, designed a diskette for Squibb Corp. to send to MBA students at Harvard and other top business schools this past spring.  A followup study found that 33% of students viewed the diskette only once, 29% viewed it only twice, and 18% viewed it three times or more.  Richard Laroy, Squibb's administrator of college recruitment, says the company is preparing another diskette for next spring's graduating classes.  Einstein & Sandom also is creating an interactive diskette for the Netherlands.  It will be offered, free, to senior executives at more than 2,000 companies and offers exhaustive information about the Netherlands, right down to the ins and outs of customs and transportation (illustrated by little airplanes and ships running across the screen).  Other companies also have used diskettes for business-to-business advertising, including Citicorp and American International Group.  Computer disk ads are becoming enough of a factor in advertising that a few mainstream ad agencies are getting involved in making them, too.  WPP Group's Ogilvy & Mather, for example, created a floppy diskette explaining Equitable's financial planning services, which Equitable insurance agents distributed to their customers.  The diskette analyzed the computer user's own financial situation.  But advertising on computer diskettes is costly and often isn't worth it.  Mead wouldn't disclose spending for its Forbes ads, but Mr. Sandom says a master diskette can cost $25,000 to $30,000, while duplication costs run 25 cents to $1.25 for each disk; the price of the ad space and of inserting the diskettes would be extra.  When disks are part of a direct mail package, each piece of mail comes to $2 to $4, Mr. Sandom says.  What's more, Mead's ambitious Forbes ad could prove technically worrisome, as well.  Mr. Sandom says his company tried binding a diskette ad into a computer publication several years back, but a large number of the diskettes were damaged during binding.  The Mead spokesman, however, says the company engineered several test runs at Forbes's Illinois binding plant to make sure the diskettes weren't damaged.  He says the diskette will be included in only 210,000 Forbes -- those pegged for top executives, as well as those distributed in New York, Chicago and California -- because including the diskette slows down the binding process 20% to 25%.  Mead also kept security tight to prevent tampering with the diskettes; Mead security experts even escorted the truck carrying the diskettes to the printing plant.  The diskettes in the ads are bound in closed envelopes, with a sticker plastered over the opening and warning not to use if it is open.  "There's been so much in the news about viruses," the spokesman says.  "This way people will know it's a disk no one has tampered with."  ---  Mayer Suit Is Dismissed  Oscar Mayer Foods, a unit of Philip Morris Cos., said the federal lawsuit it filed involving the advertising of Bryan Foods Inc., a unit of Sara Lee Corp., was dismissed.  The suit had charged, among other things, that Bryan's advertising of hot dogs, bacon and bologna unfairly represented Bryan's market share in the South compared with Oscar Mayer, and that the advertising had made unfair or misleading comparisons regarding taste tests.  Bryan didn't agree that its advertising was misleading or deceptive.  But a spokeswoman for Bryan said that the company started running new advertising July 31.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   SAATCHI & SAATCHI: John Hirschboeck, formerly executive management director in the agency's Torrance, Calif., office, was named president of Team One Advertising, the Saatchi unit that services the Toyota Lexus account.  Also at Team One, Scott Gilbert was named executive vice president, management director.  When Defense Secretary Dick Cheney released his defense management review recently, he stood next to a stack of reports taller than he was.  The pile represented Congress's past attempts to sacrifice entire forests in the cause of micromanaging U.S. defense.  Well, here they go again.  Having cleaned up after the Woodstock reunion that was the House defense debate, Pentagon managers are emerging to discover they're inundated with an avalanche of new congressional "report" requests.  The House Armed Services Committee alone requested 215 reports, while an additional 20 were added during debate on the House floor.  This year's report-request pace is 136% ahead of a year earlier, when 661 were finally demanded.  The demands from Congressmen engaged in "oversight" have become sufficiently burdensome throughout government that some White House staffers have proposed more thorough record-keeping to not only tally the demands but also keep track of what kinds of pressures are being brought to bear.  But as Mark B. Liedl reports nearby, Congress is not thrilled with having its "oversight" exposed to taxpayers and, on one front, an Interior Department appropriations bill, Congress has written in a provision denying the use of funds for recording such contacts (see editorial: "What Is Congress Trying to Hide?" -- WSJ Aug. 15, 1989).  So the administration probably faces a big fight on Capitol Hill if it makes any serious effort to regain control of the executive branch from those 535 legislators who aspire to micromanage and peddle influence for their special friends and contributors.  The most grievous abuse of the oversight power is directed at the Pentagon, no doubt in part because as bank robber Willie Sutton would have said, "That's where the money is."  Congress wants the Pentagon to study such vital national-security needs as the "Marriage and Family Therapy Report Demonstration Project."  Representative Pat Schroeder, the Colorado pork-barreler, has demanded a study of the Fitzsimons Army Medical Center to "accelerate the replacement hospital."  Guess which medical center employs voters in Ms. Schroeder's district?  A similar request to "design a child development center" in Wisconsin suggests the hidden hand of Les Aspin, House Armed Services Chairman.  Then there's such urgent needs as: "transmissions for tactical trucks."  A reevaluation of the "mobile kitchen trailer."  An "action plan" to investigate "household goods claims."  A report to analyze "the free flow of information to the armed forces via the Stars and Stripes" newspaper.  A study of "Korea blackmarketing."  And a plan on "base closure environmental issues" -- which Congress hopes will create a procedural hurdle or two to closing down obsolete bases.  While the details invite ridicule, there is a serious issue here.  As Mr. Liedl also points out, Secretary Cheney's management review notes that on average each report requires 1,000 hours and $50,000 to prepare.  For fiscal year 1988, Defense says these demands consumed 317 man-years of work and cost about $35.8 million.  Since 1970, such requests have soared by 1800%.  Of course, anyone who thinks Members of Congress actually read these reports probably also enjoys reading the Congressional Record.  Members assign them to a staffer who hunts for details they can then use to bash the Pentagon or get a little media attention.  More broadly, this report mania is symptomatic of the general congressional habit of meddling in even the smallest Pentagon decisions.  As Mr. Cheney's review put it, "Every working day . . . entails . . . three new General Accounting Office audits of DOD; an estimated 450 written inquiries and over 2,500 telephone inquiries from Capitol Hill."  This is one of the reasons the Pentagon has an acquisitions workforce of 582,131 people -- incredible as it seems, more than half a million people to process the paperwork required by the nation's insane defense acquisition laws.  Pentagon-bashing is a great Washington sport, but as Mr. Cheney has observed, defense management can be improved "if, and only if, Congress fundamentally changes the way it addresses defense programs and policies."  Toward that end, Mr. Cheney has commissioned a White Paper on Defense and Congress to be submitted to President Bush by October 1.  The nation's trees, and taxpayers, will be grateful if this one study will eliminate the need for hundreds of others.  Hewlett-Packard Co. said errors in predicting demand for its product lines depressed earnings significantly below analysts' expectations for the second consecutive quarter.  The Palo Alto, Calif., maker of computers and scientific instruments estimated that per-share net income for the third quarter ended July 31 was 11% to 16% less than what most analysts had anticipated.  The company expects to report Thursday that per-share net was, at best, flat at 75 cents to 80 cents, compared with analysts' expectations of as much as 95 cents.  A year earlier, net was $192 million, or 80 cents a share, on revenue of $2.4 billion.  The company said both domestic and international orders for its products continue to show "good" year-to-year growth.  But it said "revenues will fall below expectations because of continuing difficulties in adjusting shipment plans to match the changing mix of its business."  The announcement, which drove Hewlett-Packard's stock down nearly 5% on heavy volume, was generally a less-shocking replay of glitches in the second-quarter.  The company refused to elaborate on its difficulties, but said it had imposed expense and hiring controls as a means of improving its profitability.  Computer makers generally have had trouble attempting to forecast demand for their products.  As the time it takes to bring a new product to market is shortening, computer makers are increasingly buffeted by their own inability to quickly manufacture new products, or by customer fears that the introduction of a better, cheaper machine is just around the corner.  The challenge has been compounded because Hewlett-Packard and many other companies have been maintaining ever-leaner product inventories in an attempt to hold down costs.  Such policies have tended to make quarterly earnings reports more volatile, however.  Analysts speculated that, as in the second quarter, Hewlett-Packard had unexpected demand for such "low-end" products as personal computers, printers and workstations, while orders for its commercial computers and instruments failed to meet forecasts.  While some analysts said the miscue didn't alter their fundamental view of the company, it has raised eyebrows.  "After two quarters it becomes kind of a question mark" as to why Hewlett can't ship more on the low-end, said Laura Conigliaro, an analyst with Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  "These are products that basically use standard parts."  A spokeswoman said the lower-than-expected earnings was unrelated to the company's $476.4 million purchase in May of Apollo Computer Inc., a major manufacturer of workstations, which are desk-top computers widely used by scientists and engineers.  The company previously said costs from the acquisition would depress per-share earnings 10 cents to 15 cents in the latest period.  While Hewlett-Packard's workstation business appears strong for the moment, there is some concern that the company has underestimated the challenge of taking over Apollo.  Some analysts said the company has confused customers by not making it clear which computers it will continue to offer in the future.  "There's tremendous overlap" between the two companies' workstation products, said Vicki Brown, an analyst with International Data Corp. of Framingham, Mass.  "I think they underestimated the amount of work it will take" to make this acquisition successful.  In this year's second quarter, profit was $203 million, or 86 cents a share, on revenue of $2.86 billion.  That profit was 21% below what some analysts had predicted.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Hewlett-Packard stock fell $2.50 to close yesterday at $52.75 a share.  Separately, Hewlett-Packard, Siemens AG and American Telephone & Telegraph Co.'s Microelectronics unit announced an agreement for international multisourcing of key fiber-optic parts.  The companies said they agreed on a common transceiver with interchangeable parts that will comply with Fiber Distributed Data Interface standards for computer networking.  The transceivers provide transmission of optical signals over fiber.  The companies said their pact will assure original equipment manufacturers of reliable sources of standardized products, and advance the development of an emerging industry standard for fiber-optic parts.  Samples of the three companies' transceivers are slated to become available this fall.  Raw steel production by the nation's mills decreased 2.8% last week to 1,811,000 tons from 1,863,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 1.2% from the 1,832,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 81.5% of its capability last week, compared with 83.8% the previous week and 85.9% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Aug. 12 ......... 1,811,000 81.5%  @ Week to Aug. 5 .......... 1,863,000 83.8%  @ Year to date ............ 62,587,000 88.0%  @ Year earlier to date .... 61,768,000 89.7%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  International Business Machines Corp. said it agreed to buy a minority stake in a company that develops information management software.  Terms of the purchase from closely held Bachman Information Systems Inc., Cambridge, Mass., weren't disclosed.  In a hastily arranged proposal to top Amax Inc.'s rival bid, Noranda Inc. and Sweden's Trelleborg AB said they plan to offer 37 Canadian dollars (US$31.49), or a total C$2.13 billion (US$1.81 billion), for the approximately 73% of all Falconbridge Ltd. shares they don't already own.  Noranda is a resource giant indirectly controlled by Toronto financiers Edward and Peter Bronfman; Trelleborg is an industrial group with interests in mining, construction, minerals processing, rubber and plastics.  The two companies said they plan to operate Toronto-based Falconbridge's nickel, copper and zinc operations in an equal partnership.  The proposed bid follows the previously reported friendly offer for Falconbridge by Amax, a big aluminum, coal and gold-mining concern based in Greenwich, Conn., for C$36.125 a share, or C$2.85 billion, (US$2.43 billion).  Amax wouldn't comment on the competing offer beyond saying it was reviewing its position.  But industry analysts don't expect Amax to give up the fight, predicting a slightly higher bid is probable.  "I expect the bidding to work its way up" to C$40, said Rick Cohen, a mining analyst at BBN James Capel Inc. Yesterday, in national over-the-counter trading, Falconbridge shares rose $1.25 a share to $32.375 on volume of 599,300 shares.  In trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange, Noranda stock fell 12.5 cents to C$24.875.  For its part, Falconbridge seeks the best price.  "I'm looking for the best deal for the shareholder.  We'll take the highest bid," commented William James, Falconbridge's chairman and chief executive officer.  Analysts were loath to predict the winner of the battle for Falconbridge.  Nevertheless, they said, the advantage seems to lie with Noranda and Trelleborg.  The two companies already own between them 21.5 million Falconbridge shares, or about 27.2% of the total 79 million shares outstanding on a fully diluted basis.  The two companies' proposed bid is conditional on acceptances being received from holders of at least 25 million additional shares.  A bid by Noranda had been widely expected after the company amassed a stake of 18.8 million Falconbridge shares during the past year with the aim of acquiring Falconbridge's Kidd Creek zinc, copper and silver operations in northern Ontario.  In the wake of the Amax bid, Noranda moved quickly to select a partner to go after Falconbridge, and Trelleborg "decided more or less overnight" to accept Noranda's invitation to join the bid, said Kjell Nilsson, Trelleborg's deputy chief executive officer.  Mr. Nilsson said Trelleborg had been studying Falconbridge as a possible takeover target since early spring, when it snapped up a stake of almost 3.3%.  The Swedish company, which currently has cash holdings of about C$1.5 billion, said it hasn't decided how it will finance its share of the bid.  Noranda, which said it would have to pay C$590 million of the total purchase price of C$2.13 billion to increase its stake to 50%, said it would finance its portion of the bid through bank loans.  The Environmental Protection Agency, in an effort to curb emissions of particulate matter, is proposing to reduce the allowable sulfur levels in diesel fuel used in on-the-road motor vehicles.  "Heavy-duty diesel engines are a major source of particulate emissions, including the smaller, fine particles that are of greatest concern in protecting public health," EPA chief William Reilly said in a statement.  The EPA estimated the cost of the proposal at 1.8 cents to 2.3 cents a gallon, depending on the amount of fuel involved.  An EPA official explained that refiners may decide to lower the sulfur on all diesel fuel, even that used in off-road vehicles.  Tougher particulate-matter standards are already being phased in for engine makers.  But engine changes can't capture sulfate particulates, which are formed when sulfur is oxidized during combustion, according to the agency.  In addition to reducing particulate emissions, lowering the fuel's sulfur content also would help reduce acid rain, according to the EPA.  This is because much of the sulfur that isn't emitted as particulate matter is released as sulfur dioxide.  This, in turn, is further oxidized in the atmosphere to form sulfuric acid and ammonium sulfates, which contribute to acid rain, the agency said.  Under the proposal, refiners would have to lower the sulfur content of diesel fuel to a maximum of 0.05% from current average levels of about 0.25%.  In addition, the agency plans to cap at current levels certain other chemicals such as benzene that are known as aromatics.  Both requirements would take effect on Oct. 1, 1993.  The agency said the basis of the plan is a proposal submitted to the EPA last summer by a group of diesel-engine makers and petroleum refiners.  Among other concerns, the engine makers worried that the sulfur in diesel fuel could damage equipment being installed on engines to meet the particulate-emission standards.  Also, the agency said the proposal conforms to a sulfur-reduction requirement recently approved in California.  The agency is soliciting comment on the proposed rule for 30 days.  BRE Properties Inc. said it adopted a shareholder rights plan to "deter coercive or unfair takeover tactics."  Under the plan, holders of stock of record Sept. 7 would receive rights to buy additional common shares, exercisable when an investor or group acquires at least 32%, or announces a tender offer for 40% or more, of BRE.  BRE said the plan was adopted after consulting with advisers, and not in response to any specific attempt to acquire control of the company.  Business inventories of unsold goods, a measure monitored for clues to the direction of the economy, continued to grow in June.  The Commerce Department said inventories of manufacturers, retailers and wholesalers increased by 0.4% in June on top of a revised 0.9% increase in May, even bigger than the department's earlier 0.7% estimate.  A pileup of unsold goods in stores and warehouses is a sign that production is outstripping demand.  It is regarded by economists as a harbinger of an economic slowdown, and the June increase was accompanied by a decline in total business sales.  But other recent government reports suggest that the economy may have perked up in July.  The Commerce Department said last week, for instance, that retail sales rebounded in July.  Even with the June increase, stocks remain at manageable levels, with inventories equal to 1.51 months' sales at the current pace.  That's up from 1.50 in May and 1.49 in April but well within the recent range for this ratio.  The government said inventories amounted to $780.84 billion in June.  Total business sales came to $516.43 billion, down 0.3% from May, when they rose 0.1%.  The figures are adjusted for usual seasonal variations but not for inflation.  Retailers' inventories grew 0.6% to $231.89 billion after increasing 1.7% the month before, a reflection of recent sluggishness in consumer spending.  Department-store inventories rose 1.6% in June and at month's end were 10.3% higher than a year before.  The value of unsold cars on auto dealers' lots rose a modest 0.3% in the month but stood 17.9% higher than in June 1988.  At the end of June, auto dealers had inventories equal to 2.07 months' sales, compared with 2.04 the month before and 1.77 in June 1988.  Wholesale inventories increased less than 0.1% to $182.74 billion in June.  Manufacturers' inventories, which account for nearly half of all inventories in the economy, grew 0.3% in June to $366.22 billion.  The department said that before adjusting for seasonal variations, business inventories fell 0.1% in June to $779.74 billion.  Here is a summary of the Commerce Department's report on business inventories and sales in June.  The figures are in billions of dollars, seasonally adjusted:  @ (billions of dollars)  @ June May June  @ 1989 1989 1988  @ Total business inventories ..... 780.84 778.09 724.52  @ Manufacturers ................ 366.22 365.06 341.96  @ Retailers .................... 231.89 230.42 210.47  @ Wholesalers .................. 182.74 182.62 172.08  @ Total business sales ........... 516.43 518.09 486.23  @ Inventory/sales ratio .......... 1.51 1.50 1.49  Michaels Stores Inc. said a shareholder filed a class-action lawsuit against it in Delaware Chancery Court, challenging its agreement to be acquired by an investment group for $9.50 a share in cash and $2.50 in preferred stock.  Michaels, a specialty retailer, said the suit seeks to enjoin the transaction with MSI Holdings Inc., a investment group including Grauer & Wheat Investments Inc. of Dallas and Acadia Partners Limited Partnership, which is affiliated with Robert M. Bass Group of Fort Worth, Texas.  Michaels said it intends to defend itself against the lawsuit.  When Congress adjourned for its summer vacation it left behind a bombshell that could explode into a scandal.  Buried in the 119-page appropriations bill funding the Interior Department is a clause that effectively prohibits department employees from making any record of their contacts with Capitol Hill.  The clause is a perfect illustration of congressional micromanagement of executive branch operations, and it raises a serious question: What does Congress have to hide?  In an effort to curb congressional micromanagement of the executive branch, White House staffers and others recently proposed that executive branch employees be required to report all contacts with members of Congress and their staffs.  The reason: to gauge the extent of congressional demands on the executive branch, to determine which demands result in better-managed federal programs and which impede effective execution of the law and encourage wasteful spending.  Such a requirement would be consistent with current laws requiring agency officials to include in the public record any ex parte contacts that arise during the agency adjudication and rulemaking process.  There is one glitch, however: Congress doesn't like the idea.  Tucked into the massive appropriations bill providing fiscal 1990 funding for the Interior Department is Section 117, which reads: "None of the funds available under this (bill) may be used to prepare reports on contacts between employees of the Department of the Interior and Members and Committees of Congress and their staff."  This means that department employees will be forbidden by Congress from telling their boss, the secretary of the interior, who on Capitol Hill is calling them, how often, and for what reasons.  The section makes it illegal for staffers to communicate -- either orally or in writing -- such information to the secretary.  Such Orwellian tactics might make Mikhail Gorbachev shudder, but they are becoming business as usual in a Washington increasingly divided by a constitutional power struggle between the executive and legislative branches of government.  Riders to appropriations bills are one of Congress's preferred vehicles for micromanaging the executive branch.  Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher, for example, recently complained that Congress was forcing him to spend money on pork-barrel projects ineligible for funding under established federal guidelines.  Five public-works projects proposed for the Economic Development Administration totaling $11.4 million were rejected this year by Mr. Mosbacher as being legally ineligible under EDA guidelines.  Mr. Mosbacher was overridden, however, by congressmen seeking the projects for their home states.  The secretary was directed in the department's appropriations bill to earmark funding for the five projects, as well as six others that the inspector general of the department determined were "inordinate," "inappropriate" and "flawed with respect to long-existing EDA policies."  Attorney General Richard Thornburgh has experienced similar problems.  Earlier this year Mr. Thornburgh sought to merge the FBI regional office in Butte, Mont., into the regional office in Salt Lake City.  The FBI had requested the change, confident it could perform its mission while saving $1.9 million by shutting down the Butte office.  Montana Sen. Max Baucus, who is facing re-election in 1990, disagreed.  Determined to keep the office open, the Montana Democrat inserted in the Justice Department's supplemental appropriations bill the following clause: "None of the funds provided by this appropriation bill shall be available to relocate, reorganize, or consolidate any office, agency, function, facility, station, activity or other entity falling under the jurisdiction of the Department of Justice."  Rep. Neal Smith (D., Iowa), chairman of the House Appropriations subcommittee with jurisdiction over the Justice Department, clearly expressed the congressional intent behind the appropriations bill rider.  In a June 13 Scripps Howard news service story, he remarked: "Legally, they (Justice) can do it once.  But the next year they'll have no flexibility at all on closing.  We'll write it into the law that they can't change anything."  The congressional micromanagement story also can be told in numbers.  Example: A Sept. 27, 1988, study by the Congressional Research Service found that 74 House and Senate committees and subcommittees exercise jurisdiction over the Office of National Drug Control Policy. (Ironically, that number does not include the House Select Committee on Narcotics Abuse and Control.) Such mind-numbing oversight means that virtually every member of Congress sits on a committee with jurisdiction over the federal drug office, enabling hundreds to assert to constituents that they personally are overseeing the federal drug effort.  The Defense Department is another victim of oversight overkill.  In a report submitted June 12 to the president, Secretary of Defense Richard Cheney, himself a former congressman, decried congressional micromanagement of the Defense Department.  Mr. Cheney reported that 107 congressional committees and subcommittees oversee his department.  But that's not all.  Every working day, the Defense Department receives an estimated 450 written inquiries and more than 2,500 telephone inquiries from Capitol Hill.  Each day, according to the report, the department is required to submit to Congress nearly three separate written reports -- each averaging more than 1,000 man-hours and costing about $50,000 to prepare.  Senior Defense Department officials, meanwhile, spend 40 hours preparing for the average 14 hours of congressional testimony they provide each day that Congress is in session.  None of this "oversight," however, prevented such wasteful spending as the massive Defense Department procurement fraud uncovered in 1988 by the FBI.  In the wake of the mismanagement of millions of dollars at the Department of Housing and Urban Development, many members of Congress are calling for increased oversight of HUD. Yet Congress is and has been exercising considerable jurisdiction over the department.  During the HUD scandal years, 84 congressional committees and subcommittees had jurisdiction over HUD. Obviously, the oversight was ineffective.  The measure of proper and effective congressional oversight, therefore, is not the quantity of oversight but the quality of it.  And improving the quality requires addressing this question: Is congressional oversight being used to improve federal programs and spend federal tax dollars wisely, or is it being used to strong-arm executive branch agencies into delivering political benefits to re-election-minded congressmen?  What is missing from the congressional hearings on the HUD scandal, for example, are details about the role congressmen played as lobbyists encouraging the mismanagement of funds.  How often did congressmen call or write HUD officials pressing them to grant housing contracts to their own friends and supporters?  As the Washington Post, the New York Times, and others have reported, several congressmen -- even some who have expressed outrage over the scandal -- worked hand-in-hand with professional influence peddlers to direct HUD contracts to campaign contributors and influential constituents.  Yet, there is no official record of this congressional lobbying.  Perhaps this explains why Congress would want to prevent Interior Department employees from reporting contacts with congressional offices.  A record of contacts, after all, would help to expose congressional "politicking" masquerading as oversight.  It would define the difference between effective oversight and politically motivated arm-twisting, and it would identify those members of Congress who use the oversight process simply to feather their own political nests.  Congress in the 1970s passed "sunshine laws" to open the government process to public scrutiny.  Now Congress, it seems, is closing the windows, pulling the shades, and barring the door, lest the public see the light.  Sometime, somewhere, the president needs to draw the line.  A constitutional challenge to congressional micromanagement is in order, and Section 117 of the fiscal 1990 Interior Department Appropriations bill is an appropriate place to make a stand.  It is an unconstitutional violation of the separation of powers, motivated by Congress's desire to evade public accountability.  President Bush should say "let the sun shine in."  ---  Mr. Liedl is director of the U.S. Congress Assessment Project at the Heritage Foundation in Washington.  A related editorial appears today.  General Motors Corp.'s Electronic Data Systems Corp. unit said it received a five-year contract to install secretarial workstations at National Aeronautics and Space Administration's Johnson Space Center in Houston.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The NASA contract calls for EDS, based in Dallas, to provide as many as 2,500 Apple MacIntosh II workstations, including printers and support services.  Nissan Motor Co. is consolidating its Sentra budget car line for 1990 by eliminating some models and making higher-priced versions of others available only as special option packages.  The moves are designed to make Sentra more appealing to cost-conscious buyers, said a spokesman for Nissan Motor Corp. in U.S.A., the company's U.S. sales arm based in Carson, Calif.  Sentra sales, while accounting for 44% of all Nissan's U.S. car deliveries through July, are down about 12% from last year.  The Japanese auto maker also announced 1990 prices for its popular Maxima luxury sedan and sporty 240SX yesterday.  Nissan is the first of the major Japanese companies to disclose 1990 prices.  Toyota Motor Corp. and Honda Motor Co. plan to release new prices in September, one month before Nissan expects to announce most of its remaining car and truck prices.  Nissan raised prices on the luxury four-door Maxima but froze prices on the 240SX.  The new base price of the least costly Maxima is $17,699, up 4.1%, or $700, from October 1988, when the restyled version of the car was introduced.  More than half the change came during a stiff midyear price increase in January.  Compared with the January prices, yesterday's increase was only $200 a car.  The 240SX got midyear base-price increases ranging from 1.9% to 2.7%.  The current 240SX prices range from $12,999 for the 240SX XE with a standard transmission to $14,329 for a 240SX SE with automatic transmission.  Sales of Maxima and 240SX have been soaring so far this year.  Nissan's pricing strategy was more complex on its entry-level car, the Sentra.  Nissan raised the base price of its least costly car by 4.3% to $7,299.  It combined some other models: For example, the Sentra E with five-speed manual transmission got some additional standard equipment and is now called the Sentra XE.  After a January price increase, the Sentra XE started at $10,599; the "new" Sentra XE starts at $9,149.  Extra equipment on the old XE is now offered in an optional package.  Nissan eliminated the Sentra all-wheel-drive wagon, because it would have competed with Nissan's new Axxess all-purpose vehicle, the spokesman said.  Nissan said it didn't change destination charges or dealer profit margins on Sentra, Maxima and the 240SX, which account for almost 80% of the company's U.S. sales.  Two pieces of gloomy news from Smith Corona Corp. have sent the company's shares reeling just two weeks after the stock went public.  Shares of the typewriter and word processor concern plunged $4.375 a share in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, to close at $18 a share on news that it would lay off 10% of its work force.  A week earlier, the company had reported a $1.4 million loss for the fiscal fourth quarter ended June 30, although operating earnings before a one-time charge more than doubled to $19.1 million.  The slump in the price puts Smith Corona 14% below the $21 offering price on July 28 and 23% below the stock's high of $23.375 a share on Aug. 9 and 10.  The company topped the most active trading list on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, with volume of 2.3 million shares.  In light of the stock's decline, analysts wondered if Smith Corona was aware of the bad news when it made its initial public offering.  Late Friday, Smith Corona said it would reduce its factory work force by 450 employees, or 10%, at its Cortland, N.Y., and Singapore plants, in order to balance inventories and in response to evidence of a general softening of retail demand.  Clarifying the report yesterday, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer G. Lee Thompson said the layoffs include temporary manufacturing employees -- about 100 in Cortland and 150 in Singapore.  In addition, the company will let go, at the Cortland facility, 100 probationary employees and about 100 employees who have been with the company less than a year.  The layoff is in response to sales data that became available for the first time late last week in monthly forecast meetings, Mr. Thompson said.  Robert S. Natale, an analyst with Standard & Poor's Corp., told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report, "It's startling that a company could make such an announcement of such substantial reductions in the work force so soon after an initial public offering.  Even a jaundiced IPO investor would find this startling."  Said Mr. Thompson, "It's unfortunate that the timing was such.  But this was from a monthly meeting that has been part of the business routine.  This can't be construed as having any long-term effect."  Smith Corona, based in New Canaan, Conn., was acquired in 1986 along with its parent SCM Corp. and other assets for $930 million by Hanson PLC, which retains a 47.9% interest.  Even before the offering, analysts were concerned that Smith Corona's balance sheet would remain highly leveraged, with pro forma debt totaling $95 million.  The fourth-quarter loss reflects a $14.6 million charge for certain incentive payments made to management "based on an increase in the value of the company."  In the fiscal fourth quarter ended June 30, 1988, Smith Corona earned $4 million, after a $1.4 million charge for the payments.  Mr. Thompson reminded reporters that the company is still in its 25-day quiet period under federal securities regulations for initial public offerings.  "Personally, I'm surprised by the severity of the market's reaction to our announcement.  Unfortunately, that has been the result of our trying to be honest and forthright with investors about recent developments here," he said.  He said that by late Thursday night, company staff had done some calculations based on unit orders from the company's largest customers.  When they met Friday, they realized the company was "facing slower than anticipated sell-through on the part of retailers."  Concerning the layoffs, Mr. Thompson said, "We had planned from the beginning to take these people off later in the quarter, but we decided to do it earlier based on the most recent data."  no kidding.  Maybe I went to sleep worrying about underpaid federal officials, or maybe about the federal deficit.  I don't know.  But I dreamed up a plan to solve both problems at once by applying to government finance one of the great marketing ideas of our age -- charging for autographs.  Baseball players can get anywhere from $5 to $25, or even more, for their autographs -- something they used to give away.  Want a signature scribbled on a piece of paper?  Five bucks.  An autographed catcher's mitt?  You're looking at more like $25 (and you have to supply your own mitt).  These are rough figures, of course.  Not every pro can command these prices; you can bargain for a lower price on a "high growth" (or shall I say "junk"?) player.  If there are people who will pay $25 for a baseball player's autograph, surely there's a market for the president's autographs?  Nowadays, these autographs are being given away] But here's the real brainstorm: If you can charge for an autograph, you can probably charge for a handshake -- documented, of course.  So the plan is this.  Five bucks to shake the president's hand.  Cash.  Exact change.  And for that modest fee you get not only the handshake, but a tasteful card that documents the date and place of the event.  Now, in these violent times, we cannot have people reaching into their pockets for a five spot as the president approaches.  Instead, the Secret Service will work its way along the barricades before the president arrives.  Anyone who wants to shake the president's hand -- I mean, really wants to, enough to put up some cash -- waves a $5 bill in the air. (This is a visual image that has been missing on the evening newscasts: ordinary citizens waving money in the air to give away to the federal government.  But I digress.)  For five bucks, you get an official card, yours to keep -- and to sell at a capital gain -- for the future.  Then, when the president hustles along the barricade, he shakes your right hand only if you display the card in your left.  You can visualize the same system, on a smaller scale, for lesser -- but nevertheless saleable -- government officials.  A $2 fee might be in order for, say, a senator -- and might revive the $2 bill, as well.  Add to this a system for selling autographs and autographed pictures by mail (the resale values of autographed pictures of some movie stars has gone as high as $3,000) and you have a real moneymaker.  As state lotteries prove, people may complain about taxes but that doesn't mean they aren't willing to throw their money away on a bad investment if it is wrapped up in a little patriotism and entertainment value.  Who gets the money?  Here's the genius of this scheme.  After subtracting overhead for printing and staff, the federal official gets all the money, unless the federal government is currently running a deficit, in which case the take is split between the official and the general fund.  So, we supplement officials' income and provide an incentive to reduce the deficit at the same time.  Instead of taking honoraria of $5,000 from suspicious sources, a congressman could collect exactly the same amount from 2,500 anonymous -- and delighted ordinary citizens.  Rather, he gets $5,000 if he does something about the deficit -- otherwise, only half.  And because the most sought-after congressmen will most probably be the most powerful, this new system will deliver the most incentive to close the deficit to the legislators in the best position to do it.  My friends are skeptical about my scheme.  One points out that, even if the government got the entire $5 per handshake, the president would have to shake 20 billion hands to make a $100 billion dent in the deficit.  That would mean shaking the hand of every person on Earth four times.  Another friend says congressmen will just have their special interest constituencies buy 5,000 handshake cards (sort of like buying 300 copies of a book), or pass off autopen signatures as the real thing, and then fail to turn in the government's share of the proceeds.  He thinks that a society that approves of charging for autographs is a society that condones making money in any way possible, even corruptly.  He doesn't have any heroes anymore.  But I do, and I'm willing to pay hard cash to shake their hands.  ---  Mr. Collins is senior editor at the Hudson Institute in Indianapolis. 